Whether there is a way to punish him
To prevent this from happening again
Or, how much longer will it be until the restaurant is ready? Can you ask for me?
Students sing the leading role at Zhejiang University’s academic year-end conference, and the research results open people’s minds - Xinhua News
Use air to wash your hands, breathe to determine the disease, and accurately search for the source of smog Last night, at the opening ceremony of the 2016 Academic Conference of Zhejiang University, a series of innovative academic achievements were recognized.
The main researchers of these achievements are all students, and the research covers major fields such as the environment, machinery, energy, medicine, life sciences, humanities education and so on. The students started with a curious idea and created many high-end inventions with practical value. Some of the projects have won awards both at home and abroad.
Bio-sensors: Your home doctor
The team of doctoral student Zhang Diming from the School of Biomedical Engineering demonstrated an on-site biological sensor on a smart phone, which is only half the size of a smart phone.
"All you need to do is take a light breath, and this set of instruments can preliminarily detect your health status from the composition of the gas you exhale. "
Zhang Diming explained that the sensor is connected to a smart phone. After exhaling, the health report will be displayed on the phone.
The smart bracelet that can detect health on the market usually detects physical parameters such as temperature and pulse.
This set of biological sensors uses the new material of graphene, and its target is chemical elements. Its sensitive “smell” allows it to more deeply and accurately reflect the health status of the body.
Intelligent surgical light: doctors' high-energy eyes
In addition to smartphones, smart surgical lamps are also used in the operating room.
This invention won the silver award at the 44th Swiss Geneva International Invention Exhibition this year.
Zhu Linjing and Shen Junfei, graduate students of the School of Optoelectronic Science and Engineering, opened up a new idea in the defects of traditional operating lights, and invented an intelligent LED surgical shadowless lamp.
"Many diseases are not detected early enough and not removed properly, and this is related to the light used by doctors in the operating room. "
Shen Junfei said, for example, if the doctor can't see all the tumor tissues in time during early cancer examination, then the cancer cells will continue to spread.
The smart operating light has four lamp discs, which can adjust the spectrum to enhance the differentiation of different tissues under illumination.
During the procedure, the doctor can adjust the size, brightness, spectrum, color uniformity, and shadow-free rate of the light spot according to the needs of the surgery and personal habits.
This intelligent surgical lamp has been tested in the Shao Yifu Hospital affiliated to Zhejiang University School of Medicine, Children’s Hospital affiliated to Zhejiang University School of Medicine, and other hospitals, and has received good feedback.
Last October, this invention won the first prize of the National Challenge Cup.
Air-wash your hands: water-saving and cool
Ordinary people just use water to wash their hands, at most they rub some soap, squeeze some hand sanitizer, and Li Qizhang and his classmates invented a set of "air hand washing device".
As soon as we stand on the device's sink, our weight can compress the air out.
"It's like a defibrillator.
The compressed air forms a liquid at the tap and combines with the water.
That way, we can get our hands clean!"
The color reaction and bacterial residue test proved that the effect of washing hands by this method is the same as that of ordinary hand washing method.
This device only relies on our own gravity as a driving force, which can ensure the cleanliness and save 90% of water, and the whole process is completely energy-free and energy-saving and environmentally friendly.
Last year, this invention stood out among many world-class universities at the 2nd Global Grand Challenges Summit and won the only gold award.
Please arrange to reimburse me as soon as possible, thank you.
Please cancel the order and return the cash, not points, and I will never use #PRS_ORG# in the future!
Bones and spicy pickles are not suitable for children to eat
If so, order as soon as possible
No, thank you
He asked me to tell you where he is #PRS_ORG#
I've waited long enough, I'm cancelling the order
I bought it from #PRS_ORG#, but I wrote the wrong address
Can it be changed?
or cancel the order
Okay, thank you
The most meaningful certificate is the first aid certificate
It is one of the most important skill certificates I have, apart from my driver's license!
Let's make it clear: emergency measures are actually emergency rescue measures in the event of an emergency, that is, rescue before the ambulance arrives.
It is well known that there is a period of time before the ambulance arrives after an accident, and it is this period of time that is the most critical.
At this time, emergency care is needed.
If I really had a heart attack, a stroke, or respiratory arrest, our window of life is only four minutes, the golden four minutes!
So it's so important that the people around you know first aid!
When someone around us falls down, we can save him with professional knowledge, instead of standing there doing nothing, which makes us feel so helpless.
"In China, we have 300,000 accidental deaths a year, and the most dangerous is sudden cardiac arrest.
In the United States, the national average is 15%.
In Las Vegas casino hotels, 70 to 80 per cent can be saved, but in Shanghai and Beijing it is less than 1 per cent."
This was said by Lu Le, the founder of First Response.
If someone is in cardiac arrest, with no breathing and no pulse, doing the Heimlich is not going to help.
Only with artificial respiration and external chest compressions can a person be saved.
I find that we still have very few people with this kind of awareness to learn first aid, but when things happen, it's too late, so we still call on everyone to learn this skill, so that we can react in time when we encounter an emergency.
It might even save a life!
You can sign up for a first aid certificate at your local Red Cross training center. I signed up at the Red Cross training center in Zhuhai, and students get a discount.
PS: The last picture is a record of the goals I want to achieve before I'm 25. Adding the first aid certificate to the list of goals was a few months ago, but it's really done!
Then go to take other certificates you want to take. I plan to take a diving certificate. I have seen a diving first aid certificate on Xiaohongshu. It seems that you need a first aid certificate to take this certificate, so the first aid certificate is actually very useful!
I ordered ＃#NUMBER#
One shrimp dumpling costs 13 yuan?
I haven't tried it
How does #NAME# not make it clear?
£13 for one?
Yesterday, #PRS_ORG# sent me the wrong meal. This time, they just gave me one shrimp dumpling to eat!?
Because I could see it was valid when I input the code before
First of all, let's talk about the conclusion. In my opinion, "Four Seas" is a full-scale bad movie in all aspects.
But you can't say this movie doesn't have any bright spots - at least the music selection is pretty good.
There are many kinds of bad films. The kind that makes you fall asleep in the cinema is one kind. The kind that makes you indignant after watching it is another kind. "Four Seas" is like a monkey on Mount Emei to the audience. It can ignite your anger in countless ways.
In terms of insulting the audience, Han Han is really a genius.
The most painful thing about this film is that it seems to be a creature from a Cormac McCarthy novel, indescribable and full of holes like the windbreaker on Little Big Man.
Even after you've watched it, you'll wonder if there's some sort of subtext the director is trying to convey, but when you really think about it, it's just a pile of poop.
First, I'll talk about some of the plot points I don't understand.
The main character lives on a small island in the south with his grandmother.
Her grandmother had a wish to see the snow, and then the plot arranged for a neighbor to drive a van to take her to Northeast China to see the snow.
Old people in their 80s and 90s sitting in a van from the south to the northeast to see snow??
He and his father are very relaxed about it.
Then, the old man had nothing more to say.
How did the protagonist's brother get a business license to open a hotel on an abandoned ship?
Why can the little hooligans of the flying car party on the island easily block a mountain road?
Then the truck with steel bars in the middle of the road stopped by the roadside, and even the truck drivers could not be found around.
This prop is too obvious.
Why would a fly-by-night, credit-challenged, suspected law-breaker become a police officer?
Why don’t you call the police when you are faced with high-interest loans? In the film, the police even specially asked if there were any difficulties?
An adult knows how to use a smart phone, but doesn't know how to use the room card to open the door in the hotel, and then forcibly arrange to find the hotel owner and sleep overnight outside the room door?
This kind of nonsense permeates the entire film, so much so that when I try to remember it, it makes me cringe.
Worse than the plot is the film's theme, or lack thereof, which is a hideous Frankenstein's monster.
At the beginning of the film, you may think that he wants to shoot a comedy, 20 minutes later, you guess that it may be an inspirational film. Halfway through the film, you feel that it may be a plot film that wants to show the difficulties of young people in small towns. After watching it, you don't know what you have watched at all, followed by a deep suspicion of yourself. Why do you have to go to the cinema to watch the film during the Spring Festival?
In fact, most people are also very familiar with the routines of various films. For example, if you want to shoot a motorcyclist, it will be inspirational + comedy and then tell the audience how a talented rookie will step by step towards success.
If you want to shoot a love film, then you should talk about the love-hate relationship between the young man in the town who likes to ride a motorcycle and the waitress girl.
If you're going to reflect reality, at least your plot can't have things that don't exist in the real world.
(For example, the character played by Yin Zheng, who has just been burned and can still sing), can't go to open some brain holes that even Kennedy can't stand.
As for the heroine who is not mentally retarded but acts like a 5-year-old kid in some aspects, I really don't know whether it's because of her acting skills or the director's requirements.
Another thing I don't quite understand is why Han Han, as a race car driver, is so keen on adding car crash scenes in his own movies?
Is it to trouble the audience to arrange such a movie during the Spring Festival?
Application: TaiDa rotary encoder with battery box
Origin: Shenzhen, China
The size of the battery box is as follows:
The following are the products in the A2 series:
CN1 connector CN1 signal I/O cable CN1 port terminal block brake resistor
Low-power encoder cable, medium and high-power encoder cable, low-power power line, medium and high-power power line
Low-power power line with brake, medium and high-power power line with brake, encoder and power plug, and servo battery box.
1. Our store's cooperating express company,
1) The signature of Wangwang is the basis of cooperation!
2) SF Express
2. If the buyer urgently needs the product or has a time limit, it is recommended to choose SF Express. It is recommended to pay on arrival. SF Express is relatively guaranteed. Modify the freight and then pay.
3. If the buyer has any questions about the freight charged by our store, they can choose to pay the freight.
4. Heavy products are usually delivered by logistics. Please contact us separately.
1. Our shop supports a 7-day return and exchange service. Due to product quality and quantity issues, our shop will bear the freight.
2. Non-quality problems of the product itself, due to the buyer's wrong choice of model and other factors need to return and exchange goods, as long as it does not affect the function of the product itself and does not affect secondary sales, the store supports free return and exchange services except for the freight, and the buyer needs to bear the round-trip freight.
3. Our store does not support returns due to express delivery delays, and requests that the seller bear the freight.
4. Customized products will not be returned or exchanged for non-quality issues.
1. Is this product genuine?
Answer: All products without the original factory brand will be replaced by domestic products.
2. Do you have any imitations?
Sorry, we do not sell counterfeit products. The so-called counterfeit products have the logo and packaging of the original factory.
3. Is the domestic xxx produced by the original factory in China?
Answer: The domestic product is a substitute product, not a product produced in China by the original factory. This is just what is used in China.
We provide professional Mitsubishi, Yaskawa, Delta, Panasonic, Omron, Siemens and other domestic servo, PLC connection cable, connector and other peripheral accessories, mainly including servo encoder, power cable, control connector, power aviation plug, terminal and cable, lithium battery, PLC program download line, connecting line, brake resistor, field bus, wire and cable, and all accessories are strictly in accordance with Mitsubishi standard, and are customized by professional engineers.
and use servo and PLC to conduct actual tests to ensure that we can provide customers with high-quality and durable products.
Welcome to make an inquiry!
Factory direct sales, welcome to wholesale!
Other lengths can be custom-made.
Please contact the store for related customized products!
What does it mean if we just give you the credit for the order?
May I?
Got it, but all 3 of my drinks spilled
Check the concrete module production and processing equipment Zhengzhou well wall brick module equipment introduction:
Zhengzhou Yixin is a domestic concrete inspection well module brick machine equipment, inspection well brick machine, inspection well wall body module machine professional production manufacturer, from semi-automatic to fully automatic production line.
After years of practice and development, it now has a solid quality and mainly produces hydraulic, mobile and fully automated inspection well series equipment and supporting devices.
Check the concrete module production and processing equipment. Zhengzhou well wall brick module equipment assembly site:
Check the concrete module production and processing equipment. The characteristics and advantages of the Zhengzhou well-wall brick module equipment:
The Yixin inspection well block brick machine equipment is widely applicable to new building materials for municipal underground structures such as coal, heat, water, electricity, and gas.
For example, various inspection wells, rainwater outlets, square ditches, septic tanks, and small structures such as bridge wing walls.
The advantage of using concrete modules to build inspection wells is that the upper, lower, left and right sides of the modules are all concave and convex groove structures, which can be combined to form a chain lock.
The shear resistance of the well-wall is far better than that of the flat friction masonry.
The module is a hollow structure. After the combination is built, the longitudinal holes are connected and the transverse holes are connected. After the core of the holes is poured, a cast-in-place concrete net structure is formed, which plays the role of secondary reinforcement and waterproofing.
Both the horizontal and vertical modules are provided with rebar slots, and the horizontal horizontal rebar and vertical rebar correspondingly increase the overall strength of the structure.
In addition, the inspection wells and drainage wells built with concrete inspection well modules are not easy to collapse, sink and leak. The mechanical properties of the well wall module are stable, the operation is simple, and the formed size is standard.
The concrete inspection well module brick machine equipment is equipped with a data input and output device and a one-touch touch-screen liquid crystal display to monitor the entire mechanical operation process, realize the ideal human-machine dialogue, automatic analysis of materials, density operation, safety logic control and fault diagnosis system.
The mechanical hydraulic system of the well wall body module adopts single-cylinder hydraulic transmission and double-cylinder hydraulic transmission.
The independent hydraulic integration station avoids the influence of the vibration of the main machine on the hydraulic system, thereby ensuring the reliability of the hydraulic system.
The concrete inspection well module brick machine equipment cloth box moves forward, mold box is demolded and rises, the storage box door is closed, and the automatic conveyor plate is all independently completed by the hydraulic system, so as to achieve the purpose of reducing the wear and maintenance of the mechanical equipment.
The concrete inspection well module brick machine equipment adopts imported computers and electrical equipment, seals and hydraulic parts. The comprehensive performance of the equipment is stable and reliable.
The mechanical excitation platform of the wall body module of the well wall uses a whole steel plate. The cutting line of the platform has no welding points, and the filler box is free to swing and guided to fully reduce the mechanical wear.
Reduce the mold load, fill the filler and encrypt the amplitude in one, and adopt one-piece, all-synchronization, table vibration and mold vibration to ensure that the compaction effect is achieved.
The wall module of the well wall is mechanically vibrated, and the computer automatically controls the amplitude to adjust the amplitude according to the cost performance ratio of the raw material, without wear and tear brake, so as to prolong the service life and reduce the cost.
The wall body module of the well wall has dual functions of mechanical automatic control and manual control.
Inspection well mold:
The inspection well of the Yi Xin brick machine is made of concrete blocks on the surface:
A corner of the workshop of Yixin Company:
Check the production and processing equipment of the concrete module of the inspection well
The Zhengzhou well wall brick module equipment, in addition to being able to produce inspection well blocks, can also produce various standard bricks, hollow bricks, and road flower bricks.
Delivery site:
Chongqing vocational schools pilot the modern apprenticeship system - Xinhuanet
Yesterday, the reporter learned from the Municipal Education Bureau that starting this year, our city will pilot the “modern apprenticeship” talent cultivation model in 60 vocational schools. The students accepted for the pilot training will simultaneously hold the status of apprentices. After enrollment, they will be pre-enrolled by the pilot enterprises as unit employees.
The Municipal Education Commission required that the enrollment and admission procedures of secondary vocational schools and the employment procedures of enterprises should be standardized, and the double identities of apprentices in secondary vocational schools and quasi-employees in enterprises should be clarified. According to the principle of two-way selection, apprentices, schools and enterprises should sign a three-party agreement. For apprentices who have reached the age of 16 and have not yet reached the age of 18, a four-party agreement should be signed by apprentices, guardians, schools and enterprises to determine the rights and interests of each party and the specific positions, teaching content and rights and interests protection of apprentices in on-the-job training.
Encourage pilot schools to adopt the modern apprenticeship form to jointly carry out pre-job training and job transfer training with cooperative enterprises.
The pilot schools must reform the mode of talent cultivation.
The school and the enterprise jointly designed the talent training scheme, jointly formulated the professional teaching standards, course standards, job standards, enterprise master standards, quality monitoring standards and corresponding implementation schemes.
The pilot program is based on the training cycle, and the internship time of students in enterprises is determined according to the professional talent training plan. The on-the-job internship is generally 6 months.
In enterprise practice, the enterprise group management model should be implemented. According to the characteristics of different professions, one master can guide 2 to 5 apprentices to form a learning group to ensure that students are proficient in the skills required for each training post.
According to the arrangement, from 2016 to August 2019, the city will determine 60 city-level modern apprenticeship pilot programs in three batches. Each pilot program will have about 50 people, and a total of about 3,000 students (apprentices) will be trained.
According to the principle of first trial and then implementation, from point to face, we will explore the establishment of a long-term mechanism of joint enrollment, joint training and integrated education, and truly improve students' job skills, increase the employment rate and employment quality of students.
My app says it's been delivered, but I haven't received it
I just ordered a takeaway, and I didn't know it was on the door
Then, call for a resend.
I live in Sheung Shui, why is the order in Hoi Fung Garden?
Did you get the address wrong?
This vacuum cleaner has been considered for a long time, and finally decided to cut the grass. The vacuum effect is good. The dust in the house is obviously less. It is a bit heavy to hold with one hand. The wet mop needs to be improved. There will be dust marks when going back and forth. Overall, I am still very satisfied.
The rice cooker is quite heavy and looks high-end. It is suitable for a kitchen novice like me. My child said that it tastes better than what I cook. I have made two meat dishes and two vegetarian dishes. The sweet and sour pork is especially delicious. It takes a little more time, but the other dishes take very little time. The noise is very small, so you don't have to worry about making a mess or not being able to cook!
After receiving the goods, I couldn't wait to cook three dishes at noon. Really, technology changes life. The control of the fire and seasoning is so precise. The taste of the dishes is directly upgraded to the level of a chef. Not bad, it is an artifact for those who are not good at cooking. I recommend buying it!
I added a new member to my kitchen.
A smart cooker that automatically controls the temperature and automatically stirs.
No more fear of being scalded by hot oil, and no more fear of not controlling the heat and burning or undercooking the dishes.
The fried dishes were much better than what I made, and the tomato and egg dish was particularly tasty, with the eggs having a particularly good texture.
It was a good buy.
The east and west are not bad, it is worth buying, and it is very good
Overall very good, clear and as described.
It's worth having.
The service is also very good.
The screen is large, clear, and not tiring for the eyes, and no other abnormalities have been found so far.
It is much thicker than the current mainstream monitors, and the frame is wider. The gap between the frame and the screen is a bit large, but the screen display effect is good, and the accessories are complete.
The logistics is fast!
The service attitude of the merchants is good!
After using it for some time, the quality is good, and the screen resolution is very clear.
It's great to fry stocks. One cent for four is too perfect.
The logistics is fast, the things are good, and I bought the second one. It is really a good thing. The display screen is of high quality and does not become distorted because of the large screen. The interfaces are complete.
It feels good, the colors are restored well, and the quality is good!
China Children’s Center will hold a series of activities to let children "high-tech" "six one" - Xinhuanet
Xinhua News Agency, Beijing, May 20 (Huang Xiaoxi and Zhou Shanshan) The reporter learned from the China Children's Center on May 20 that from May 28 to June 1 before and after Children's Day, the China Children's Center planned to hold a series of activities such as children's DIY experience, children's visual art festival and parent-child book fair, so that children could spend Children's Day in the charm of frontier technology.
It is understood that the activities held by the China Children’s Center during this year’s Children’s Day include “Love Home Create Cool” children’s future learning carnival, the first children’s visual art festival, “Book Carnival” activities, and “Family Love Reading” picture book series activities.
Li Zhongming, the Deputy Director of the China Children's Center, introduced in the 2016 "June 1" Children's Day media briefing held on the 20th, saying that the "Ai Jia Chuang Ku" Children's Future Learning Carnival is the key activity of the China Children's Center to celebrate "June 1" this year.
The activities focus on the organic combination of social innovation and family personal creativity. By participating in various innovative education activities, children and families can make innovative practices a cultural gene for ordinary families, and make "hands-on" a new learning and life style for broad families.
According to reports, the children's future learning carnival of “Aijiachuangku” includes the “Douguo Chuangke” experience activities, the 1st anniversary celebration of the Old Bull Children’s Exploration Museum and the “Explore the whole family’s love for children on Children’s Day” activities, the VR all-people experience plan, and dozens of cutting-edge technology experience contents such as the “Creative Tribe” interactive workshop.
Barbecue pork rice turns into kimchi pork rice
Will I have to buy another $100, $200 to use it?
It's worrying just how long it's going to take to finish
Yes, thank you
Was it the same rider who delivered it to me?
Can you help to follow up?
The restaurant said the food had been ready for more than half an hour
But no riders came to pick up the food
South African doctor: Omicron is highly transmissible but mostly mild
Many South African doctors and medical experts believe that the symptoms caused by the Omicron variant of the new coronavirus are milder than the Delta variant, although it spreads faster.
According to the Associated Press, as the omicron variant spreads in South Africa, a group of more than 5,000 doctors in the province of Gauteng in South Africa reported that the symptoms of the COVID-19 patients they are currently treating are relatively mild, such as body pain and coughing, which are similar to flu symptoms.
Dr. Unben Pillay, the head of the organization, said he sees dozens of patients a day, but no one has needed to be hospitalized.
Pyle said: "They are able to control the disease at home, and most people recover within 10 to 14 days of isolation. "
He said this includes elderly patients and those with underlying health conditions who are more likely to become seriously ill from the coronavirus.
He said that compared to the previous wave of the delta epidemic, the coronavirus patients he treated had "difficulty breathing and low blood oxygen levels.
Many people will be admitted to hospital within days."
In the two weeks since the Omicron variant was first reported in southern Africa, other doctors have also shared similar experiences.
Although it will take several weeks to collect enough data, doctors' observations and early evidence have provided some clues.
According to the summary of the South African National Institute of Infectious Diseases, only 30% of the COVID-19 patients who have been hospitalized in recent weeks are severe cases, which is half of the proportion of severe cases in the previous wave of the epidemic; the average hospital stay has been shortened from 8 days to 2.8 days; only 3% of the recent COVID-19 patients have died, while the death rate was 20% in the early outbreak of cases in South Africa.
Citing data from the National Institute for Communicable Diseases and other reports, Africa Health Research Institute director Willem Hanekom said: "At the moment, all the signs are that this is a milder disease. "
He said: "It's still early days, we need to get some late-stage data.
In general, hospitalizations and deaths tend to happen later, and we've only been in this wave for two weeks. "
At the same time, scientists around the world are watching case numbers and hospitalizations while testing the effectiveness of current vaccines and treatments.
While Delta remains the predominant variant globally, Omicron cases are emerging in dozens of countries, with South Africa as the epicenter of the outbreak.
According to health officials, new cases found in the first week of December in the Western Cape increased by 400%, and tests showed that more than 90% of the cases were caused by the Omicron variant.
Thank you to today's supporters, all 80 boxes were sent out!
Ingredients for the beauty soup:
The function of white fungus: sweet in taste, flat in nature, and belongs to the lung, stomach, and kidney meridians. It has the effects of strengthening the essence, nourishing the kidneys, lubricating the intestines, nourishing the stomach, replenishing energy, harmonizing the blood, strengthening the heart, nourishing the yin, moisturizing the lungs, generating body fluid, strengthening the body, nourishing the brain, invigorating the spirit, beautifying the skin, tendering the skin, and prolonging life. It is used to treat lung heat cough, lung dryness dry cough, menstrual disorders in women, gastritis, constipation, and other diseases. It is a good supplement for patients with yin deficiency and excessive fire who do not accept warm and nourishing supplements such as ginseng and deer antler.
The function of peach gum: bitter in flavor, neutral in nature, and belongs to the large intestine and bladder meridians.
Efficacy: It can promote blood circulation, promote diuresis, stop diarrhea, relieve pain, and can also replenish water, moisten the intestines, and if you have constipation, you can eat more peach gum.
The function of wolfberry: It is neutral in nature, sweet in taste, and returns to the liver and stomach meridians.
It nourishes the liver and brightens the eyes, nourishes the liver and kidneys, whitens and nourishes the skin, replenishes deficiency and generates body fluids, and delays aging.
The role of red dates: sweet in taste, neutral in nature, belonging to the spleen and stomach meridians. It has the effects of replenishing the spleen and stomach, nourishing Qi, generating body fluids, nourishing blood, and calming the mind. If the spleen and stomach are weak and the qi and blood are insufficient, people with insomnia can take more red dates.
The function of longan meat: It is sweet in taste and has a warm nature. It belongs to the heart and spleen meridians. It is suitable for people with both heart and spleen deficiency.
Longan meat can also moisturize the skin and beauty, nourish the blood and calm the mind, and nourish the heart and spleen. It is suitable for people with anemia and insomnia.
The function of the lotus seed: sweet and astringent, neutral, returning to the heart, spleen, and kidney meridians.
Nourish the heart and calm the mind, palpitation and insomnia, stomach deficiency, memory loss, heart palpitations and thirst, nourishment and replenishment of deficiency, and stop urinary incontinence.
Therefore, this nourishing beauty soup is not only a dessert, but also a health food!
Eat more, and you will feel better!
And it's not as expensive as bird's nest, so you can eat more without making a hole in your pocket!
This food has been sitting out and may have gone bad
Order #NUMBER#, which was originally expected to be delivered at 18:40, has now been changed to 19:15!
Dinner time is limited, please deal with it as soon as possible!
I haven't received it
Only five minutes after placing the order, how could it have been completed?
Where can I see the actual discount code details?
Educational Commentary: What does it take to save kidnapped children?
If it is compared with the well-known public service advertisement "there is no killing without buying and selling", in a good environment without the demand for "buying and selling", group prevention and control, and all-people anti-kidnapping will make the buying and selling of children unprofitable, risky, and high-cost, and this kind of crime will not happen again and again.
Recently, the child missing information emergency release platform developed by the Criminal Investigation Department of the Ministry of Public Security went online.
This is an Internet information platform established for the establishment of an authoritative channel for the release of information on missing children and the timely recovery of abducted children.
When I heard that the app was called “Reunion”, I felt very warm.
The new technological means are not only named "literature and art" and full of feelings, but also information-based, practical and effective.
The primary goal of the anti-begging law enforcement is to find the kidnapped children and protect their personal safety and freedom.
Then comes the trial and punishment of the suspect.
The meaning of criminal punishment can be listed in many "big words" from individual punishment, social prevention to legal education.
However, before the trafficking case is solved, the safety of the victim should be given priority.
Things are divided into light and heavy, urgent and non-urgent. Under the urgent "rescue" purpose, controversial topics such as "whether child trafficking should be sentenced to death" can be put aside for the time being and discussed carefully; but the rescue of abducted children cannot wait.
According to the investigation experience of such cases, human traffickers are accustomed to leave the scene of the crime as soon as possible after getting their hands on the victims.
The longer it takes to search for a missing child, the more likely the child is to be one step further away from their parents, and the more difficult it is to solve the case.
In this case, taking effective measures such as the "Reunion" platform, which is directly helpful in solving cases and finding children, is indeed a pragmatic action.
After all, "beating the cane" is a big task that requires the operation of the entire legal system.
Striking a blow against crime, ensuring the rights of children and parents, from the improvement of legislation to the protection of justice, as well as the meticulous enforcement, all need to implement the care of “protecting the young and the weak”.
In addition, the prevention of child trafficking can be better from family to society.
For example, in a common case, a family of three rested at the railway station. The parents fell asleep. When they woke up, they found that the child was missing.
You can't expect a two-year-old to have enough self-protection skills, but as a parent of a young child, you should at least have enough protective awareness.
The most basic way to prevent children from being abducted is to take turns to rest or put the children in a safe place.
From the other side of the police's crackdown on trafficking crimes, the buyer of the abducted children should also be paid attention to and punished.
A single illegal act is often just one link in a long chain.
According to the provisions of the Criminal Law of our country, the minimum sentence for the crime of child trafficking is 5 years; if the circumstances are particularly serious, it may be sentenced to death and confiscation of property.
The starting point of punishment is high and the maximum punishment is severe. Under the general trend of "light punishment", the crime of trafficking children is obviously a crime with heavier punishment.
There are still many cases of trafficking every year.
It can be seen that some people have backward ideas in raising children and have weak legal awareness.
Legal education for this group of people should be followed up simultaneously.
Effective control of trafficking crimes cannot only rely on strict law enforcement by the government.
If the "kidnapping market" is widespread, the kidnappers will be greedy and constantly innovate kidnapping methods to form a "struggle" situation with law enforcement, and the anti-kidnapping action will inevitably fall into the low-efficiency quagmire.
Therefore, it is necessary to break the backward ideas and popularize legal knowledge in order to eradicate the crimes of buying and selling children.
Yang Haodong expounded on the spirit of the 6th Plenary Session of the 19th CPC Central Committee and the provincial party congress at Malanshan.
draw inspiration from the Party’s 100-year struggle
According to the unified arrangement of the Provincial Party Committee, on the morning of December 10, Yang Haodong, a member of the Standing Committee of the Provincial Party Committee and Minister of the Propaganda Department of the Provincial Party Committee, gave an interactive lecture at the video and creative park of Malanshan. He deeply studied and implemented the spirit of the Sixth Plenary Session of the 19th CPC National Congress, studied and implemented the spirit of General Secretary Xi Jinping’s important speeches and important instructions on Hunan, and studied and implemented the spirit of the 12th Provincial Party Congress.
Yang Haodong, from the three aspects of ideals and beliefs and original mission, self-revolution and youth party, and party leaders and party theory, combined with his own feelings and personal experience, expounded the core meaning and practical requirements of the spirit of the whole meeting in a simple and systematic way.
He pointed out that we should combine the spirit of the National Congress, the important instructions of General Secretary Xi Jinping on Hunan, and the spirit of the Provincial Party Congress to learn, integrate and apply, enhance the ideological, political and action awareness of defending the “Two Establishments” and maintaining the “Two Safeguards”, and move forward along the direction pointed out by General Secretary Xi Jinping.
In the interactive communication session, the grassroots cadre representatives, enterprise representatives, and young representatives asked questions about the relationship between the three historical resolutions, how to understand the decisive significance of the “two establishments”, how cultural enterprises should grasp the direction, and how young people in the new era can draw power from the 100-year history of the Party. Yang Haodong answered each question with simple language and vivid examples. He sincerely advised young party members to draw strength from the 100-year history of the Party’s struggle, unite closely around the CPC Central Committee, follow the Party unswervingly, and write responsibility and responsibility with their youth.
It is estimated that 268,000 college graduates will graduate in Beijing in 2022 - Xinhuanet
Xinhua News Agency, Beijing, December 11 (Reporter Yang Na) The reporter learned from the video conference on the employment and entrepreneurship of 2022 Beijing university graduates held jointly by the Beijing Municipal Education Commission and the Beijing Municipal Human Resources and Social Security Bureau recently that the number of Beijing university graduates in 2022 is expected to reach 268,000, an increase of 16,000 from last year.
A relevant official of the Beijing Municipal Human Resources and Social Security Bureau said that they will deploy the employment work of Beijing university graduates from the aspects of strengthening supply and demand matching, strengthening policy support, broadening employment channels, ensuring assistance for difficulties, supporting innovation and entrepreneurship, and improving service efficiency.
It was learned that the Beijing Municipal Human Resources and Social Security Bureau will build a practice platform, increase the supply of posts, actively contact the 40 university graduates’ workplace experience bases, visit employers, integrate demand information and post information; focus on the “six batches”, that is, expand the recruitment of public institutions by one batch, expand the recruitment of state-owned enterprises by one batch, expand the recruitment of grassroots projects by one batch, expand the enlistment by one batch, expand the employment internship and retention by one batch, and expand the employment driven by entrepreneurship by one batch; implement “one measure for a lifetime” dynamic management, recommend no less than 5 post information to each graduate, ensure that 100% of the graduates from poor families with employment intentions are assisted, and so on.
In fact, I don't know if it was the store's mistake or the rider's mistake.
There was no receipt on the bag
It can't be traced
I hope you understand
Because the delivery time was 30 minutes earlier than shown
No, thank you
Yes, it's changed jockeys
He's waited a long time
The restaurant has been saying it's in the process of dealing with it
waited for a few hours
The International Olive Oil Council classifies olive oil into two classes and five levels: virgin olive oil (Virgin Olive Oil) and refined olive oil (Lampante Olive Oil or Refined Olive Oil).
Extra virgin olive oil, also known as natural olive oil, is an oil obtained by mechanical cold pressing and filtering of fresh olives to remove impurities.
According to the acidity, it can be divided into three levels:
Extra virgin olive oil (EVOO): This is the highest grade, highest quality olive oil, a pure natural product.
Its taste is exquisite, with a light and pleasant plant fragrance, and an acidity of less than 1%.
Fine Virgin Olive Oil (Fine Virgin): The acidity is slightly higher, but not more than 2%, the taste is pure and fragrant.
Ordinary Virgin Olive Oil (Ordinary Virgin): The taste and flavor are acceptable, and the acidity does not exceed 3.3%.
Refined olive oil is the olive oil obtained after refining the virgin olive oil with an acidity of more than 3.3%, or it becomes "secondary oil".
There are two grades of refined olive oil:
Ordinary olive oil (Olive Oil): Refined olive oil is mixed with a certain proportion of extra virgin olive oil to adjust the flavor and color. Its acidity is less than 1.5% and it is transparent pale yellow.
Refined Olive-Pomace Oil or Olive Pomace Oil (RPO): It is obtained by solvent extraction from pomace and then refined.
Having looked at the classification, you should have noticed that the acidity of olive oil is a very important indicator.
After all, just like grapes used to make wine, olives from different regions and different varieties of olives will produce different standards of olive oil.
The best places to grow olive trees:
The Mediterranean coast has the most suitable climate conditions for the growth of olive trees, including soil and temperature, sunshine, air humidity, and rainfall.
Apart from the Mediterranean coast, other areas can only be planted in a scattered way in suitable areas.
Major production areas (Mediterranean):
Italy, Spain, Greece, Turkey, Portugal, Morocco, Syria, Israel, Tunisia, Algeria, Egypt, Pakistan, Lebanon, and Argentina, Peru, and South Africa, which are far to the south, have similar climates.
Harvesting month of oil olives:
From March to June each year, the olive trees bloom and bear fruit. From July to October, the fruits begin to develop and mature, changing from green to red, purple, and finally black.
November through February is the time to pick the fruit (the freshness of the olive oil is very important).
The nutritional components of olive oil:
Olive oil is rich in healthy monounsaturated fatty acids, including oleic acid and linoleic acid, as well as vitamins A, B, D, E, K and antioxidants.
Olive oil is considered to be the healthiest oil for humans of all the oils found to date.
Democracy summit ends with Biden saying the flame of freedom will never be extinguished
The online “Democracy Summit” (Summit for Democracy) convened by U.S. President Biden and attended by government leaders from 110 countries around the world as well as civil society and private sector leaders ended on Friday (December 10th).
Biden said in his closing remarks that the flame of freedom burns in everyone's heart in the world, and the authoritarian government can never extinguish it.
He also said that the second Global "Democracy Summit" will be held next year.
The Taiwanese government representative, Tang Feng, and the Hong Kong democracy and human rights activist, Law Ka-chung, who is currently in exile in the UK also spoke at the summit on the second day.
Biden said, "We know how hard the work ahead of us will be.
But we also know we can meet the challenge, as I've said before, as this summit has demonstrated, democracy is everywhere.
Dictatorships can never extinguish the tiny spark of freedom that burns in the hearts of people all over the world. "
Biden also said that defending democracy requires the joint efforts of the whole society.
He said: "As leaders of the government, we have a responsibility to listen to our citizens, strengthen the fence of democracy, promote reform, achieve transparent governance, and resist the buffer and impact of authoritarianism, as well as those who are nakedly pursuing power before the public interest. "
The themes of the second day of the "Democracy Summit" were to defend human rights, consolidate democracy and counter authoritarianism, and counter digital authoritarianism and affirm the value of democracy.
This day coincides with the "International Human Rights Day".
UN Secretary-General Guterres also said in his opening speech on the same day that democracy is facing challenges globally, especially the challenges brought by emerging digital technologies.
He said: "Now is the time to reaffirm our common values and positions, as well as the resilience of democracy.
This requires deepening social dialogue, addressing inequalities, tackling corruption, renewing the social contract, investing in quality education, and expanding opportunities for women and girls.
This also requires a resolute condemnation of all forms of populism, nationalism and extremism, including the use of all the tools provided by the technological revolution. "
Hong Kong democracy and human rights activist Law Ka-chung gave a speech at the summit through a pre-recorded video, reminding the participants to continue to pay attention to the human rights situation in Hong Kong and ethnic minorities such as the Uyghurs and Tibetans in China.
He said, "For a long time, the world has been directly affected by China's rise, but no mechanism has been established to hold it accountable.
That is why politicians and civil society leaders must work together.
We must use all that we have (resources) to ensure that the revival of democracy is our top priority. "
Law Kwong-chung also called on the free world to unite against the threat of the Chinese Communist Party.
He said, "Maybe some of you are afraid of angering President Xi Jinping, maybe some of you don't want to lose the Chinese market, and maybe some of you haven't recognized (the CCP's) threat to our democratic values.
And that is why we failed.
This is why we have to change. "
Tang Feng, Deputy Minister of the Executive Yuan in Taiwan, published the "National Declaration" through video at the roundtable discussion on "Combating Digital Dictatorship and Affirming the Value of Democracy", emphasizing that Taiwan is on the front line of fighting against despotism and authoritarianism.
He also shared his experience in fighting the COVID-19 epidemic through information transparency and building mutual trust.
He said: "At a time when Taiwan's democracy is on the rise, we have always stood firmly at the forefront of the global fight against authoritarianism, and played a leading role in promoting global freedom, democracy and human rights.
During the pandemic, authoritarian governments around the world have rationalized the violation of human rights in the name of public health and collective interests, and global democracy has shown signs of regression.
However, in Taiwan, we do not have to close the city to control the epidemic, and we do not have to take down the information to defeat the fake information. "
On the second day of the Democracy Summit, the U.S. Department of the Treasury announced that it would legally impose sanctions on 15 individuals and 10 entities in China, North Korea and other countries that were determined to seriously violate human rights, and at the same time impose investment restrictions on a Chinese company that was determined to use surveillance technology to assist in human rights violations.
I've already taken pictures and uploaded them to you
I know.
But the restaurant doesn't know why the delivery times keep getting pushed back
It was originally #NUMBER#.
I won't call him anyway
I'm not eating it.
I'm definitely going to complain
You can't send it, why don't you say it earlier?
Waiting for you for so long
No, I haven't received a call
Please tell him to deliver it to our company again
I don't want to wait another #NUMBER# minutes
One meal took an hour and a half
#PRS_ORG# has not yet been sent
I want to cancel my order
Why not cancel it
Hi, the chicken sent by the restaurant is raw
I want to try tennis, but I'm afraid that I won't be able to persist, so I want to try a similar price first.
They are not friendly, in fact, the price is often directly proportional to the degree of friendliness. If you cannot distinguish them, the more expensive ones will be more friendly than the cheaper ones. This kind of "entry-level camera" is actually industrial garbage.
They are very weak, the ball hits the racket, the vibration is very large, and the hard ball can't stand it. It's very difficult for experts to master.
The logic and subtext of their existence is that tennis is so difficult that you won't be able to learn it, and you won't be willing to buy an expensive one, so we'll give you a cheap one to fool you. You'll play it a couple of times, and then you won't play it again, so the racket is cheap, and you won't feel sorry about it.
When you can really distinguish between good and bad, it means that you have made progress, and then come to my place to buy the expensive ones. I will earn twice the money.
It is recommended to buy a second-hand racket of better quality at a similar price. Choose Prince or Dunlop. These two brands are not popular enough, so good rackets cannot be sold at a high price. A new racket of 500 or 600 is very good. A second-hand racket of 200 yuan is not as good as a thousand-yuan racket?
It is friendly to beginners, but it becomes useless after the beginner stage. However, most people, especially girls, cannot pass the beginner stage.
The orders have been repeatedly delayed for delivery.
Can you help me follow up?
Postponed
Thank you
That is to say, I already have credit?
Do I need to place another order now? Do I need to ignore the previous order?
Hello, I ordered food from this restaurant, but there was a lot missing from the delivery, and the sweet and sour chicken was raw
#PRS_ORG# I didn't do anything wrong, please cancel it
My order was for delivery, there is no such thing as collection
Jiangxi will train 10,000 rural primary school music, art, and physical education teachers within three years - Xinhuanet
Xinhua News Agency, Nanchang, May 22 (reporter Chen Yushan) The reporter recently learned from the Jiangxi Provincial Education Department that in order to enhance the ability to ensure the supply of teachers in the shortage disciplines and realize the balanced development of rural compulsory education, Jiangxi Province planned to train 10,000 qualified music, art, and physical education teachers for each rural (township and below) primary school in three years since 2016.
It is understood that this training is aimed at rural primary school teachers under the age of 45 in Jiangxi Province, who have music, art, and physical education knowledge or talents, and can serve as other subject teachers for music, art, and physical education courses.
Through the training, they will master the basic knowledge and teaching skills of the subject of sound, body and aesthetics, update their teaching ideas and concepts, master modern teaching methods, improve their subject teaching ability, activity design ability, campus culture ability and self-development ability, and build a team of multi-skilled sound, body and aesthetic teachers to alleviate the problem of lack of sound, body and aesthetic teachers in rural areas.
In order to ensure the quality and effectiveness of the training, Jiangxi also plans to train 1 person in music, art and physical education for each of the 100 counties (cities, districts) in the province, a total of 300 trainees, to comprehensively improve their teaching demonstration leading ability, design and organization ability of teaching and research activities, training ability, and ability to build online training workshops, so as to play the role of teaching, demonstration, guidance and supervision.
Because waiting another 20 minutes would make it 1 hour #NUMBER# minutes
I don't want food that was made an hour ago
I found the buyer of the previous wrong order
But my wheelbarrows are gone
Here are the editors' picks for the best cleansing creams.
How good is a cleansing milk?
1. Han Shu Skin Care Cosmetics Set Moisturizing and Brightening Gift Set (Cleansing Milk, Toner, Day Cream, Brightening Essence, Eye Cream)
Reason for recommendation: It has the effects of lifting and firming, peptide repair, shaping tight skin, saying goodbye to loose skin, improving crow's feet and fine lines around the eyes, and the excellent moisturizing effect, which can quickly penetrate the skin.
The shelf life (year) is 5, the product packaging has anti-counterfeiting, the effect is whitening, the net content (mL/g) is set, the product packaging has a gift box, it is suitable for mixed skin, the effect is freckle removal, the effect is hydrating, the effect is moisturizing, the product packaging has an outer box, the effect is lifting and tightening, the product packaging has a seal, the product place of origin is Suzhou, Jiangsu, whether it is a special-purpose cosmetics is no, the effect is other, currently there are more than 14,000 people who have evaluated it, and it has obtained a 99% praise rate, and the evaluation is that it is very easy to use, the packaging is good, and it is high-end and atmospheric.
2, Han Shu skin care cosmetics set of hyaluronic acid mild cleaning moisturizing and moisturizing giant water light moisturizing luxury gift box of six pieces (facial cleanser, toner, lotion, essence cream)
Reason for recommendation: It has the functions of repairing, moisturizing, whitening and tightening skin. It can improve the problem of rough skin and large pores. It is very suitable for combination skin. It is clean and not dry.
This product has a shelf life (year) of 5, whether it is a special-purpose cosmetic or not, the product packaging has anti-counterfeiting, suitable for mixed skin, the effect is moisturizing, suitable for skin age 25-34, net content (mL/g) 120ml+120ml+100ml+6g*3, the effect is moisturizing, the product packaging has an outer box, the product packaging has a seal, the product place of origin is Suzhou, Jiangsu, and there are more than 7700 people who have evaluated it, and it has received a 99% approval rate. The evaluation is that it is refreshing and comfortable, has a good moisturizing effect, and is high-end and atmospheric.
3, OSM cosmetics set, nutritious skin care, crystal color, no-imperfection, moisturizing and moisturizing cleansing milk, skin care gift box for women (facial cleanser + toner + eye cream + lotion + facial cream)
Reason for recommendation: Deeply cleans the skin, helps to wash away dust and oil on the skin, fine pores, and can fully nourish the skin, effectively moisturize and remove dark spots, which can improve skin dullness and dark spots. If you use it continuously, it can help to improve the skin's self-repairing ability and help the skin recover its firmness.
This product has a shelf life of 4 years (years), is produced in Huzhou, Zhejiang, is not a special-purpose cosmetic, has the effect of soothing and calming, has the effect of whitening, has a net content of (mL/g) sets, has the effect of replenishing water, is suitable for any skin type, has the effect of moisturizing, has a product packaging with an outer box, has the effect of refining pores, has the effect of deep cleansing, and currently has more than 220,000 people who have evaluated it, and received a 98% approval rate. They evaluated that it feels comfortable to use, is relatively high-end, and is packaged well.
4. Hanhoo red pomegranate fresh care six-piece set (skincare cosmetics set moisturizing and moisturizing student girl cleanser toner cream eye cream gift box formal wear)
Reason for recommendation: Deeply cleans the dirt in the pores, softens the old keratin, tightens the skin, lightens the facial fine lines, softens and plumps the face, improves the skin quality while moisturizing, prevents the occurrence of small wrinkles, and is suitable for any skin type, mild and non-greasy.
Hello, how long will it take to deliver the ordered meals?
Others have already finished work
Your driver's phone number is #PHONENUMBER# and his name is #NAME#
Please give a reasonable explanation
Sure, but your rider is a problem. Please deal with it.
Can you check if it's still on its way? If so, it would be best to deliver it
OK, if it's not available, just give me my money back for the reservation
In fact, there are many requirements for dressing and matching for slightly fat girls.
The skirt worn by the fat girl should not be too short or too long, and the length is about the knees, just enough to cover the fat part of the thighs.
If the skirt is too short, it will expose the fat on your legs.
If it's too long, it will make you look short and fat.
If you wear a top, skirt and long socks in different colours, it will make you look taller.
In fact, many dark-colored clothes are the standard of slightly fat girls (the author has a deep understanding of this), and dark colors are also a good way to cover your fat body. The noble and elegant black short skirt is also the first choice of slightly fat girls.
Wearing dark-coloured clothes, especially black mini skirts, will make you look slimmer.
If your calves are thick, don't draw attention to your socks and shoes.
The more mass-produced, the better, and the colors should not be too bright.
To avoid people noticing your legs and feet and making you feel fat.
For slightly chubby girls, you must know the tricks of dressing.
Micro-fat girls should not wear tight short skirts. In addition, the top should not be too short or stuffed into the skirt, which will make people feel very uncomfortable. If the legs are thick, you should wear black over-the-knee stockings or net stockings (the kind with fine grids), choose a soft-textured printed trumpet skirt, and match it with a collarless top, which can effectively cover the shortcomings of fat girls.
Of course, there are also things to pay attention to when micro-fat girls wear short skirts.
If you are a fat girl wearing a short skirt, you should choose a top with the same color as the short skirt, which will make you look taller.
A short skirt matched with high heels can make your legs look more slender. This is the most popular combination in summer!
If you are a MM with a fat upper body but thin legs, it is recommended to choose a gorgeous one-piece short skirt.
Not only can it cover your big belly, but it can also show your advantages.
An A-line mini skirt will make you look slimmer, which is more suitable for fat girls. The top should be tighter to create a sense of hierarchy, which will make you look slimmer.
A simple white T-shirt and a short skirt can also be worn by fat girls.
Even slightly chubby girls can wear fashionable clothes.
As long as they master the rules of dressing and matching, the slightly fat girls will also be the focus of everyone's attention.
After changing the way of dressing, it is also necessary to exercise more in daily life, so as to get rid of the label of micro-fat girl as soon as possible😄
The 18th "World Beverage Innovation Awards" is jointly held by FoodBev Media and the Nuremberg International Beer, Brewing and Beverage Industry Exhibition (Brau Beviale) in Germany.
It attracted 279 works from 25 countries and 22 different categories.
On October 15, the list of finalists was announced, and the final winners will be announced online on November 11 (British Summer Time).
We saw that Yuanqi Forest’s LP28 sugar-free yogurt was shortlisted for the Best Dairy Beverage Award, Yili’s “GOGO Wuhan” marketing was shortlisted for the Best Marketing Campaign, and the packaging of Pepsi and People’s Daily New Media was also shortlisted for the Best Packaging Design/Label Award.
"We are delighted to celebrate the 18th year of the World Beverage Innovation Awards with Brau Beviale," says Laura Nettle, Senior Marketing Director at FoodBev Media.
From new flavours, new concepts and new functionality to brands, packaging and manufacturing, we are seeing trends in the drinks industry as it continues to innovate in a more sustainable way.
The World Beverage Innovation Awards recognized the most ambitious new products and new developments in the global beverage industry this year.
Here is the full list of finalists for each category.
The technology developed by Ardagh Group can re-melt 100% of recycled glass into new bottles.
The bottled water comes in a box that is 100 per cent recyclable, reducing packaging by 66 per cent and carbon emissions by 97 per cent.
LatCub is 100 per cent biodegradable, uses less paper and doesn't use any glue or tape that can be harmful to the environment.
The technology developed by Ardagh Group can melt 100% of recycled glass to make new bottles.
The final list of winners will be announced on FoodBev Media's YouTube channel on 11 November (British Summer Time), and FBIF will continue to report on it for you. Stay tuned!
Why so long?
I'm starving
From the expected time of 7:30 to now
If you don't get it, don't pick it up
I can go out and buy my own food, I don't need to be here #PRS_ORG#
Xinhua Full Media + | The Beijing Youth Ice Hockey League helped ignite the Winter Olympics enthusiasm - Xinhuanet
On December 11, Beijing Dream Team player Pang Yongtian (center) took a shot during the game.
On that day, the Beijing Youth Ice Hockey Club League in the 2021-2022 season continued to compete in various ice rinks in Beijing.
This year’s league is divided into the regular season and the post-season. The age range of the participating athletes is from U6 to U18, and the categories are divided into the competitive group and the selection group. A total of nearly 3,600 players from 256 representative teams in the city participated.
After more than ten years of development, the Beijing Youth Ice Hockey Club League has become a platform for Beijing youth ice hockey enthusiasts to learn skills and make friends, and to provide excellent players for the Beijing Youth Ice Hockey Team and Youth Team.
The league's performance will promote the development of Beijing's youth ice hockey, ignite the enthusiasm for ice hockey in the Winter Olympics, and lay a foundation for the development of ice hockey in Beijing after the Winter Olympics.
Girl donates her body as a target to raise money for her sister: "It's just a flesh wound" - Xinhua News Agency
A girl stood in front of a large wooden board at Wulin Square in Hangzhou. The words "human target, 10 yuan per shot" were written on the wooden board.
Yesterday morning, a photo of a “Hangzhou girl willing to be a ‘target’ to raise funds for her sister” went viral in the circle of friends.
In the photo, a girl stands in front of a large wooden board that is slightly higher than her head at Wulin Square, Hangzhou. The words "human target, ten yuan per arrow" are written on the wooden board, indicating that passers-by can pay to use a bow and arrow to shoot.
This behavior aroused heated discussion among netizens.
Last night, the publicity representative of the Xiacheng Branch of the Hangzhou Public Security Bureau confirmed to the reporter of The Beijing News that the police confirmed that the girl made such an extreme move because of her sister's fundraising, but such behavior is not worth advocating. After being warned, the girl left the local police station yesterday.
Girl's 'bullseye' street fundraising warned
In the pictures circulating on the Internet, a long-haired girl stands in front of a large wooden board, with the words "Human target, 10 yuan per arrow" written in black ink on the wooden board, and her bank account and WeChat and Alipay accounts written on another wooden board in front of her.
The image has caused controversy since it was posted online.
Some netizens believed that this was "begging for attention", and many netizens expressed their sympathy.
"We found the situation at about 10 a.m. on the 23rd when we patrolled to the side of the square. At that time, there were already many onlookers. "
The policeman of Tianshui Police Station near the scene told the local media that there were two girls selling things. They were about 20 years old and dressed in a youthful and beautiful way.
Among them, the girl who was used as a "human target" kept crying, and asked passers-by to play this game; another girl was shouting on the side and said that her friend's sister was suffering from leukemia and urgently needed surgery, and asked everyone to help.
"We contacted the local police in Guizhou and learned that the girl was raising funds for her sister's leukemia treatment. "
Last night, the propaganda officer of the Xiacheng Branch of the Hangzhou Municipal Public Security Bureau told a Beijing News reporter that the girl’s name was Jijiali, and she was collecting donations for her sister Jijian.
However, due to the fact that the treatment still costs more than 300,000 yuan, he could not think of a good way to raise funds, so he did such a thing.
He said that during the whole process, one of the two girls was used as a target, and one was responsible for assisting, but did not participate, and no one was found to shoot arrows during the whole process, but some people were watching and took pictures and posted them on Weibo.
Later, the police, after identification by the public security department, determined that the bow and arrows used were not subject to control.
The official said, "We do not encourage this kind of attention-grabbing fundraising."
After being warned by the police station, she had left the police station.
Heat dissipation effect: good Thin and light degree: convenient Appearance material: satisfied Acer has always been very cost-effective.
The new machine is very good.
Its performance is stable, and there is no problem with the heat dissipation from the four outlets. It is worth recommending.
This Acer Predator Helios 300 gaming laptop is pretty good. The workmanship and materials are good, and it is a trustworthy brand!
The price of the Acer Predator Helios 300 is not expensive.
In my opinion, the ASUS ROG Strix is really good. Game effect: The game effect is comfortable, and it can play most of the games. My PUBG has a high frame rate and is very smooth. LOL is not a problem, and CS:GO is also easy to handle. Most of the 3A games can be played.
Heat dissipation effect: the heat dissipation effect is good, and the fan is powerful. It is quite quiet when working, and the fan is not small when the game effect is turned on.
Appearance material: The appearance is very cool, and the game laptop is cool. Display effect: The screen is very clear, and 1080 is enough to play games.
It is really good to buy a laptop. It is mainly used for design. The price-performance ratio is very high. It is lighter than I imagined, and it is also better-looking than I imagined. The red on the butt is a very good-looking wine color. It is not so vulgar. The overall is much higher than my expectations. It is worth buying, and it is also very suitable for girls.
Two years ago, I started to come into contact with Macro Knight Dark Knight. After two years, the price-performance ratio is relatively high, and the quality is excellent!
My friends around me also recommended them to buy this product!
I have already bought three machines in this series!
The appearance is beautiful, and the configuration is also good.
I bought it for my nephew. I originally wanted to wait for the 418 bank activity, but he needed it urgently, so I bought it in advance, so I missed the bank’s big activity, which is a bit regretful.
However, the price-performance ratio is quite high, and the logistics is also quite fast. I will come back to comment after using it for a period of time.
This is a brand new, high-value-for-money game laptop. The design style is very good, and it has already installed Windows 11 and Office 2019.
The display effect: I bought it for my child to do 3D rendering. The software has been installed, and my child said that it can be used without any problem. This computer can be used for 3D design work.
He said the one he bought for his son was good.
The computer is good, especially the attitude of the customer service is very good. If you don't understand, just ask. It is recommended to buy it.
Not bad, the graphics of the game are really fragrant
What's the hottest thing in 2021?
Without a doubt, it's the Tokyo Olympic Games.
Do you think only Olympic athletes can win awards?
A few days ago, an article titled “Look! Project managers can compete for the gold medal in the Olympics” was very popular. It mentioned that in many projects, project managers can definitely take the lead, and no one can match them: moving bricks, going on business trips, and staying up late are the daily routines of project managers. Putting out fires, taking the blame, and apologizing are not a problem.
The article, which seems to be a joke, actually reveals the daily bitterness of project managers, which represents the inability to cope with the current project management work.
People who work in project management are gradually choosing to take some actions to get out of the dilemma in their work.
From the number of applicants for PMP (international certification for project management professionals) every year, it can be seen that more and more project management practitioners are improving their project management capabilities through learning.
According to the 20-Year Development Report of Project Management in China (1999-2019), as of September 2019, the total number of PMP® applicants in the country was nearly 600,000, the number of people who passed the PMP® certification was about 420,000, and the number of effective holders was about 300,000, accounting for 31.2% of the total number of PMP® holders in the world.
Over the past 10 years, the number of PMP certificate holders has increased year by year, indicating that more and more project managers have realized that it is no longer feasible to rely on the "old experience" to do things, and the ever-changing work environment makes us know that one must learn to stand on the shoulders of scientific giants to explore the way forward.
However, does passing the PMP guarantee a smooth sailing in project management?
Many project management beginners said that they could systematically master the ten areas of project management and the five process groups and other related knowledge points through learning PMP/IPMP and other related courses, but they were still confused when they actually conducted project management work.
Many project managers often feedback the following problems: lack of project management awareness, rely solely on personal experience, have project management theory, but do not know how to put it into practice; lack of systematic project management process system support, unable to implement in work, project estimation is inaccurate, control sensitivity is poor, and the project is dragged on and on; the division of labor is unclear, and the "old hands" in the team do not know how to deal with it; cross-departmental assistance communication is not smooth, and the project is difficult to advance...
Therefore, focusing on product innovation and R&D management for more than ten years, Zhongtian Huaxia Consulting has helped many excellent enterprises to cultivate a large number of product managers, project managers and other R&D key personnel, and won the honorary title of "China Enterprise R&D Management Talent Training Demonstration Base". Zhongtian Huaxia Consulting brings the online course of "Training Camp for R&D Project Managers".
The online course of "Research and Development Project Manager Training Camp" is a kind of online fragmented learning. It combines the practical cases, tools and methods of many R&D enterprises to help you master the necessary knowledge and standard actions of project managers, and walk on the path of advanced project management.
This is also an opportunity for enterprises to promote the training process of project managers with lower costs and less investment, and to achieve high-efficiency operation results for enterprises.
Talk is cheap. You can first take a look at how other students evaluate this course: This course is not only taught by the Zhongtian Huaxia expert team (the original Huawei R&D management team), but also combines international advanced project management methods and many well-known enterprises' real business scenarios to conduct in-depth and easy-to-understand professional explanation of the course content.
It will also provide scientific and practical management tools and methods, rich template forms, and help learners to convert what they have learned into specific work after class.
Only one order of dim sum?
Why are there six chopsticks?
Jinshi advocates rational consumption to consumers before “Double 12” - Economic Observer - a professional financial news website
This year's "Double 11" carnival, the national network payment business transaction amount reached 17700 billion yuan, which is a new high compared with previous years.
The diversified full-discount red envelopes and the eye-catching live streaming shopping once again made consumers call out the benefits. On the one hand, this wave of consumption fever makes people feel that the national consumption power is getting stronger and stronger, and on the other hand, it is necessary to calm down and think about the impact of consumerism on society and the contemporary mainstream consumer group.
On the eve of the “Double 12”, Jiexin Consumer Finance Co., Ltd. (hereinafter referred to as “Jiexin”) issued a call for rational consumption, reminding the general public, especially young people, to establish a good consumption awareness and consumption habits, and refuse blind consumption and over-consumption.
According to the "Consumer Financial Literacy Investigation and Analysis Report" released by the People's Bank of China this year, the national consumer financial literacy index was 66.81, an increase of 2.04 compared with 2019.
Overall, the performance of residents in financial consumption is good in China, but there are large differences in financial behavior and skills, and it is necessary to further improve the level of basic financial knowledge.
The financial literacy level of the elderly and the young is relatively low, and "one old and one young" will still be the focus of financial education. The "China Young People's Debt Situation Report" released by Nielsen and the "2019-2020 China Youth Consumption Report" released by CCTV Finance show that young people have great consumption potential, and credit consumption has become an important way for consumption upgrading. 86.6% of young people are using credit products, and nearly half of them do not have debt accumulation. Although the young generation as a whole shows a rational consumption trend, it is far from the label of "excessive waste" attached to it by the outside world. Some young people do indeed have excessive consumption and follow-up consumption behavior, and have thus caused excessive financial pressure and debt risks, and even led to the gradual increase of social problems. Financial enterprises should have the courage to assume social responsibility and conduct positive guidance.
As a licensed consumer finance institution, Jietong has always been committed to helping people build their own happy life with high-quality and caring services, advocating consumers to establish a good and correct consumption concept, and actively responding to regulatory calls to improve the rational consumption awareness of consumers, especially the young group.
Over the past few years, Jietong has carried out all-round and diverse financial knowledge popularization activities for the youth group, including university students, and through cooperation with top domestic universities, launched innovation practice competitions and other forms to subtly guide the consumption needs of the young group, help them establish a rational consumption concept, reasonably plan their consumption needs, and then help them accumulate life wealth.
As the Double 12 is approaching, ZTE reminds all consumer friends to establish a reasonable consumption awareness and correct money view, resist blind consumption and over-consumption, and avoid the consumption loan error, so as not to affect personal credit and future economic life.
Consumption must be planned in advance, and repayment must be made on time according to one's ability.
If it is overdue, the overdue record will be recorded in the personal credit report, which may have an adverse impact on economic life such as buying a car and buying a house in the future.
At the same time, when enjoying financial products and services, you should choose regular institutions and channels, and check whether the relevant institutions have the qualifications to operate.
In the future, Jietong will continue to rely on its mature and reliable consumer finance system and continuously updated and iterated financial products to provide consumers with services more in line with their needs and diversified services, and continue to help the public improve their financial knowledge level, help consumers develop the concept of rational consumption and moderate borrowing, and become a trustworthy consumer finance partner for consumers.
I wouldn't go
I was following the delivery order
I've never been contacted in an hour, this is a complete online fraud
Do you think this is the first time I ordered takeout?
You are saying the same thing after the investigation! I checked the address many times before placing the order.
Okay, thank you! How many days?
Vietnam People's Daily Online - Gulf Cooperation Council Addresses Common Challenges
Saudi Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman's stopovers include Oman, the United Arab Emirates (UAE), Qatar, Bahrain and Kuwait.
Notably, this is the first visit by the crown prince to Qatar since Saudi Arabia and its Arab allies imposed a blockade on Qatar in mid-2017, triggering the Gulf diplomatic crisis.
During this crisis, Saudi Arabia, the United Arab Emirates, Bahrain, and Egypt have severed diplomatic ties with Qatar and imposed a full embargo on it, accusing Qatar of supporting terrorist organizations while having close relations with Iran.
Diplomatic tension has seriously affected the internal unity of the Gulf Cooperation Council, and has had a negative impact on the economy of countries in the region.
Four Arab countries have blocked the land, sea and air routes to Qatar.
The crisis was only resolved in January 2021 at the Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC) summit, when the Gulf states signed an agreement towards "unity and stability" mediated by the United States and Kuwait.
Saudi Arabia has reopened its border with Qatar.
Saudi Arabia and Egypt are leading efforts to restore relations with Qatar by appointing new ambassadors to the country.
The Gulf Arab states have resolved their differences to restore relations with Qatar for the sake of the interests of all countries and regional stability, in order to face common challenges.
During the visit of the Saudi Crown Prince to Oman, the two sides agreed to open the first direct land channel between the two Gulf neighbors.
The 725-kilometer-long channel connecting the two countries will provide convenient conditions for the travel of the citizens of the two countries and the integration of the supply chain.
Saudi Arabia's Public Investment Fund (PIF) will invest $5 billion in Oman, and 13 memoranda of understanding worth $30 billion have been signed by enterprises of the two countries.
Saudi Arabia's crown prince visit to the Gulf nations comes as Iran and world powers are negotiating to save the Iran nuclear deal, known as the Joint Comprehensive Plan of Action (JCPOA), which the Gulf Arab states have condemned as failing to address Iran's missile program.
The Gulf states have always regarded Iran as a long-term "competitor" and regarded Iran's nuclear program as a "threat" to regional security.
The Gulf states believe that it is a mistake not to solve the Iranian missile problem and not to take action to curb Iran's activities in the region.
Against the backdrop of the nuclear talks between Iran and major countries failing to satisfy the wishes of the countries in the Gulf, Saudi Arabia and Iran held direct talks.
Its goal is to curb the escalation of tension in the region.
This is one of the factors slowing economic growth in Gulf Cooperation Council states.
The upcoming GCC summit will be the first GCC summit since the end of the dispute between some member states and Qatar.
This is an opportunity for the Gulf Cooperation Council to re-evaluate its diplomatic achievements to promote the restoration of the Gulf Cooperation Council's unity, and put forward a series of measures to fully cooperate with its member states to cope with common challenges, and contribute to the stability and development of the Gulf countries.
From 7 o'clock to now 9:30, it has not been delivered. The deposit must be returned and the order canceled.
OK
It claimed to have the loudest supercar exhaust sound in the city.
The car we bring to you this time is the dream of many men!
It is the flagship supercar of Lamborghini, the successor of Murcielago - Aventador LP700-4!
The asking price is close to two million Malaysian ringgits, and the annual road tax is more than ten thousand Malaysian ringgits. It has four-wheel drive. Why is it called the LP700?
With 700 horsepower, can you imagine how fast it is?
The editor doesn't know, the data says that 0-100km/h acceleration takes only 2.9 seconds, which is about when the editor's myvi reaches 30km/h, the other party has reached 100km/h, well.
The low-slung body, the arrogant scissor doors, the huge air intakes all over the body, and the 6.5 v12 engine that can be seen through the glass perfectly interpret the style of Lamborghini.
It is not necessary to say too much about the car model. Just Google it. The editor has compiled some explanations that Google may not give!
Too much attention, wherever I go, everyone is looking at me. I feel very uncomfortable! (Actually, I feel a little bit excited.)
RM1 for 1km (car owners don’t care at all)
Practice getting in and out, otherwise it can be a bit awkward (because you can't get out of the cabin and get stuck halfway)
The engine is so loud that you will go deaf as soon as you get out of the car. (But it's very cool.)
The body is too large, it will be very narrow to park in a normal parking space, and it is very afraid of being hit by the door of the car next door when opening the door!
A little lonely, because there were no opponents on the road (I said it myself, it has nothing to do with the car owner, haha)
Don't misunderstand, the supercar in the video is not for sale, sorry!
Friends who want to shoot videos for their beloved cars are welcome to contact us!
More of what you don't know about cars, at The Car Guide / 人民汽车志
It involves a car accident worth tens of millions of yuan!
Bugatti Chiron and Porsche 911 are known to car enthusiasts. Chiron is one of the most expensive supercars in the world, and the price of Porsche 911 is also at the million level!
Prior to that day, a million-dollar Porsche 911 and a ten-million-dollar supercar Chiron were knocked down in just a few minutes abroad!
Judging from the result, you were right!
Let university spirit resonate with the spirit of the times - Xinhuanet
The so-called university spirit refers to a series of educational concepts and value pursuits that a university has long accumulated during its development, which is the soul of a university.
From ancient times to the present, the university spirit is crucial to the development of politics, economy, culture, science and technology, and even the progress of a nation.
Since the birth of the first modern university in the world, the university has shouldered a unique mission different from that of other social organizations. For Chinese universities, which emerged in the autumn of national crisis, its spirit is more deeply influenced by traditional culture and the changes of the times. It advocates the value concept of "cultivating virtue and serving the world" and "promoting education and strengthening the country" and the patriotic responsibility of "promoting education and strengthening the country".
At present, the trend of informationization and internationalization of higher education is becoming increasingly obvious. The global competition in education, technology, and talent is intensifying. As an important “supply side”, the structural reform of higher education is facing unprecedented opportunities and challenges.
In particular, the release of the "Overall Plan for the Construction of World-class Universities and First-class Disciplines" has not only displayed China's confidence and determination to move from a country of higher education to a country of higher education, but also put forward higher and newer requirements for the development of universities.
How to make efforts to join the ranks of the world's top universities in a short period of time, and accelerate the construction of a number of world-class universities and a number of world-class disciplines on the basis of a certain gap, and achieve "overtaking on a curve"?
In addition to firm confidence in goals, paths, and capabilities, universities should also make full use of three advantages: the first is the latecomer advantage, which can be achieved by continuously introducing outstanding overseas academic talents, learning and borrowing the advanced experience of world-class universities, and significantly improving the academic level and quality of education; the second is the cultural advantage, which can be achieved by inheriting the wisdom content of the five-thousand-year accumulation of Chinese civilization, promoting the development of excellent traditional culture, and using it to gather power, build brands, and improve images; and the third is the institutional advantage, which can be achieved by making full use of the institutional superiority of socialist countries, strengthening goal-driven motivation, gathering consensus and strength, optimizing resource allocation, and providing a sustainable and solid guarantee for the school to catch up with the world’s advanced level.
It should be particularly noted that the construction of world-class universities cannot be one-size-fits-all, and each school must demonstrate its individuality and characteristics while playing to its strengths.
The school features should have common Chinese features, and should also reflect their unique target positioning, school tradition and resource endowment.
As for Zhejiang University, we attach importance to the following three aspects in our education: First, we highlight the characteristics of cultivating innovative and entrepreneurial talents, and build an integrated educational environment of science and education integration and school-enterprise integration to form a full-chain entrepreneurial education ecosystem. Second, we highlight the characteristics of cross-disciplinary gathering, promote the optimization and adjustment of discipline system, create a cross-disciplinary institutional environment, and actively cultivate cross-disciplinary emerging disciplines and landmark cross-disciplinary achievements. Third, we highlight the characteristics of education system and social services, carry out in-depth international exchanges and cooperation, and speed up the formation of pan-Zhejiang University industry-university-research cooperation system.
In this process, it is especially important to always adhere to the spirit of the university, and let the spirit of the university resonate with the spirit of the times.
For Zhejiang University, the motto of "Seeking Truth and Innovation", the common values of "Diligence, Morality, Discernment, and Practicality", and the common expression system of the spirit of Zhejiang University, which consists of "Incorporating the Yangtze River and the Yellow River, Enlightening and Thickening Virtue, Opening the World and Serving the People, and Establishing Our Country", constitute the latest expression system of the spirit of Zhejiang University.
This is an important guarantee for the school to insist on the correct direction of education and continuously accumulate cultural heights and gather spiritual power. It is rich in connotation and far-reaching in significance.
Among them, "Haina River" emphasizes the spirit of openness and inclusiveness, reflects the spirit of "taking the world's talents as my own", and shows the quality concept of learning from the world's top universities in running schools and education. "Qizhen Hude" emphasizes the spirit of seeking truth and goodness, which means that the university should not only pursue the truth, but also receive the tempering of morality and the sharpening of personality. "Kaowen Qianmin" reflects the spirit of reform and innovation, which not only includes the pursuit of new knowledge and the innovation of scientific research, but also shows the spirit of reform and development. "Shuwobanguo" emphasizes the spirit of patriotism and dedication, and talks about that the university should always be with the destiny of the nation.
This series of spiritual ideas and value pursuits is the soul of Zhejiang University's 120 years of education.
"Those who are intelligent listen to silence, and those who are wise see what has not been formed."
Chinese colleges and universities should further take into account the overall situation of the socialist cause with Chinese characteristics, deeply understand the position of the times and the historical mission of higher education, and accelerate the construction of world-class universities.
At the same time, we should adhere to humanistic care and independence and freedom, make the university spirit and the spirit of the times and the national spirit collide with each other, and provide inexhaustible power for the realization of national prosperity and national rejuvenation, and the realization of the common ideal of human beings.
I ordered a meal, and 2 things were wrong
The order
Want to pay service fees to riders
How to pay now
Iranian President: If sanctions on Iran are lifted, nuclear talks are likely to reach an agreement - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Tehran, December 11 (Reporters Gao Wencheng and Wang Shoubao) Iranian President Raisi said on the 11th in Tehran, the capital of Iran, that if the United States lifted the sanctions on Iran, a “good agreement” could be reached in the negotiations on the comprehensive agreement on the Iranian nuclear issue.
According to the news released by the official website of the President of Iran, on the same day, in a meeting with the ambassadors of Iran to neighboring countries, Raisi said that Iran has proved its sincerity in negotiations by submitting proposals to other relevant parties of the Iran nuclear agreement.
If the United States is determined, "the way to reach an agreement will be smooth".
The related parties of the Iranian nuclear agreement began to hold talks in Vienna, the capital of Austria, in April this year to discuss the issue of the United States and Iran to resume compliance.
The new round of talks began on November 29 in Vienna, temporarily suspended on December 3, and continued on December 9.
Haven’t received the takeaway yet
Please contact the rider
Xi Jinping sent a congratulatory letter to the 2021 Greater Bay Area Science Forum - Xinhua Net
Xinhua News Agency, Beijing, December 11 - On December 11, President Xi Jinping sent a congratulatory letter to the 2021 Greater Bay Area Science Forum.
Xi Jinping pointed out that the world is undergoing a century-old change. Global technological innovation has entered an intensive and active period. A new round of technological revolution and industrial change has had a profound impact on the global economic structure.
The Guangdong-Hong Kong-Macao Greater Bay Area should focus on the strategic positioning of building an international technology innovation center, strive to build a global technology innovation highland, and promote the development of emerging industries.
China is willing to work with scientists from all countries in the world and international science and technology organizations to closely carry out international science and technology exchanges and cooperation, strengthen research on major scientific issues, promote the resolution of common scientific and technological issues, deepen cooperation on key scientific projects, jointly promote the development of the world's scientific cause, and better benefit mankind.
The 2021 Greater Bay Area Science Forum was held in Guangzhou, Guangdong Province on the same day, with the theme of "Exploring the Future and Sharing Science", hosted by the People's Government of Guangdong Province.
Yes, the order is accepted.
But the restaurant called to say that, because the rider doesn't deliver bones, the restaurant needed to cut up the meat and throw away the bones
Do you understand my question?
It's not an order delay
Or you can call me directly
Is it being followed up?
The longest period of time for college students in Guangxi to start a business is up to 5 years - Xinhuanet
Xinhua News Agency, Nanning, May 19th (reporter Zhang Ying) The reporter recently learned from the Guangxi Zhuang Autonomous Region Education Department that in the future, all universities in Guangxi will implement a flexible academic system, relax the time limit for university students to take a year off, and the time limit for on-campus students to take a year off for entrepreneurship can be extended by 2 to 5 years on the basis of the original academic system, and the time for taking a year off for entrepreneurship can be regarded as the time for practical education.
In order to promote the improvement of the entrepreneurship and innovation ability of college students, Guangxi education, human resources and other departments have joined forces to build an entrepreneurship platform and build more off-campus practice teaching bases for college students, university science and technology parks, college student entrepreneurship parks, and entrepreneurship incubation bases to provide external guarantee for college student entrepreneurship.
According to the requirements, by 2020, the area of the innovation and entrepreneurship practice base of each university should reach more than 3,000 square meters for undergraduate schools and more than 2,000 square meters for vocational schools.
The government encourages higher education institutions to set up innovation and entrepreneurship credits, and give priority support to students who perform well in innovation and entrepreneurship practice.
University teachers must work in industry enterprises for at least two months every two years, so as to improve their innovation and entrepreneurship education awareness and ability.
The Education Department of Guangxi Zhuang Autonomous Region requires all universities in Guangxi to carry out the innovation and entrepreneurship training program for university students in depth, and strive to ensure that every university student participates in an innovation and entrepreneurship training program during their school period.
Universities should actively organize students to participate in various innovation and entrepreneurship competitions at all levels, and give financial support.
NEWS GOV-MO: UM awards honorary doctorates to seven distinguished individuals
The University of Macau held the “2021 Honorary Degree and Higher Degree Conferment Ceremony” today (November 11), during which it conferred honorary doctoral degrees on Liu Xunyi, Chen Kaixian, Nakamura Shiuji, Li Lanjuan, Li Xiaoliang, Zhu Lilan, and Jiang Chaohui in recognition of their outstanding achievements and major contributions to the development of society and education.
During the conferment ceremony, the Chief Executive and Pro-Chancellor of the University of Macau, and Secretary for Social Affairs and Culture, Ao Ieong U, presented the honorary doctorates in the company of the Chairman of the University of Macau's Board of Trustees, Lam Kam Seng, and the President of the University of Macau, Song Yonghua.
Professor Liu Zunyi was awarded an honorary doctorate in education, Professor Chen Kaixian was awarded an honorary doctorate in science, Professor Nakamura Shuji was awarded an honorary doctorate in science, Professor Li Lanjuan was awarded an honorary doctorate in science, Professor Li Xiaoliang was awarded an honorary doctorate in business administration, Professor Zhu Lili was awarded an honorary doctorate in science, and Ms. Jiang Chaohui was awarded an honorary doctorate in science.
In his speech, Ouyang Yu first congratulated and expressed high respect to the seven outstanding people who were awarded honorary doctorates. They made extraordinary achievements in different fields and made outstanding contributions to the development of the country and the progress of the world; at the same time, Ouyang Yu expressed his most sincere wishes to the graduates and their parents, and also expressed his sincere respect to the teaching staff team of the university who were devoted to their work and had excellent academic achievements.
Professor Sun Yifeng, professor of the School of Humanities of the University of Australia, said that Professor Liu Zunyi is a world-renowned economist who is known for his outstanding academic achievements and forward-looking educational concepts.
In addition to his achievements in economic development, economic growth and the East Asian economy, he is also a visionary education leader.
In short, he has made outstanding achievements in many fields.
Sun Yifeng said that Professor Nakamura Shuji is a pioneer of sustainable energy technology.
He was one of three winners of the 2014 Nobel Prize in Physics for inventing the blue light-emitting diode (LED).
Professor Nakamura's invention has not only completely changed the lighting industry, but also promoted the production of white light emitting diodes, which are now widely used in daily life and industrial production, making a great contribution to human well-being.
When Sun Yifeng read the praises of Li Lanjuan, he said that Professor Li Lanjuan was the pioneer of artificial liver in China. She created a unique and effective Li’s artificial liver system, which made a major breakthrough in the treatment of severe hepatitis and liver failure, and significantly reduced the mortality rate of liver failure.
In this fight against the COVID-19, she and her team proposed a "four-anti-two-balance" plan and brought three technologies of artificial liver, microecology and stem cells, which significantly improved the rate of severe treatment.
When Sun Yifeng read Li Xiaoliang's praise, he said that Professor Li Xiaoliang had laid the foundation for innovative research on operations management, shaped the thinking mode of supply chain theory and practice, and completely changed the business model all over the world.
Li Xiaoliang was famous for popularizing the concept of the long whip effect in operational management and exploring measures to deal with this phenomenon.
Now, under the epidemic and the tense economic situation, the long whip effect has become more and more prominent, causing serious damage to the supply chain.
Li Xiaoliang's far-sighted research is like a gift in the snow, helping the industry to overcome difficulties and bringing great social value.
When Sun Yifeng read the praises of Zhu Lili, she said that in her scientific research work, she found a breakthrough and innovative staining technology for preparing samples, which has a high reputation among domestic and foreign science and technology peers.
She has won important honorary titles such as the International Eurasian Academy of Sciences Academician with her extraordinary achievements in science and technology, and won the due lofty position in the world science and technology temple with her brilliant achievements.
Chen Xin, the Acting Director of the Chinese Medicine Institute of the University of Macau, said that Professor Chen Kaixian has been engaged in drug development for more than 40 years, and his outstanding scientific achievements and important contributions to the country, Macau, Macau University of Science and Technology, and the National Key Laboratory have made him have a high international status and reputation.
His active promotion of the development of traditional Chinese medicine in Macao and the Greater Bay Area fully reflects his sense of mission in dedicating to the national medical development strategy.
When reading the praises of Ms. Jiang Chaohui, Professor Shu Chengzhong, Dean of the School of Science and Technology of the University of Australia, said that Ms. Jiang Chaohui has participated in the research and development of more than 15 major inventions and patents related to storage virtualization, navigation, file system and power management, all of which are highly practical, widely used, and improve the convenience of human life.
As an outstanding inventor, Ms. Jiang is often able to popularize high-tech and theories for the public.
Finally, Chen Kaixian read the speech on behalf of the honorary doctor.
He was pleased to see that Macao and the Greater Bay Area have established a good model in the medical industry: from the first national key laboratory of Chinese medicine quality research established by the University of Macau to the vigorous development of traditional Chinese medicine in the Greater Bay Area, the University of Macau has made great contributions to the integration of excellent talents in the field of traditional Chinese medicine in the Greater Bay Area.
In addition, he believes that the management team of the University of Adelaide has far-sightedness, which not only provides students with a fertile ground for research in academia, but also sends many responsible talents to the society.
He was honored to exchange and cooperate with the University of Adelaide, and he sincerely congratulated the University of Adelaide on its achievements in recent years.
Did he have the right address?
I haven't seen it yet
The rider went the wrong way earlier, so I didn't get
However, #PRS_ORG# has received
The app was unable to connect with a rider at the time.
My family thought there was none
But it's been more than an hour now
At the time of the rapid out-of-the-circle of NFT, a new concept emerged in the encrypted community.
In 2021, a blockchain game called "Axie Infinity" had a great impact in Southeast Asia, and some residents who lost their jobs due to the epidemic began to obtain stable income in this game.
Axie Infinity is a pet-raising game based on blockchain technology, which combines multiple gameplay, including NFT, and is currently the NFT project with the highest transaction volume, which has exceeded $3 billion.
According to the TokenTerminal data, the daily income of Axie Infinity exceeds 8.2 million US dollars, approaching Honor of Kings.
On August 6 this year, the official of Axie Infinity said that its daily active users had exceeded 1 million.
The popularity of "Axie Infinity" will pass a new "playtoearn" model to more people. With the help of blockchain and smart contracts, players are no longer a single character. In addition to getting fun and economic benefits from the game, they can also participate in the governance of the game ecology.
This subjectivity is not granted by the game developer, but by blockchain technology.
When I saw the news about my friend's stock price, my biggest feeling was the choice of enterprises in the race track, that is, the choice of investment target industry. First of all, it is necessary to choose the industry with large growth space, at least with a market size of more than 100 billion yuan; secondly, it is necessary to choose the industry with good future growth, and consider the industry with the best growth in the next 3-5 years; finally, it is necessary to choose the industry with policy support.
The width of the track refers to the market size, the length of the track refers to the development stage of the industry, and whether the track is flat or rugged refers to the competitive pattern of the industry.
Good luck on the right track!
The first thing in the new year is to summarize 2021 and adjust the tactical layout in 2022.
Tactics are about "doing the right things," that is, doing things right.
And the strategy is to "do the right thing", that is, do the right thing.
Strategy is about finding a direction, and tactics are about landing. In most tactical thinking, there is room for strategic thinking.
For example, in addition to thinking about how to increase the number of customers (tactical thinking), you can also think about whether to continue to deepen in the current field or expand horizontally (strategic thinking); in addition to thinking about how to improve the customer retention rate (tactical thinking), you can also think about how to improve the retention rate of core customers and high-value customers (strategic thinking); in addition to thinking about how to improve the participation rate of activities (tactical thinking), you can consider how to set the correct activity KPIs to achieve the correct activity goals, such as improving the participation rate of target customers, activating high-value silent customers, and precise recruitment; in addition to thinking about how to improve DAU (tactical thinking), you can consider whether the current growth is healthy and sustainable.
Bitcoin, which was born 12 years ago, ushered in several milestone events in 2021.
On September 7, the Central American small country of El Salvador designated bitcoin as a legal currency, which was the first time that bitcoin became the legal currency of a country or region.
On October 12, the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) approved ProShares for the first time in eight years to launch a Bitcoin ETF and list it on the New York Stock Exchange. This marked the landing of the first compliant Bitcoin futures ETF on the U.S. capital market and the further expansion of the cryptocurrency investment exposure.
From the perspective of the development of blockchain technology, Bitcoin is not the protagonist.
Bitcoin underwent a soft fork upgrade called "Taproot" on November 14, 2021, which increased the anonymity of Bitcoin network transactions and reduced the data burden of transactions by changing the data structure of the block itself.
KFC, without the KFC sauce
If you just ate the McChicken, it would be hard to eat
Does your $32 coupon have to be spent in one go?
If it is less than 15 minutes, can it be cancelled?
I am entering code, why does it become confirm order
OK
Am I not going to get a discount?
Hello
The ordered meals were not delivered
The rider has already arrived at
I hope you arrive on time, not because you want your coupon!!
Have you encountered the initial registration of the first-level construction cost and the continuing education credit hours?
Overdue registrants failed to provide continuing education proof Overdue registrants should provide continuing education proof of no less than 30 hours in the past year Re-registrants should provide continuing education proof of no less than 120 hours in the past four years Re-registrants should provide continuing education proof of no less than 30 hours per year
Standards for Continuing Education Costs of Cost Engineers
The cost engineers who participate in the network continuing education must pay the learning fee to each management institution when they register, and the general standard is: the fee for 30 hours of compulsory courses is 300 yuan/person/year (including the unified continuing education textbook);
The cost of the 30-hour elective course is 300 yuan per person per year.
The fees for 30 hours of compulsory courses and 30 hours of optional courses are RMB 600 per person per year (including unified teaching materials for continuing education).
(1) Participate in the continuing education learning of registered cost engineers organized by the China Association of Construction Cost Engineers or provincial and departmental management agencies, and calculate the study hours according to the time recorded in the online learning materials;
(2) Participate in the centralized face-to-face training and various types of training classes, seminars, etc. organized by the China Association of Cost Engineers or provincial and departmental administrative agencies. Each half day can be recognized as 4 hours;
(III) Participate in the continuing education classes of the China Association of Cost Engineers, provincial and departmental cost engineers, and cost engineers, and each half day can be recognized as 10 academic hours;
(Four) Participate in the research of the China Association for Science and Technology and provincial-level projects, the compilation of industry standards, and the compilation of textbooks. Each item is recognized as 30 credits per year;
(6) Participate in the compilation of textbooks for the national qualification examination for construction cost engineers, the formulation of examination questions, the review of examination questions, and the marking of examination papers, which can be recognized as 30 credit hours per year;
(7) Engineering cost-related professional papers and works published under the author's name and in the open (in accordance with the official publication number).
For every 10,000 words published, 12 academic hours will be recognized;
Each 1000 words published in a national-level journal is recognized as 8 academic hours, each 1000 words published in a provincial-level journal is recognized as 5 academic hours, and each 1000 words published in a city-level journal is recognized as 3 academic hours;
(9) Participation in public training (except for general management and skill training for enterprises) organized by engineering cost consulting enterprises approved or authorized by the Price Commission of the State Council, provincial and departmental management agencies, and provincial cost consulting associations can be recognized as 4 hours per half day, with a maximum of 30 hours per year.
Continuing Education Learning Process for Construction Cost Engineers
After the registration agency receives the fee, the student’s identity is immediately opened, and the cost engineer can enter the online education classroom to study with his or her username and password.
Students can learn through video-on-demand, question and answer, and online discussion.
If you forget your password, and when you log in, the username and password are incorrect, and you cannot log in for learning, please contact the registered organization to which you belong. The registered organization can assist in changing your password (but cannot change your username), and use the modified password to log in again.
Scan the QR code to download the Tieba client
Watch the high-definition live broadcast and video!
Please arrange delivery
My order has not arrived
The delivery man left and did not receive the goods
Please inform the delivery person immediately, we are still waiting
The restaurant had given the rider the food 30 minutes ago
The All-vision wedding photography base (Hebei store) has no branches for the time being.
The wedding dress is fashionable and avant-garde, and the makeup artist is also first-class. The shooting technology and angle are very professional, and the shooting effect is very good.
The seller is very trustworthy, and the service attitude is also very good.
The makeup is very delicate, the team service is very good, and the trip is very happy. It is a very professional team. The seller's service attitude is very good. I will recommend it to my friends. I am very satisfied.
Thanks to the photographer and the makeup artist, I have unique wedding photos.
Thanks to all the staff who took wedding photos today. Looking forward to the release of the film.
Taking wedding photos is a physical activity, especially for the photographer, who runs and jumps around.
The makeup artist designed a makeup style that was suitable for my face shape, and the photographer was funny and humorous when taking photos, which deserves praise.
Thank you to my photographer and make-up artist for making me feel so beautiful in my lifetime.
He praised the woman for having beautiful eyes, a well-behaved appearance, and at a glance, she was a good wife and mother who would be thrifty and frugal in the future.
The groom has made a profit and will live happily ever after.
The quality of the wedding photos is really good. Just like what is said on the Internet, my husband and I are very handsome and beautiful, and we are very satisfied.
The seller's service attitude is also very enthusiastic.
This trip not only enjoyed the scenery, but also took beautiful wedding photos, and also met the photographer friend.
The wedding photos are so beautiful, I want to blow up the photographer and makeup artist, you are really super professional.
I am very grateful to Miss Mu for her patience and careful guidance, and I like the photos taken very much~
When I saw the wedding photos, I didn't even recognize myself.
As long as the photographer chooses well, you can also have wedding photos that are comparable to stars.
The most important thing when taking wedding photos is that both the photographer and the make-up artist have a good sense of aesthetics. Fortunately, I met them.
After seeing my wedding photos, I realized that I was also a "photo fraud".
Three Ivy League schools, including Yale, were accused of discrimination in admission by Asian-American groups - Xinhuanet
WASHINGTON, May 23 (Xinhua) -- More than 130 Asian-American groups submitted a complaint to the U.S. Department of Education and the Department of Justice on May 23, protesting the discrimination against Asian-American students in the admission process of three Ivy League schools -- Yale University, Brown University and Dartmouth College.
The Asian American Education Alliance, which initiated the complaint, held a press conference in Washington on the same day.
Zhao Yukun, chairman of the group, said at the press conference that in the past 10 years, the number of Asian applicants who meet the admission requirements of American top universities has doubled, but the proportion of Asians in these three American top universities has basically remained at the same level.
Many studies have shown that these colleges "systematically and persistently discriminate against Asian applicants" in the so-called "holistic" admissions process.
Zhao Yukun said that in 2014, the research by Sanders and other scholars showed that among the three universities, Asians had the lowest acceptance rate among all ethnic groups relative to the number of applicants.
Data from the U.S. Department of Education also showed that among all Ivy League schools, Brown University and Dartmouth College have the lowest admission rate for Asian students, and Yale University and Brown University have implemented a de facto racial quota for Asian applicants for more than 20 years.
Zhao Yukun told a Xinhua News Agency reporter that they hoped that the U.S. Department of Education and the U.S. Department of Justice would conduct an investigation after the appeal was submitted, and take measures to prevent these universities from continuing to discriminate against Asians in admissions.
They also hope that the colleges and universities that have been complained about will take the initiative to pay attention to this issue and change their admission policies for Asians.
At present, the three universities that have been complained have not responded.
The Asian American Coalition for Education was founded in 2015. At that time, it had complained of Harvard University's admission discrimination, but the U.S. Department of Education did not accept the complaint for procedural reasons.
In addition to the Chinese-American organizations participating in the appeal, there are also Indian-American, Korean-American, Japanese-American, and Pakistani-American educational organizations.
Eating utensils are required
Just cancelled an order
Why is it still being implemented?
Can you check if it has been canceled?
But I ordered at 5.09am this morning
That's the order hot line, and they don't know anything
Can I call them directly?
In September 2020, Mr. Lu learned from a real estate agency that there was a factory located in Zhangting Town, Yuyao, Zhejiang Province. After many on-site visits, Mr. Lu decided to buy the factory.
In December of the same year, Mr. Lu negotiated with Mr. Lin, the family member of the owner of the house, on the details of purchasing the factory and paid a deposit of RMB 200,000 through bank transfer on the same day.
Lin signed as the payee on the "Factory Purchase Deposit Receipt", which stated, "If the buyer does not want to buy this factory, the deposit will belong to the seller. If the seller does not want to sell this factory, the deposit will be doubled and returned to the seller. Both parties agreed to sign the factory purchase contract within one week."
However, after that, the two sides failed to reach an agreement on the major terms of the contract, such as the scope of the sale of the factory and the method of payment, which led to the delay in signing the house purchase contract.
Considering that the two parties had failed to reach an agreement on the content of the contract, a few days later, Mr. Lin returned the 200,000 yuan deposit to Mr. Lu.
After a lot of effort, Mr. Lu found a house he liked, paid the down payment, and prepared the house payment. He was just one step away from signing the contract, but the seller refused to sell. This made Mr. Lu feel helpless and angry.
For this reason, Mr. Lu sued Mr. Lin to the People's Court of Yuyao City.
After the trial, the court found that the two parties finally failed to sign a formal contract, which could not be solely blamed on the defendant. It should be reasonably presumed that the negotiation failed. Therefore, this case should not apply the deposit penalty, and the defendant should not bear the double return of the deposit's breach of contract.
After the first trial, the plaintiff filed an appeal.
Recently, the second instance court upheld the original judgment.
[Lawyer's reminder] In the course of the transaction, it is necessary to fulfill the necessary due diligence obligations.
When signing a contract, as the buyer, it is necessary to perform the necessary due diligence obligations, such as verifying the information of the owner of the house, whether the house is occupied, and specifying the specific time and place of delivery in the contract to prevent disputes between the two parties when performing the contract.
(German Voice Chinese Network) After the end of the "democracy summit" on Friday, the spokesperson of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs of China issued a statement on Saturday (December 11), stating that the United States held the "Leaders' Democracy Summit", which was "drawing a line on ideology, using democracy as a tool and weapon, doing anti-democracy in the name of democracy, inciting division and confrontation, and transferring domestic contradictions".
The Chinese government believes that "for a long time, the United States has imposed its political system and value concepts on others, promoted "democratic transformation", abused unilateral sanctions, instigated "color revolutions", and caused disastrous consequences.
"Democracy" has long become a "weapon of mass destruction" for the United States to intervene in other countries.
The summit is an action by Biden to fulfill his campaign promise.
The two-day meeting was held via video conference, and leaders of 111 countries around the world were invited to attend, including the leaders of Taiwan, but China and Russia were not invited.
On the eve of the summit, China and Russia criticized the United States for its own democratic problems, saying that the United States was not qualified to host such a summit.
There are also doubts in the international community and in the United States. For example, some leaders with authoritarian tendencies have been invited to attend, such as the leaders of the Philippines, Poland and Brazil, and some people doubt that the Biden government has organized this summit not for the purpose of democracy, but for geopolitical purposes.
The newly appointed German Chancellor Scholz also attended the video democratic summit.
The statement issued by the Chinese Ministry of Foreign Affairs on Saturday stated that "the pathology of American-style democracy is fully displayed today, and the problems of money politics, identity politics, party opposition, political polarization, social rifts, racial conflicts, and the gap between the rich and the poor are becoming more and more serious", and American democracy is built on the basis of capital, which is a "rich man's game".
U.S. President Biden said in his speech that "as leaders of the government, we have the responsibility to listen to our citizens, strengthen the fence of democracy, promote reforms, achieve transparent accountability governance, and resist the power of authoritarianism and those who want to nakedly pursue power before the public interest. "
He stressed that democracy is not a matter of course, "We must constantly update it in every generation. In my opinion, this is the decisive challenge of our time. "
Biden also said that "at a time when democracy and human rights around the world are facing continuous and worrying challenges, democracy needs fighters to defend it".
The United States pledged to launch a one-year action plan after this democracy summit, including a $4.244 billion initiative to strengthen democracy around the world and support independent media.
The United States hopes that countries will make specific public commitments to improve their democratic systems before the real democracy summit to be held at the end of 2022.
Biden said, "Let all countries implement our commitments and report our progress next year."
Ok, I'm just worried that he sent it to the wrong address.
Richen Restaurant (Wudaokou Store)
[Mint] Environment: average [service bell] Service: The dishes were served very quickly. My must-order dish is the "Traditional Malatang". The Malatang was too fragrant, too soft and too delicious 😋. If you like desserts, you must try the "Dongjiang Inkfish Braised Tofu Pot". The soup was very delicious. The tofu was very tender. The ink...
The taste is good, the meat is good, and the service is enthusiastic.
It's been a long time since I came to Jiuchang, and the fruit punch is still so delicious and full of real ingredients. For the first time, I ordered the barbecued pork bun, which is the southern flavor of soft flour that I love!
The rice in the clay pot is just right, the portion is very large, the signature tin foil chicken wings are as good as ever, the example soup is not bad, and the Chinese cabbage is also...
The taste is great, the service is enthusiastic, and the meat is good.
Riachong old store was also an internet celebrity many years ago. Dongdan Xiaolou, wooden floor.
You always have to wait a long time to eat the clay pot rice, and the clay pot of the clay pot rice is all cracked...
I hadn't been to Ji Chang for several years. The rise of all kinds of small shops and Cantonese cuisine has dispersed the flow of customers.
It is rare to have a seat when you come to the store. The quality of the dishes is beyond doubt, and it is as good as always.
Taste good, meat is good, staple food is good
Richen takeaway.
[Rice] meals: The food was a little disappointing this time around.
Three-cup chicken: The side dishes are a bit too much, and the chicken meat is slightly less.
The main flavor is a little off, the bottom flavor is not salty enough, so the sweetness is highlighted, everyone can imagine the sweetness + various spice dishes...
How do you drink Redbreast whiskey?
Everyone has different interests. Some people like to collect things, some people like to eat, and some people like to drink. Johnnie Walker is one of the most popular Scottish whiskies in the world, and it has won a gold award in the International Spirits Competition.
Every bottle of Johnnie Walker Red Label has a unique taste, but if you don't know how to enjoy it, it would be a waste of its flavour.
So, how do you drink Redbreast whiskey?
I will introduce it to you in a simple way.
How to drink Red Label whiskey:
Johnnie Walker Red Label is a blend of about 35 different Scotch whiskies, with the rich aroma and characteristics of traditional Scotch whisky, with a sweet and smoky aroma in the rich aroma.
The entrance is concentrated and fresh, with a slight taste of herbs and a strong taste of smoked malt.
The wine can be enjoyed on its own over ice, or mixed with your favourite drink.
Red-label whisky entered the domestic market. In order to adapt to the taste of the Chinese people, red-label whisky + cola or Sprite or 7-up or other sparkling beverages have become a fashion that has lasted for a long time.
These sweet drinks can not only neutralize the acidity, but also bring visual pleasure. They can be added to the drinks to dilute the wine and change the taste.
Red Label whisky + a slice of lemon + rock sugar (white sugar can also be used) is the most authentic and traditional way of drinking it.
The original red vermouth has a slightly bitter taste. Adding sugar can neutralize the sourness, and lemon will give the wine a fresh aroma. Of course, the sweetness and sourness can be adjusted according to personal preference.
The above three are the best ways to drink red card whiskey. You can try it as a reference. I hope my introduction can help you.
Education thinking: How the university entrance exam can meet the needs of both "smart kids" and "dumb kids" - Xinhuanet
Three students of Lanzhou Jiaotong University wrote a letter to the school leaders, reflecting their confusion about university exams, and proposed to increase the difficulty of the exams, change the exam questions, and let the exams truly reflect the actual level of the students.
Indeed, the university entrance examination has been a "hot topic" for a long time.
In the university campus, students come from all over the country, with different abilities, and the learning conditions are different.
It is inevitable that there will be different feelings when it comes to assessing a group with such diverse features.
Of course, if the exam questions are single-type and have a high repetition rate, and the questions are too easy, it will inevitably cause a totally different feeling.
For students who do not study hard, they may be able to pass the exam by intensive study before the exam. If they try other methods, they may achieve twice the result with half the effort.
In this way, there is a "strange situation" in which "poor students" can pass the exam and even get high scores without any effort, and "smart students" do not fall behind in class, and their homework and notes are all good, but their exam scores are not much higher.
It can be seen from this that the problems reflected by Lanzhou Jiaotong University students in university examinations are not groundless, and it is believed that this situation does not only exist in Lanzhou Jiaotong University.
In this sense, we should applaud the three students who wrote the letters.
In fact, those who have been to university are well aware that it is not uncommon for students to cram for exams, try all kinds of ways to “extract” exam questions from teachers, and try to get “special tutoring” before the exam. Even during the exam, it is not uncommon for students to smuggle cheat sheets and ask teachers for help after the exam.
In the author's opinion, as a teaching quality assessment guide, whether a university's exam is passed or not is more about the teacher's comprehensive grasp of teaching and learning, and the scientific proposal based on this.
When entering the university undergraduate stage, the major begins to be subdivided, and many professional courses are mainly based on basic knowledge.
There is no doubt that whether one has a complete grasp of the basic knowledge points of a subject is the content to be examined in a university examination.
However, undergraduate knowledge is basically the basic theory and basic common sense of the discipline. In terms of knowledge points, the space for change is not large, and it is basically fixed.
As one teacher said, "Twenty years ago, I learned the basic knowledge of college mathematics. Now, I still learn it, and it is still important. "
However, the knowledge points are basically the same, which does not mean that the examination questions are single and repeated.
In many universities, exams are generally composed of a question group, and then the senior teachers of the subject are in charge of composing the paper, and the exam marking is also participated in by all the teachers in charge of the subject, which can to a certain extent overcome the situation of repeated questions.
However, it is necessary to formulate a set of test questions that are in line with the actual situation of teaching and learning. The difficulty of the questions should be normally distributed according to the overall situation of the students' learning. It is also necessary to comprehensively grasp the teaching situation and comprehensively analyze the level of students' learning, so as to grasp the difficulty and type of the examination questions dynamically. It can not only highlight the examination of basic knowledge, but also take into account the examination of abilities. At the same time, it is necessary to innovate the design of the types of questions.
The exam is the baton of university education, and what kind of exam, students will have a corresponding preparation plan. This will affect the effectiveness of university education in the long run.
The Lanzhou Jiaotong University attaches great importance to the letter of advice from students, and has deployed a rectification plan in the whole school.
It requires each teaching unit to organize teachers to carry out discussions and end-of-course examination self-inspection, formulate examination paper proposal and related system, and at the same time strengthen the supervision and inspection of examination paper proposal and review links, refine the evaluation of grades, and strengthen the overall assessment of each link of course teaching.
From a mechanism point of view, solving the problems of single question types and repeated questions is an issue that universities need to face. Of course, it is necessary to introduce corresponding systems, but hard work lies in daily life. Teachers need to have a comprehensive understanding of the teaching situation. Not only do they need to understand the teaching content, but they also need to understand the learning situation of students. Both ends need to be understood. Teaching and learning will be better connected to form a positive interaction, and the examination will also be more in line with reality, so that "academic geniuses" and "academic failures" can each get what they deserve.
If you can't change the store location for me, can you do delivery instead?
Then I don't need to give you more money, do I?
My colleague's order has already been delivered
It can't be completed.
What about GPS?
Mrs. Kim's wedding photography (Nanjie store) has no branches for the time being
Because our time was not arranged properly before taking pictures, we changed the time twice. The advisor, Lanlan, was very patient to help us arrange the time.
I ended up shooting it on a nice weather weekend.
The staff at Mrs. Kim's, whether it's the advisers, the makeup artists or the photographers, are super nice.
That was the first time I'd ever had professional make-up done, wow, I couldn't believe that one day I would look that good, haha.
Xiaojie and another girl (sorry, I can't remember her name) were very patient and the makeup was very natural.
The outdoor scenes were filmed in Jiangwan City. Fortunately, the weather was good that day. I didn't feel very cold. The makeup artists paid attention to our clothes, headwear, and accessories from time to time. If there was any problem, they would help us immediately.
The photographer was also very funny, and we had a great day taking photos.
When choosing the photos, because I saw many cases on the Internet, I didn't want to let the guests delete too many photos. However, when we chose the photos, we really had no intention of adding photos. We just took the 24 photos in the package and didn't add a single one (I heard that my cousin, who took wedding dress photos at about the same time, added more than 10,000 photos to the 7,000-yuan package, and I was stunned at that time. I was also afraid that I would choose too many).
Today, the photos were fixed. Lanlan sent them to me. I looked at two of them and felt that they were not good. They immediately fixed them for me again.
When I compared my sister's previous photos, I found that I was really satisfied with our photos. They were simple and fresh, just the style I wanted.
I sincerely recommend everyone to take wedding photos in Xuanhan Jinfu!
Price: 3,999 yuan
Mrs. Kim is grateful for your sincere wishes of happiness and a bright future!
How much is this set?
What conditions does the $32 need to meet in order to be used?
That's good, I don't need a refund
Your driver says he can't find you
Not found
But I couldn't understand his English
The editor will bring you the Omega mechanical watch, which one is good?
How good is an Omega mechanical watch?
1. Swiss OmegaOMEGA disc flying series couple's watch, automatic mechanical men's watch, quartz women's watch
Reason for recommendation: Inheriting Switzerland, the time art is on the wrist. Omega is dignified and elegant, simple and simple. It is not ostentatious but very charming. It can be worn for commuting and formal occasions.
Couple style, expressing the sweet love between the two, always together, exquisite pointers, making people fall in love at first sight.
No quotes
2、Swiss Omega (OMEGA) watch Seamaster series stainless steel automatic mechanical men's watch and a pair of quartz women's watch 424.10.0.20.02.002/27.60.55.001
Reason for recommendation: Swiss-made, must be exquisite, Omega watches, thin and elegant gold watches, couple watches, which can not only show the noble identity, but also show the sweet love.
The index scale design makes the time scale more clear, and the dial adopts the popular blue dial. The overall design is simple and bright.
This brand Omega, the strap material is steel, the dial color is blue, the movement category is mechanical (automatic), the waterproof function is 30 meters, the display category is pointer, national warranty, the strap interface type is flat interface, the bottom material of the watch is stainless steel, the dial size of men's watch is 39.5mm and women's watch is 27.4mm, the strap interface size is 20mm, the clasp type is butterfly type, the watch mirror material is artificial sapphire crystal glass, 3 people have evaluated it, and it has achieved a 100% praise rate.
3, Swiss Omega OMEGA butterfly series couple's watch men's automatic mechanical women's quartz 424.10.37.20.01.001/24.60.01.001
Reason for recommendation: Swiss-made, quality benchmark, the precision of the movement used in this Omega watch is very high, couple design, simple and elegant appearance, time passing from the edge of the pointer, always moving at a steady pace, suitable for business people to wear, release wrist charm.
4, Swiss Omega (OMEGA) watch, Seamaster series, automatic mechanical watch, men's watch, fashionable women's quartz watch, couple watch, a pair of watch
Omega couple's watch, a pair of watches, gold-plated
Recommendation reason: It is imported directly from Switzerland, which naturally makes it of extraordinary quality. The Omega is dignified and elegant, plain and simple, not ostentatious but very charming. It can be worn for commuting and formal occasions.
Fashionable and atmospheric, full of beauty, it fully reflects the elegant temperament of ladies. The jumping of the pointer, I see your heart beating like the first time.
The watch strap is made of steel, the movement type is mechanical (automatic), the buckle type is folding, the waterproof function is 30 meters, the dial size is 39.5 for men and 27.4 for women, the display type is pointer, the warranty is nationwide, the strap interface type is flat interface, the bottom material of the watch is stainless steel, the dial color is white, the brand is Omega, the strap interface size is 18mm, the watch mirror material is artificial sapphire crystal glass, and there are more than 20 people who have commented on it, and it has obtained a 100% praise rate.
Shall I return the curry base to you then?
I'm only getting half of it
I haven’t seen any delivered for six boxes.
The company worked overtime, and there was no lunch at noon. I wanted to order takeout, but I didn't know that the order would be canceled.
Your name is Zheng Mian, and this is your second week in Japan.
You're walking down the street, and you suddenly realize someone is following you, and you walk faster and faster in fear until you're running.
The person behind you caught up: "Miss! Please wait!" (entirely in Japanese) You stopped in front of the convenience store.
"Miss...I am a director. I think you are beautiful. Would you like to participate in a reality show?"
You're confused and afraid it's a scam.
He gave you a business card, and you found that he was really the director of a large entertainment company in Japan.
"If you have time, we can go to the company to talk. The fee will definitely not be missing."
You went to the company with him, and he said that he saw you on the street at a glance and hoped that you could come to participate.
You thought you had nothing to lose and could make some money, so you signed the contract.
It's a large-scale love reality show, divided into two parts.
At the beginning, celebrities and ordinary people will get along with each other in real life and cultivate their tacit understanding.
Later, they will enter the game to pass the levels together.
Next week is the official recording and you don't know who your partner is going to be or what funny things are going to happen?
Can the system see the new order?
So what happens to that rider?
I think I can't accept that the order is not delivered after waiting for 20 minutes
Sabah's 3,200 newborn babies without birth certificates due to shortage of anti-counterfeiting paper
(KOTA KINABALU, Oct 11) The Sabah National Registration Department (NRD) said it has been unable to issue birth certificates to newborn babies since the beginning of October due to the depletion of stocks of special anti-counterfeit paper, affecting some 3,200 people to date.
However, the director of the department, Keruaminus, assured that all the data of the babies who have already applied for birth certificates have been recorded in the system, and will be reissued after the anti-counterfeiting paper is delivered next week.
He explained at the press conference in response to a report by a web media on the paper printing problem of Sabah newspapers for as long as 10 months.
He said the problem has been around for two months, and Sarawak also faces the same problem.
"One of the reasons is that the Chinese factory which produces special anti-counterfeiting paper is affected by the epidemic, leading to a delay in delivery to China. "
He explained that the security paper used for the Sabah birth certificate was different from that used in other areas, so it could not be borrowed from other states.
Keruak said that the latest batch of anti-counterfeiting paper arrived in Kuala Lumpur on the 6th of this month, and was handed over to the printing company on the 8th for printing.
"The department will send people to pick up the goods in Kuala Lumpur next Thursday, return to Sabah for the final stage of printing, and it is estimated that it will be delivered to the applicant within two working days (December 20). "
"We will notify the applicants to go to the local police stations to pick up the birth certificates. "
He added that Sabah has issued 24,801 birth certificates so far this year.
from 7 o'clock until now
Is that when it's going to happen?
I'm talking about food
I'm waiting across from #PRS_ORG
Okay, thank you, as the restaurant said it was ready
People's Daily Commentator: "14th Five-Year Plan" achieves a good start - Xinhuanet
Xinhua News Agency, Beijing, December 11 - The People's Daily commented on December 12: a good start to the "14th Five-Year Plan" -- on learning and implementing the spirit of the Central Economic Work Conference.
“Achieved a good start for the ‘14th Five-Year Plan’”, the Central Economic Work Conference held from December 8 to 10 highly praised the achievements of China’s economic and social development in the past year.
General Secretary Xi Jinping delivered an important speech at the meeting. He made a profound summary of the economic work in 2021, in-depth analysis of the current economic situation, and made a major deployment for the economic work in 2022, which has pointed out the direction for us to do a good job in next year's economic work, welcome the successful convening of the 20th National Congress of the Communist Party of China, and provided fundamental guidance.
We will celebrate the 100th anniversary of the founding of the Communist Party of China, formally announce the full construction of a moderately prosperous society and achieve the first centenary goal, and open a new journey to comprehensively build a socialist modernization country and march towards the second centenary goal.
We held the 6th plenary session of the 19th CPC Central Committee to summarize the major achievements and historical experience of the Party’s 100 years of struggle, and adopted the Resolution of the CPC Central Committee on the Major Achievements and Historical Experience of the Party’s 100 Years of Struggle, which is the political declaration of the Chinese Communist Party in the new era to remember the original intention and mission, adhere to and develop socialism with Chinese characteristics, and is the action guide to learn from history, open up the future, and achieve the great rejuvenation of the Chinese nation.
Over the past year, the great changes unseen in a century and the global COVID-19 pandemic have intertwined, and the external environment has become more complex and severe. The domestic COVID-19 prevention and control and economic and social development tasks are extremely heavy and difficult.
Under the leadership of Comrade Xi Jinping, the Party Central Committee has insisted on coordinating the two major domestic and international situations, insisted on the general tone of steady progress, remained calm in the face of a century of changes and a century of epidemics, coordinated epidemic prevention and control with economic and social development, accelerated the construction of a new development pattern, strengthened cross-cycle adjustment of macroeconomic policies, and made efforts to promote the continuous and healthy development of the economy, and made efforts to deepen reform, opening-up, and innovation, and worked hard to complete the difficult tasks of reform and development, and achieved new major achievements in all aspects of the Party and the country.
The "14th Five-Year Plan" has achieved a good start, and an important aspect is that the construction of a new development pattern has made new strides, and high-quality development has achieved new results.
China's economic development and epidemic prevention and control have maintained a leading position in the world, and the characteristics of strong resilience, great potential, and sufficient power have continued to appear; the national strategic technological force has accelerated its expansion, and major innovative achievements have emerged one after another, and the technological innovation capability has continued to improve, and the breakthrough of key core technologies has been achieved; the resilience of the industrial chain has been improved, and the quality and quantity of foreign trade has increased, and the structure has continued to be optimized, and the new forces represented by new industries, new business models, and new modes have grown and become strong; the reform and opening-up have continued to advance in depth, and efforts have been made to break the bottlenecks that hinder the adaptation of supply and demand and the flow of factors, and high-level opening-up has been used to create new competitive advantages; the protection of people's livelihood is powerful and effective, and the scale of employment has continued to expand, and the growth of residents' income has basically kept pace with economic growth, and the country has achieved "eighteen consecutive harvests" for seven years in a row; the construction of ecological civilization has continued to advance, and the work of carbon peaking and carbon neutrality
These achievements are the result of the strong leadership of the Party Central Committee with Comrade Xi Jinping as the core, the result of the scientific guidance of Xi Jinping Thought on Socialism with Chinese Characteristics for a New Era, and the result of the hard work of the whole Party and all ethnic groups in the country.
Practice has once again proved that the Party has established Comrade Xi Jinping as the core of the Party Central Committee and the core of the whole Party, and established Xi Jinping Thought on Socialism with Chinese Characteristics for a New Era as its guiding ideology. This is of decisive significance for the development of the cause of the Party and the country in the new era, and for promoting the historical process of the great rejuvenation of the Chinese nation.
With General Secretary Xi Jinping as the core of the Party Central Committee and the core of the whole Party, with the scientific guidance of Xi Jinping Thought on Socialism with Chinese Characteristics for a New Era, and with the unity of the whole Party and the whole nation and the tenacious struggle of all ethnic groups, we will certainly be able to overcome all kinds of difficulties and create a new era of glory and a new historical feat on the new journey of building a socialist modern country.
Next year, the 20th National Congress of the Communist Party of China will be held, which is a major event in the political life of the Party and the country.
We must carry forward the great spirit of founding the party, adhere to the general policy of steady progress, comprehensively, accurately and completely implement the new development concept, accelerate the construction of a new development pattern, comprehensively deepen reform and opening up, adhere to innovation-driven development, promote high-quality development, adhere to supply-side structural reform as the main line, coordinate epidemic prevention and control and economic and social development, coordinate development and security, continue to do a good job in the "six stabilizations" and "six guarantees", continuously improve people's livelihood, focus on stabilizing the macroeconomic situation, keep the economy running in a reasonable range, keep the social situation stable, and we will certainly keep a stable and healthy economic environment, a stable social environment, and a clean and positive political environment, and achieve excellent results to welcome the convening of the 20th National Congress of the Communist Party of China.
Let's unite more closely around the CPC Central Committee with Comrade Xi Jinping as the core, enhance the "four consciousnesses", be firm in the "four self-confidences" and do the "two maintenances", continuously improve our political judgment, political understanding and political implementation, and take practical actions to implement the decisions and arrangements of the CPC Central Committee, and continuously advance the cause of socialism with Chinese characteristics in the new era.
Then I'll use the points to reorder, thank you
Where is the pick-up address?
I can't see the address
Download the Suning App
Pay attention to the Su Ning Pusher public account
Self-purchase saves money, sharing makes money
Download the Suning Financial APP
Please pay attention to the service account of Suning.com
It is super convenient, just like opening on the computer, and it solves the trouble of my computer's hard disk shortage.
The newly arrived solid-state mobile hard drive cannot be read by the computer, and the computer does not recognize the solid-state mobile hard drive, but the computer can read the U disk.
The machine is very light, and its appearance is atmospheric and beautiful.
I used it for a whole afternoon today, and the heat dissipation was very good, and I basically didn’t feel hot. The running speed was very fast, and it killed 99% of users at startup.
The battery is also very powerful. It has a standby time of 9 hours and a use time of 4 hours. In short, it feels very happy to buy a machine of this quality at this price. Other functions will be supplemented later.
It looks pretty good.
In terms of performance, we will evaluate it after a period of time.
The machine is fast, larger than I imagined, and the rendering effect is great. I like it. I will follow up on the review after using it for a period of time.
OK, OK, the serial number of the machine can be found on the Hong Kong website, and the quality should be OK.
**The feeling is not big, but heavy, and it is not big in one hand. It is only a little bigger than 15.6 inches. It is really stable in operation, and there is no feeling of lag. The sound of the fan's heat dissipation is loved. It has a sense of feeling, and it does not always turn like a gaming laptop.
The stuff is good and much cheaper than the official flagship store. They also gave me a backpack. I think it's pretty good.
The shopkeeper's service was also good. He reminded me to update the BIOS, and issued the warranty card in time.
It's worth it!
Heat dissipation effect: good heat dissipation, basically no heat Thinness: convenient to carry Appearance material: Thinkpad traditional design, satisfactory
This seller has a good reputation, and has carefully checked the appearance of the whole machine, all the interfaces, and there are no traces of refurbishment or use. It is indeed a new American version machine, and the configuration is the same as the page.
I forgot to bring the backpack, and he immediately sent me another backpack, although it was not the standard original factory backpack, but the follow-up service was enough to prove that he was a conscientious seller.
If a friend needs to buy a notebook, buy it back.
Appearance material: The appearance is atmospheric; Display effect: The screen resolution is good, clear, and thinness degree: It has a good texture, after all, the heavier things feel better.
Cooling effect: I will evaluate it later.
The keyboard is pretty good for typing, and it comes with a mouse and a converter. This configuration is very cost-effective compared to the domestic version. All in all, it is cheap and beautiful. As for the performance of the machine, I will make an evaluation after using it for a period of time.
This screen is really comfortable!
It is very smooth to use, and I will review it after using it for a period of time!
Educational Information: Beijing Compresses the Proportion of Special Students for Middle School Admission in 2016 - Xinhua News Agency
On the 21st and 22nd, the entrance examination for middle school students with special talents in Beijing was organized and implemented by each district education committee.
This year, all districts in Beijing have compressed the proportion of special students, and the competition for special students has become more intense.
Take Dongcheng District as an example. This year, the proportion of primary school students who have been admitted to junior high school in Dongcheng District is generally not more than 5% of the total enrollment plan in the district. The number of enrolled students is 380, and the enrollment ratio is not more than 10% of the school's enrollment plan.
All students who have special talents in sports, arts, and technology and have registered online are eligible to participate in the enrollment examination of special students.
In order to make it convenient for students to participate in the examination, Dongcheng District continued the examination arrangements of last year, and set up 1~2 examination sites in each school district, with a total of 13 examination sites.
The examination points were divided according to the examination area, and the time was divided into units of hours. On the examination day, the students will enter the examination points in different examination areas according to the time period.
On May 23, the Education and Examination Center of the District publicized the list of students who passed the examination online, and the students can check the examination results online.
Can it be delivered in 10 to 15 minutes?
Did not receive food
The key is that I didn't eat anything tonight
If it can't be sent, you can say it earlier
Chairman of Bosnia and Herzegovina Olympic Committee: We believe that China has the ability to hold the Winter Olympic Games in special period - Xinhuanet
Xinhua News Agency, Sarajevo, December 11: The President of the Olympic Committee of Bosnia and Herzegovina, Kvesic, said recently that the Bosnian side is very much looking forward to the Beijing Winter Olympics and believes that China has the ability to hold a successful Winter Olympics during the special period.
Recently, Chinese Ambassador to Bosnia and Herzegovina, Ji Ping, met with the President of the Olympic Committee of Bosnia and Herzegovina, Kvesic, at the Olympic Center in Sarajevo.
During the meeting, Kvesic positively evaluated the relations between China and Bosnia and Herzegovina, and said that he had visited China at the time of the Beijing Summer Olympics in 2008, and was deeply impressed by the excellent organizational work of the Chinese side. He believed that China has the ability to hold the Winter Olympics in special times; the Bosnian side is very much looking forward to the Beijing Winter Olympics, and the Bosnian Olympic Committee is actively organizing participation; the Bosnian side hopes to use this as an opportunity to carry out more extensive exchanges and cooperation with the Chinese side in the field of sports.
Qi Ping said that China and Poland have a special “Olympic bond”.
The 1984 Sarajevo Winter Olympic Games were successfully held here, and two months later, the 2022 Beijing Winter Olympic Games will also open, presenting a simple, safe and wonderful event to the world.
We look forward to deepening exchanges and cooperation between the two countries in the preparation of winter sports events and the training of athletes. The Chinese Embassy in Bosnia and Herzegovina is willing to continue to play the role of a bridge, use the Beijing Winter Olympics as an opportunity, promote the continuous deepening of cultural exchanges between the two countries, and let the people of the two countries "go forward together", and wish the athletes of Bosnia and Herzegovina to achieve good results in Beijing.
Before the meeting, the Bosnia and Herzegovina Olympic Committee held the 10th annual best athlete award ceremony, and Ji Ping, as a special guest, awarded the best young athlete in Bosnia and Herzegovina.
The promotional video of the Beijing Winter Olympic Games was played in a loop at the event site.
So disappointing
Will I get a refund?
Dissatisfaction is not allowed! The shipping fee is 20 yuan
No way! Can you ask the restaurant for me?
Thanks for following along, of course some of the riders have also done very well
Chocolate-Obsessed [French] Dominique Enno, translated by Miao Xiaoxia Shanghai Science and Technology Press
Genuine books support seven-day no-reason exchange
Grandma's New Year's Eve said to learn to sing 24 solar terms to see the distant mountains in winter. My grandfather was a stupid child. My grandmother lived in a strange town. Dumplings and glutinous rice balls, a piece of chocolate, 2022
[Nora Books] The original version of "The Crying Chocolate" and "The Thief's Little Palm" written by Zhang Qiusheng, the original version of the first to third grades, the original version of the selected collection of classic story books, children's literature, and extracurricular books for primary school students.
[Jia Ying Book] 2022 Big reading small forest hundred classes thousand people second-grade grandma's New Year's Eve one piece of chocolate 24 solar terms grandpa is a stupid kid my grandma lives in a strange town dumplings and soup
【Nora Books】 Genuine Charlie and the Great Glass Elevator by Roald Dahl, a collection of works by Roald Dahl, a sequel to Charlie and the Chocolate Factory, translated by Ren Rongrong, children's literature for 7-9-12-year-olds, 3-4-5-6-7
All 13 volumes, The Fantastic Mr. Fox, Charlie and the Chocolate Factory, Roald Dahl works collection book, children's reading stories, 9-12 years old, grades 2, 4 and 5 out-of-school books without pinyin, Matilda round
The full set of 72 volumes in the Scary Science series, 12 volumes in the classic mathematics series, the new knowledge of classic science, the natural mystery, the electric shock horror, the chocolate secret, and the dangerous mathematics, and the popular science reading books for the third, fourth, fifth and sixth grades.
Some books are sold at a price higher than the price tag, please be careful when placing an order.
Chocolate in the office: seven ways to work and be happy (German) Written by Wei Sinuo - Translated by Chen Bao - Yunnan Science and Technology Publishing House [Original book, full discount.]
【Quick invoice, coupon ordering, high-quality after-sales service, support 7-day return and exchange without reason】
Zuo Qing said that the 6 authentic books of “Nora Books” are for 100 classes and 1,000 people, second-grade out-of-class books, a piece of chocolate, my grandfather is a stupid boy, saying to learn, laugh and sing the 24 solar terms, Qing winter sees the distant mountain dumplings, and the tangyuan picture book my grandmother
[Nora Books] The original version, Little Monster Ulala, 8 volumes of introductory picture books, exploring the chocolate factory, the transformation of transportation tools, the great adventure of luggage transportation, picture books for 3-4-5-6 years old
【Nora Books】The original version, you don’t understand coffee + wine + bread + chocolate + tea, baking, cooking, tasting, making, appreciation, food control, food culture, and the book is an interesting, interesting, and stylish life small encyclopedia
Won the White Bread Children's Book Award, suitable for reading by students in grades 3, 4, 5, and 6, story books, winter and summer vacation reading books, and extracurricular reading books.
[Nora Books] [3 Volumes] The French Blue Ribbon Dessert Handbook, Chocolate Dessert Class, Works of World Dessert Masters, 100 Recipes for Beginners
[Nora Books] Original edition of 3 books, the complete collection of works by Roald Dahl, including Charlie and the Chocolate Factory, Matilda, and Boy: Tales of Childhood, for children aged 6-12
Hello, I've been waiting for this order for a long time.
It keeps getting delayed
Thank you
Please help me cancel, re-order each order
Do I need to order to get credit?
Did you forget to deliver this?
What time can it be sent?
It's not going to happen
The code includes four $20 deductions
#NAME# says he helped me re-order
I ordered again and they charged me so much
But I ordered at 1:30
The State Council’s Joint Prevention and Control Mechanism issued a document to require strengthening the prevention and control of the epidemic in port cities within 48 hours of a negative nucleic acid test and setting up a “buffer zone”.
Xinhua News Agency, Beijing, December 11 (Reporters Dong Ruifeng and Gu Tiancheng) The State Council’s Joint Prevention and Control Mechanism recently issued a notice on strengthening the prevention and control of COVID-19 in port cities, requiring people who have left land border port cities (excluding those connected to Hong Kong and Macau) within the past 48 hours to hold a negative nucleic acid test certificate, and people going to land border port cities to undergo at least one nucleic acid test after arrival.
According to the notice, the time range of the above requirements is from the day when each province, autonomous region and municipality determine the range of port cities and announce it to March 15, 2022.
In addition, the notice also pointed out that port cities with conditions can study the setting up of an epidemic prevention and control buffer zone within their jurisdiction.
The relevant person in charge of the Disease Prevention and Control Bureau of the National Health and Family Planning Commission introduced that for some port cities, cross-border border trade is the main economic pillar of the local area, and the two sides of the border have frequent exchanges.
Implement a differentiated management policy for different regions, from one line of defense against the overflow of the epidemic to two lines of defense, which is expected to realize the shift of checkpoints, compress the risk of the overflow of the epidemic, and achieve the greatest effect of epidemic prevention and control with the least social impact and the lowest social cost.
Recently, a number of local cluster epidemics have occurred in China, all of which were imported from overseas through port cities.
The above notice pointed out that this has exposed some problems such as the lack of timeliness of epidemic monitoring and early warning in some places, the lack of implementation of closed-loop management of high-risk personnel, the formality of regular nucleic acid testing, the lack of disinfection at each link of cold chain items, the lack of standardized management of centralized isolation places, and the lack of scientific and accurate emergency response to the epidemic.
The notice requires that efforts should be made from 9 aspects, including improving the epidemic prevention and control mechanism of port cities, perfecting the epidemic monitoring and early warning system, and implementing border control measures, to accelerate the filling of the short board and weakness of port cities in epidemic prevention and control, and do a good job in prevention and control work in a scientific and precise manner, and weave a tight external prevention and control line.
The notice stressed that the port cities should carry out the epidemic prevention and control and people's livelihood protection work in parallel, publish and open up the hotline for people's livelihood protection, regularly inspect the supply and price of basic daily necessities, and solve and actively respond to the prominent problems reflected by the masses in a timely manner.
According to the notice, the port cities referred to include the counties (cities, districts, banners) where the open land, water, and air ports are located, the cities (prefectures, autonomous regions, leagues) where they are located, and the municipalities directly under the central government, and the specific scope will be determined and announced in a timely manner by each province (autonomous region, municipality directly under the central government) according to the needs of epidemic prevention and control.
Color: as shown in the picture (due to unavoidable color difference, the color closest to the actual object will be explained, and the light in outdoor shooting will make the color of the clothes brighter. Please consult in advance before purchasing)
This is a vintage item. If you are purchasing vintage clothing for the first time, please search for "vintage" or "vintage clothing" on Baidu.
A one-of-a-kind.
Second-hand products are bound to have minor flaws, so if you decide to buy second-hand products, you should be mentally prepared for this. If you are a perfectionist, please be careful. I will explain the more obvious flaws. This is a characteristic of second-hand products. In my opinion, a good thing doesn't care about that little bit of influence!
The store's vintage products are not accepted for return or exchange.
The so-called second-hand clothing, vintage, and design will all have a retro feel of the era, that is, nostalgia. The reason why people like second-hand clothing is that they like its sense of time and its texture!
Therefore, if a girl can't control it, don't say the clothes are old-fashioned, just say you're not suitable!
Don't buy at all if you have no risk-bearing ability, online shopping is risky, and shopping needs to be cautious.
If the item is not suitable for the buyer or the buyer does not like it, the buyer can ask the shopkeeper to put the item up for sale again. Once sold, it cannot be returned or exchanged. Do not bid if you cannot do it. Thank you for your cooperation!
Part of the circle was sold on June 11, 2021.
The antique items are sold on the basis of the number and cannot be returned or exchanged.
Purchase Notice
All goods sold in our store cannot be returned or exchanged
Please spend a few minutes reading the purchase instructions
Our products are all photographed with real objects. Some of the products may have a little color difference due to the problems of the display and light. We do not accept any color difference. Please see this clearly. Please consider carefully before purchasing. The color difference will not be used as the reason for the negative review and return or exchange.
We do not accept the difference from the imagination and the style and style as the reasons for return and exchange and negative reviews.
The size is measured by laying the actual object flat. There must be an error, but we believe that the error is very small. If you receive the size that is not suitable, it cannot be returned or exchanged, so you must consider carefully before.
If you have any questions, please contact me immediately. I will solve them with all my heart. If there is a malicious bad review, I will complain to the end.
We check everything thoroughly before it is sent out, and the quality will not be a problem.
After receiving the clothing, please confirm receipt and give us a review within 48 hours. Please understand our hard work.
Oil tube video reveals the truth about the 20-year bloodthirsty killing of the US military - Xinhuanet
(Video source: YouTube)
On December 11, a micro-documentary called "Killing Machine" on the YouTube platform attracted widespread attention.
The film tells the story of how the United States launched the Afghan war under the pretext of "anti-terrorism", forcibly exported American democracy through war, and committed various crimes against humanity for 20 years.
Abusing drones to attack hospitals, schools and other civilian places, distorting human nature, and establishing a murder group.
In the past 20 years, the U.S. military has killed tens of thousands of innocent Afghan civilians.
The U.S. military set up "black jails" and subjected "suspects" to all kinds of torture and personal humiliation.
A series of crimes against humanity has incited more hatred among the people of Afghanistan.
As the video said, the American "anti-terrorism" war is "the more it is, the more it is afraid".
War has not brought peace, democracy, prosperity and hope to the Afghan people. All it has brought is a devastated country and countless killings and destructions.
Click on the video, and let's expose the truth of the bloody massacre in the name of "anti-terrorism", and expose the hypocrisy of American democracy!
By chance, I saw an article as follows. From the perspective of business and shelf life, it talked about why this customer wanted the logistics company in the bonded area to do canning. Although canning belongs to deep processing and is not within the scope of business of the bonded logistics company, the following text may explain why the customer wanted to do this.
I have visited many milk powder factories and come into contact with many milk powder production lines.
In fact, the raw materials of bagged milk powder and canned milk powder are exactly the same, and there is no difference at all.
Then everyone will definitely ask: Why is the shelf life of bagged food one year, while the shelf life of canned food is two years or longer?
Or ask: Why is there such a big price difference between bags and bags?
In fact, from this point of view, many consumers or mother-level people think that the quality will be much better because the raw materials are different.
In fact, the raw materials are the same, but people think that the more expensive ones are better.
There are also consumers who eat it with such a mentality. After eating it, they say that the taste or flavor is different!
Now, I would like to tell you the reason why it is expensive to listen to. Why is it expensive?
Why is there such a big price difference when their raw materials are the same?
Because most of the manufacturers consider that if the price of bagging is too high, it is difficult for consumers to accept, which means that the profits of the manufacturers are very low or even no profits. How can the manufacturers survive?
Therefore, they have a large increase in the price of the hearing aid to ensure their profit space.
Therefore, most manufacturers mainly promote the listening installation, rather than the bag installation.
In addition, so many manufacturers spend tens of millions or even hundreds of millions of dollars on advertising every year. Where does this cost come from?
You can imagine.
Then, with the development of society, the promotion costs of the market, such as the promotional personnel of the shopping mall, the display costs of the shopping mall, the gift costs of the products, the advertising costs, etc. are constantly increasing.
Therefore, various manufacturers are also constantly adding new products, and they are listening to install, and their prices are also constantly rising. In fact, this is a new product that comes out with the increase of market costs.
The main purpose is to obtain higher profits. In fact, the cost increase of their raw materials will not exceed 3 or 4 yuan.
There are also some brands that will go to any lengths to promote their products. They cooperate with doctors in hospitals to assist in the promotion of their products. They can earn a profit ranging from RMB 30 to RMB 80.
China's relevant laws absolutely do not allow such operating methods. In fact, this method is to cheat consumers.
It is recommended that you buy powdered milk and put it in a can under the premise that there is a can at home. In this way, you can save costs, increase the preservation and sealing of powdered milk, and have no effect on children.
In addition, don't think that the shelf life of the bag is longer than that of the bag. If the shelf life of the bag is the same as that of the bag after opening, it is only said that the bag is not easy to save after opening, and it is easy to absorb moisture and deteriorate.
The delivery was late, and the food was cold. After cooling down, it was dry and hard, and it was completely impossible to eat.
And the broth spilled out
Cancelled straight away, anything #PRS_ORG# resends is definitely going to be cold
I didn't get one!
#NAME# said that no one went to pick it up
We called them up
I'll call the police if you don't refund
Used #PRS_ORG# many times, today was the worst experience
That is not acceptable at all
OK, I can
But it's also important to remind restaurants and riders
to prevent it from happening again
I would like to know the exact delivery time
That time kept getting pushed back
I don't know when
Can I get my money back if I cancel the order?
How can I pay service fees to the rider?
A rider was confirmed dead more than an hour ago
No longer willing to wait
Don’t scare people at the starting line-Xinhuanet
When you go to a book fair, you can often feel the popularity of success learning books.
Many of today's self-help books preach the "best principle" -- that is, first assume or imply that you can "do" something, and then tell you what it is that you need to "do."
In other words, it means bypassing the most important and fundamental link, "how to do it".
That is why all these books have one thing in common - either go all the way or don't go at all; either 100 or 0; either you climb the mountain or you just stay where you are.
This "best principle" makes everyone admit "absolute correctness", but 99% of people will be frightened before the starting line.
Because this theory advocates a path of "you need to make up your mind to be a new person and make a 180-degree change", which is precisely the fatal weakness of many people.
For those who are conservative, traditional, and refuse to change, you are shouting "you need to change" in their ears, which is obviously self-deception and beating a dead horse.
Most people will be at a loss in the face of the two words of "change", hesitate, and find it difficult to make up their minds. Or they will make the decision to "change" in a moment of impulse and courageously take the first step, but it is often short-lived, and it is difficult to persist for a long time.
Mr. Ma Sanli’s famous “From Tomorrow” skit is the most vivid expression of this “universal human nature” classic.
The biggest problem with the "best principle" is that the threshold is too high. It often exceeds the ability limit of ordinary people, making most people "sigh with envy".
Perhaps the "second-best principle" is a way for more ordinary people to walk on a relatively successful path.
The core of the "second-best principle" lies in "reducing the threshold" - it advocates a theory of "accumulating small wins for big wins", that is, if you can't do 100, you can do 1: because 1 is always greater than 0; if you can't climb Mount Tai, you can climb the little sand dune in front of your door, because it is better than standing still.
In short, it is always better to do something than to do nothing.
With the threshold greatly lowered, it is more possible for ordinary people to persist, and the probability of success will also increase as long as they persist.
However, the road to success following the "second-best principle" is slightly longer.
All in all, the "best principle", although it sounds like a flag for everyone's success, is actually able to motivate only a few, while the "second-best principle" can effectively motivate more people and benefit more people as much as possible.
Do I need to place a new order now?
Calls to the number went unanswered.
Constant delays
Not sent yet
When will it be delivered?
How can I get in touch?
Please cancel the order
I can't wait any longer, thank you
He was two meals short, but one order was completed
I would like to ask how to contact the riders
The first rider told me just now that there will be another rider to deliver
This year, the resources of naked carp in Qinghai Lake increased by 7,100 tons - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Xining, December 11 (Reporters Luo Xiaofei, Zhang Hongxiang) The reporters learned from the Qinghai Provincial Department of Agriculture and Rural Affairs that the latest monitoring results showed that the resource reserves of naked carp in Qinghai Lake increased by 0.71,000 tons this year compared with last year, reaching 10.85,000 tons. Compared with the early protection in 2002, it has increased by more than 40 times.
Qinghai Lake naked carp, also known as "Huan fish", is a precious fish species unique to Qinghai Lake. It plays a crucial role in maintaining the safety and biodiversity of the "water-fish-bird" ecological chain in the Qinghai Lake region.
In the 1960s and 1970s of the 20th century, the Qinghai Lake naked carp population decreased sharply under the influence of factors such as massive hunting by humans and the deterioration of the breeding environment of naked carp. In 2002, the amount of Qinghai Lake naked carp resources was only 2,592 tons.
In 2004, Qinghai Lake naked carp was listed as an endangered species in the China Red Book of Endangered Species.
Since 2003, Qinghai Province has implemented the closure of lakes to breed fish, and prohibited any unit, collective or individual from catching naked carp in Qinghai Lake and its main rivers and tributaries, and prohibited the sale of naked carp and its products.
At the same time, through artificial breeding and release, as well as cleaning the main river channels of Qinghai Lake, and designing a scientific and reasonable “fish passage”, the Qinghai Lake naked carp resources are increasing year by year.
Yang Lin, the deputy director of the Qinghai Provincial Department of Agriculture and Rural Affairs, introduced that as of now, Qinghai Lake naked carp had implemented artificial breeding and release of nearly 180 million tail, contributing more than 23% to the recovery of Qinghai Lake naked carp resources.
The Sanjiangyuan Region in Qinghai is an important ecological barrier and water source conservation area in China and even in Asia, and Qinghai Lake is a natural barrier and an ecological functional zone to control the eastward spread of western desertification.
In order to protect the ecological environment of the Three-River Source Region and Qinghai Lake, protect aquatic wild animals, and maintain the biological diversity of the Qinghai-Tibet Plateau, Qinghai has issued fishing ban notices for key water areas of the Yangtze River, the Yellow River, and Qinghai Lake one after another since this year, building a "one river, one river, and one lake" comprehensive fishing ban management system.
I spent over $180 on food with my #PRS_ORG# RED credit card.
But the order was not deducted $20
The original software is free to try, and can be used on a computer and a mobile phone without a paper version.
2022 Ye Junnan's Advanced English-Chinese Translation Theory and Practice (2nd edition) notes and detailed explanation of postgraduate entrance examination questions/Master's degree entrance examination syllabus teaching materials review materials entrance examination
2022 Notes and Post-Class Exercises (with Typical Questions) of Modern TV Journalism by Leaf/Master's Degree Examination Outline Teaching Materials Revision Materials Entrance Examination Questions
Original mobile photography for beginners. It’s super easy to take beautiful photos. Tutorial for capture skills, photography composition and use of light techniques, mobile photography tutorial book, and app software photography post-processing.
Quality books, copyright guarantee, quality service, timely delivery, worry-free after-sales
Red Hat Linux System Administration All-in-One (with CD-ROM)
Animal novel king Shen Shixi’s collection of books: Tiger cub golden leaf [contact customer service for group purchase]
The book information is collected and uploaded by the software. If there are errors in the information, please refer to the actual product received. If you mind, please do not take pictures!
If you have any problems, please contact the online customer service!
The restaurant only gave me one bag, and I had to put it in the bag because it was cold
I just wanted to ask, is the takeaway in a bag?
We only saw one bag
Would like to know if it was lost or if someone took it, thanks
It's been an hour and it still hasn't arrived
I just saw a long article about fake cases.
For those men who don't know.
Most girls will suddenly experience their first period one day between the ages of 13-15, and will go through menopause around the age of 50.
After being in good health, it will come more regularly once a month.
However, it is not regular enough to make accurate predictions, with a margin of error of about a week. You need to prepare in advance. Sometimes, if you are unlucky, it will crash (suddenly advance a few days).
The length of time, the amount of blood, and the severity of pain vary from person to person, some people have it for three days, some people have it for a week; some people have light bleeding, some people have heavy bleeding; some people have no reaction, some people are so painful that an ambulance has to take them away; the severity of dysmenorrhea will change with time, and just because you didn't have it before doesn't mean you won't have it for the rest of your life.
Menstruation cannot be controlled. During the days from the beginning to the end, 24-hour bleeding can only be prevented from flowing onto clothes and chairs by using sanitary napkins or sanitary cotton.
Dysmenorrhea is mainly caused by the secretion of prostaglandin. It is effective to take ibuprofen to effectively relieve the pain of that month when the dysmenorrhea has not started, but it is useless to take ibuprofen after the dysmenorrhea has started.
Diarrhea is common before the menstrual period due to the congestion of the uterus and excessive release of prostaglandins.
If the period is about to come, the stomach will be upset for no reason, and the period will come within two days.
Sanitary napkins should be changed every two or three hours, otherwise it is easy to breed bacteria. Excluding sleep time, the worst case is to change it 6 times a day, 7 days a month, that is, 42 pieces. If you add the pieces prepared in advance, there may be 50 pieces, which is not one piece a month.
(Here is a change, the sanitary pad does not need to be changed frequently, it can be changed every five or six hours, and the longest is eight hours)
During the menstrual cycle, the hormones may make you more irritable, and during the ovulation period, because of the changes in the body's hormones, the mood will be unstable, which is very unfortunate, and the body is tripping you up.
However, the official crime rate data shows that the ability of women to control their emotions is still very high, and they will not use emotional issues as an excuse.
The flow isn't just blood, it also contains shed uterine lining.
After menstruation, the endometrium is the thinnest, and then gradually thickens. It can be understood that the uterus is a house, and a house is built every month (the endometrium thickens) to prepare to welcome guests. If the guests do not come, they are all demolished (menstruation is discharged) and a new house is built the next month, and so on and so forth.
Menstruation is very inconvenient. For several decades, a few days every month, 24 hours of bleeding, with abdominal pain and back pain. Who would like it?
But people are born because their mothers had periods, which are there to prepare the 10-month-long house you'll live in when you first come into the world, so thank your mother for having regular, healthy periods.
In the past, many things about women were suppressed, and society brainwashed women that they were dirty and shameful. Everyone thought that this was the case, but the times have changed.
If someone thinks menstruation is disgusting, and thinks that the preparation of a woman's body for the birth of life is disgusting, they should not say it out loud in public. Girls should stand up and stop thinking this way. Men who have never experienced it, will never experience it, and do not know much about it, should not be so ungrateful and ignorant. How can they face their mothers with such an attitude? How can they want their own children?
Finally, sisters, try the sanitary cotton bar. It is really useful.
Today is the winter solstice, and it is disappointing to send the wrong one
You have to order separately for the kids to eat
It is hoped that shops will check their products in the midst of their busy schedules
Is my foot spa electrocuting me when I put my feet in it?
A suitable foot bath can play a good role in foot therapy and health care. Today, the Gome editor will answer this question and hope it will be helpful to friends.
As people's awareness of health has increased, foot bath tubs have become more and more popular among consumers, and a large number of products of different grades have emerged in the market. From more than 100 yuan to more than 1,000 yuan, there are a lot of foot bath tubs for consumers to choose from.
On the surface of the relevant data, compared with traditional home appliances, the sales of health care home appliances such as foot bath tubs are booming, but foot bath tubs do not have special industry standards, so there are certain safety hazards.
"Soaking your feet in an electrically charged water is just too dangerous!"
Mr. Li told the reporter that he recently bought a foot bath for his father as a birthday gift, but his father felt numbness in his feet while soaking his feet.
At first, Mr. Li thought it was caused by the vibration function of the foot bath, but he did not expect that after turning off the vibration function, his father still felt numbness in his feet.
Mr. Li used an electric pen to test and found that the electric pen actually lit up. Mr. Li was surprised to find that the water in the foot bath tub was actually electrified.
Later, he contacted the merchant, and the merchant's attitude was not bad, although he returned the foot bath, Mr. Li still felt unhappy.
Because he found that there was no clear and detailed industry regulations on the maximum temperature setting, the target group, and the material guarantee of the foot bath, which has been popular for a long time.
However, in general, footbaths will not have electrical problems, but it is not excluded that a few products are not strictly inspected at the time of production.
Therefore, when purchasing, choose the separate foot bath.
Water and electricity are separated, and there is no safety hazard.
At the same time, you can measure with an electric pen at will.
The 13th Provincial Tea Expo Opens - Headlines - Hunan Daily Network - Huasheng Online
Hunan Daily, December 10 (Full-media reporter Zhang Shangwu, Hu Panpan, correspondent Liu Xiaoling, photography Li Jian) Today in the morning, the 13th Hunan Tea Industry Expo and Xinyu Red Tea Promotion Meeting was held at the Hunan International Convention and Exhibition Center, showcasing the tea industry, innovating tea technology, promoting tea culture, and accelerating the sprint to the 100 billion tea industry goal.
Hou Shunli, Deputy Chairman of the Board of Directors of the All-China Federation of Supply and Marketing Cooperatives, and Ye Hong, Deputy Chairman of the Standing Committee of the Provincial People's Congress attended the opening ceremony.
Professor Liu Zhonghua, an academician of the Chinese Academy of Engineering, made a grand introduction at the opening ceremony: the origin of the lake red is new in Xinhua, and the rise of red tea injects new vitality into the "colorful Xiang tea".
In recent years, the Provincial Party Committee and Provincial Government have actively supported the development of the tea industry, promoted the construction of the 100 billion yuan Xiang tea industry, and formed the development pattern of “three Xiangs, four waters and five-colored tea”.
The tea industry within the province has increased its innovation, with green tea, black tea, red tea and other major tea varieties taking turns to make efforts, and the main tea-producing areas have promoted the integration of tea and travel to drive the increase in income of a large number of tea farmers.
Fengshui changes, and red tea is on the rise again.
Experts in the tea industry in the province said that after picking green tea, picking red tea and black tea, tea farmers have income all year round, and the value of tea gardens increases in a straight line.
At the opening ceremony, the provincial leaders awarded the fourth batch of enterprises with the right to use the “Hunan Red Tea” trademark, and Xinyang was happy to hold the “Lake Red Tea Source”.
At the Xinhua Red Tea Museum, Fujian tea merchants took a fancy to a high mountain tea named "Bingliushun" and immediately placed an order.
Wang Jun, the Secretary-General of the Provincial Tea Industry Association, said happily that the current epidemic and other factors have more or less affected the tea market, but from the scene of the Tea Expo, there are many highlights.
The new-style red tea is a shade of red, which injects the connotation of tea culture. The popularity is high and the transaction is hot, and the Xiang tea industry welcomes a new spring.
What if these foods are not hot? Can they be cancelled?
I don't want it, it didn't make it up due to no parking below
Metaphysics is the study of questions that cannot be answered by rational reasoning and logic.
Metaphysics is the fundamental law of philosophy, aiming to explain the basic nature of existence and the world.
The Chinese translation of "metaphysics" is derived from the phrase "形而上者谓之道，形而下者谓之器" in the "Systematic Arrangement Above" of the Book of Changes, which was translated into Japanese by Inoue Tetsujirō (in the Meiji era).
Branches of metaphysics include ontology, natural theology, and related issues.
Ontology is the study of "which nouns represent real existing entities and which nouns only represent a concept."
Metaphysical naturalism is the denial of the existence of God.
Its theoretical foundation holds that all phenomena can be explained by the concept of natural reasons, proposed by philosophers who support science and evolution theory.
Methodological naturalism, on the other hand, refers to a research method that is silent on God.
Phenomenology is a branch of philosophy that studies the nature of consciousness and its relation to the body, especially the brain.
Dualism and monism are the two main schools of thought in discussing the "relationship between mind and body".
Epistemology is a branch of philosophy that explores the nature, origin, and scope of knowledge.
Ethics is the systematic study of human moral life; here, morality is defined as all the rules of conduct recognized by a particular group or culture.
Mainly divided into meta-ethics (abstractly study the essence of moral theory or criticism) and normative ethics (judge various different moral views, and give moral criteria for right or wrong behavior.
It studies what kind of moral behavior people should follow), applied ethics (the academic study of applying ethical theory to real-life situations, including bioethics, political ethics, etc.), and descriptive ethics (collecting information about how people live, summarizing the observed patterns.
It does not start with a preconceived theory of morality, but rather investigates the actual decisions made by real moral agents, and all of the moral factors that led to those decisions, as well as the moral views held by social groups.
The history of ethics includes Greek and Roman ethics, medieval Christian ethics.
The first part is the ethical thought of humanism, represented by Valla and Montaigne.
The second part: the ethical thought of the Reformation, represented by Calvin.
The third part is political ethics, represented by Machiavelli and others, modern ethics (17-18th century, British empiricist ethics, represented by Hume and others, 17-18th century, European rationalist ethics, represented by Spinoza and others, 18th century, French enlightenment ethics, represented by Voltaire and others, 18-19th century, German academic ethics, represented by Kant and Hegel and others, 18-19th century, British utilitarian ethics, represented by Bentham and Westcott and others, 19th century, British evolutionist ethics, represented by Spencer and Huxley and others, late 19th century, German neo-Kantian ethics, represented by Lieber and others, late 19th century, neo-Hegelian ethics, represented by Thomas Hill Green and others), and transitional ethics (non-rationalist ethics, represented by Kierkegaard, Schopenhauer, and Nietzsche).
Logic is the study of "principles and standards of valid inference and proof".
Logic usually includes three parts: inductive reasoning, abductive reasoning and deductive reasoning, which can be divided into formal logic and informal logic.
Aesthetics is a discipline that focuses on the study of the essence of beauty and its meaning.
#NUMBER# yuan has been received, and it is food that has been sent by mistake
Yangxingche, whose real name was Jiang Bo, was born in the year of the sheep, on the month of the sheep, on the grass of the sheep, and was therefore called Yangxingche. People call him "Uncle Yang".
He is known as a "suspense genius" in the industry because of his works such as "Tales of Thailand", "Tales of India", "Tales of Japan" and "Tales of South Korea" in the "Strange Code" series, and he claims to be "good at telling lies with a straight face".
"Under the Lamplight", also known as "Chinese Strange Tales", the "suspense genius" Yangxinglie uses his new work "Under the Lamplight" to take you deep into the essence of Chinese folk customs. What kind of beautiful and touching love and hatred songs are behind the legends that have been passed down to this day?
"The Wayward Children" Nan Xiaolou and Yue Wuhua once again set out on a journey of self-destruction, and their origins are about to be revealed.
The “mystery genius” Yang Xing has white hair, and millions of best-selling books have been presented!
The official version of "China's Strange Tales" and the new work after "Exotic Code", the same author, the same protagonist, and the unfinished story of "Thailand's Strange Tales" and "India's Strange Tales"!
It's missing one item, and you have to pay for a bucket of chicken sauce
You call the restaurant to bring it up
I just didn't want to go downstairs to buy things, so I spent so much money to order takeout
Ding Zilin: To friends.
I would like to sincerely thank all my friends for the humanitarian assistance they have given us over the past 30 years since the death of our loved ones. In particular, I would like to thank them for their assistance, which has never been interrupted since I issued a call for humanitarian assistance to friends at home and abroad in my own name in early 1994.
At present, most of the deceased's parents have passed away, and their children have grown up and have jobs.
It is your kindness that has helped us through the most difficult times.
Currently, the COVID-19 epidemic is raging around the world, and most of the donors are already retired.
Therefore, I earnestly request you to stop the humanitarian donation to the Tiananmen Mothers group, which should have ended a long time ago.
I will always remember your love, and I believe that your efforts will be recorded in history.
Due to various reasons, I can only express my will in this way. Please forgive me, my friends!
I wish you all the best.
Tao Ye said: Please allow me to take this opportunity to make a brief introduction to the 32-year history of the International Federation of Chinese Students and Scholars (IFCSS) and the Minnesota China Democracy Foundation (MCDF) engaged in humanitarian assistance.
During the process of humanitarian assistance, the American Student Union and the Minnesota China Democratic Foundation are two parallel organizations, and the project implementers often overlap.
(Apple Daily Photo: The Tiananmen Mothers website is managed by Tao Ye.) pic.twitter.com/UxID9ZGjzm
Aid money often fails to reach the hands of June 4 victims.
In 1994, at the suggestion of Teacher Ding, a special group was established by the "Tiananmen Mothers" to coordinate and take charge of the reception and distribution of relief funds.
In 1998, MCDF established the June 4th Orphan Education Fund, which was implemented for 11 years, and in 2009, after all the June 4th orphans had graduated from university, MCDF established the June 4th Orphaned Elderly Special Poverty Relief Fund, which has been implemented to this day.
These projects are mainly funded by the campus and social donations in 1989, individual generous donations, and supported by the Democracy Foundation of sister universities.
Since 2018, it has also been supported by the Laogai Research Foundation.
It was not until last year, 31 years later, that the June 4 victims finally received a portion of the donations collected in Hong Kong in the name of June 4.
During this time, Chinese Human Rights Defenders was also independently implementing its humanitarian relief projects.
We understand that Mr. Ding stopped the June 4th donation for the consideration of the donors, and we are indeed some retired old people. Our income is not as abundant as before retirement, so we would like to express our gratitude to Mr. Ding’s “Dear Friend” letter.
We will respect the decision of the asylum seekers and stop this project within two years, and resume it immediately when needed.
I would like to express my thanks and respect to those brave compatriots who have always been generous and risked their lives to deliver humanitarian aid over the years.
Brand: Mesobiosystem
Origin: Mainland China
Color classification: Droplet chip 1, Droplet chip 2, Droplet chip 3, Droplet chip 4, Droplet chip 5, Droplet chip 6, Droplet chip 7, Droplet chip 8, Double layer droplet
Thank you for choosing our products. Before using our chips, please spend 5 minutes reading the following content carefully:
After opening the package, please check if the goods are complete.
If there are any omissions, please contact the customer service in time.
The cover plate of the microfluidic chip is made of PC material, and please do not expose it to solvents that react chemically with PC.
Do not use a hand-held syringe to inject directly into the chip, otherwise it is easy to leak.
The microfluidic chips with common substrates are all tested with pure water at a sample pressure of 500mbar (100um channel depth) or 300mbar (50um channel depth) before delivery.
All glass-based chips are tested with pure water at 800mbar (100um channel) injection pressure before shipping. Please note that the glass-based chips should not be collided with sharp objects during use, otherwise it will damage the substrate.
When using, consider the viscosity of the solution and do not exceed this range, otherwise it will cause leakage.
For the common base microfluidic microchip, we recommend that the flow rate is set below 150ul/min under the condition that the injection pump uses pure water as the sample, and the oil phase flow rate is recommended to be set below 50ul/min.
Please consider the actual viscosity of the sample liquid, and increase your flow rate parameter value from slow to fast.
After the experiment, please clean the internal channels of the universal chip in time, otherwise it is easy to cause blockage.
The microfluidic chip is a consumable and cannot be reused for a long time.
If the chip is damaged due to long-term use or improper operation, it will not be returned or exchanged.
If you need a microfluidic chip that can withstand greater pressure or flow rate, please contact customer service for customization.
The normal delivery cycle of the chip is within 1 week, the in-stock inventory can be shipped within 24 hours, and please consult the customer service before placing the order.
If you have any questions about how to connect our chip with the injection system, you can refer to the following link: https://zhuanlan.zhihu.com/p/60474873, or search for the WeChat public account "Mesoscience" to get more help.
You can also visit our website (http://www.mesobiosys.com) to download the brochure to view all of our products.
For more information on our products, please contact our online customer service.
I'm on the other side of #PRS_ORG#
Hello
May I ask, the order time is getting longer and longer
How long does it take to deliver?
The original time was 16:10-16:30.
Then I'll wait until 7:30 to see if it can be delivered.
Where does Holy Street lead to?
Which street in Hong Kong leads to St. Andrew's Street?
How is the order situation now?
I entered in December
Therefore, this month you can enjoy a $20 discount 4 times with #PRS_ORG# RED credit card
I didn't get the order, can you help me check if the rider is still on the way?
Can you help me contact the rider to ask if he is still on the way?
I didn't get the order, checked and there was no food, no one contacted me to say it was cancelled
In normal times, there are takeaways, and the management downstairs will call to ask. After asking, they will let people in first. However, the management office has never contacted me.
Design, ubiquitous (Recommended in the Reading Guide for Middle School and High School Students)
Cambridge Bilingual graded readers: Novels, Fatal Memory (Level 2, Cambridge KET level, more than 800 words)
The original version of Cambridge, an international award-winning work, has been popular for 20 years all over the world. Young people all over the world are reading at the same time. The library catalogue of primary and secondary schools in the country, the compilation of teachers in key middle schools in the country, and the scan of the QR code to listen to the theatrical effect recording of English and American sounds
[New] A black book about color Peng Yi's hardcover picture book for 3 to 6-year-old children's picture books were selected for the new reading basic catalog of Bologna Children's Book Fair Preschool children's reading materials Relay Press genuine
New genuine products, available for invoicing, with discounts for group purchases
[Overseas direct purchase from Zhongshang] Descriptive Catalogue of the Writings of Sir Walter
The design of [Xiaoli Translation Primary and Middle School Reading Series] is everywhere (selected in the Reading Guidance Catalogue for Primary and Middle School Students) Zexuanran Books
A black book about colors Peng Yi hardcover picture book for children aged 3 to 6 won the Bologna Children's Book Award and was selected for the New Reading Basic Directory Preschool children's reading materials Relay Publishing House authentic edition
[Can be invoiced] Original Century witness Danica Seleskovic, great interpreter, biographical literature, biography, simultaneous interpretation, language translation, reference books for teachers and students
Original in-stock 20th Century Witnesses The great translator Danica Seljakovic Biographical literature Biography literature Simultaneous interpretation Language translator and student reference book Research publishing house
[Original book] [Xiao Yulin primary and middle school reading series] design, everywhere (selected in the reading guidance catalogue for primary and middle school students) [tax invoice can be developed]
With the testimony of #PRS_ORG#, no one went to get it, #PRS_ORG# accused me of being self-serving
I'm saying it again, I was making a delivery
When others are done, you don't have anyone to deliver the food, and then you accuse me of taking it for granted
I asked you to cancel it immediately, otherwise I will call the police
Time Capsule Photography has no branches for the time being
Members' evaluation
[Effect] Photo effect: I took two sets of clothes. Overall, it's not bad. I like this set of pictures.
[Service] Service details: I felt a little uncomfortable when I was having my makeup done because I was pregnant. The makeup artist and the staff were very considerate. They let me rest for a while and kept pouring hot water for me.
Package price: 1,000 yuan
Thank you for the rabbit’s review. I originally said that ancient style is not suitable for ancient style, but I didn’t expect the finished product to be so beautiful.
Thank you for Dandan's recognition. Your satisfaction will give us full power to move forward. We will continue to work hard!
This photography studio is really great. I strongly recommend all of you to come here!
From reception, makeup, clothing, lighting, photography to post-production, there was nothing to complain about.
The makeup artists are particularly meticulous and will match your makeup according to your style, and the cosmetics used are all top brands.
It goes without saying that Mr. Tian Liang is very professional in photography.
The whole studio has an artistic atmosphere, and there are two little cats to play with.
We are working in Beijing, and the better photography studios in Beijing need to be booked half a year in advance. Some of my colleagues have taken photos in Beijing, and I took a look at the whole set and thought it was just so-so.
I found this studio on purpose, a place with soul and attitude.
Our facial expression management is not very good, and we feel that this is also the short version of most people. The photographer, Brother Liang, will capture and record the natural and wonderful moments.
Makeup artist, photographer, post-production designer, a great team.
When it came out, everyone around me and I couldn't stop talking about it.
I have already recommended my best friend to go, and my best friend is also very happy after seeing the film.
I hope that such a studio will not be buried, and that more people will discover it and shoot in their own style, rather than being all the same.
Thank you very much for the five-star reviews of Zhan Ying and Jing Ling. Both of them are very thoughtful and creative newcomers. We are a creative studio. As long as the customers like us, we will do our best to complete it. Thank you for knowing and meeting
Sweet and considerate assistant, and lively and cheerful photography teacher, every member of the team is super nice. It was a wonderful shooting, an unforgettable experience, and the effect of the shooting was much better than I expected. Everyone worked hard, and I am very grateful to everyone.
Thank you for Xiaoyu's comments. Meeting you is also a fate. From Hohhot to Qinhuangdao, our trust is thousands of kilometers away. I am very happy to meet you. I will come to Qinhuangdao to play next time.
How do I pay?
The redelivered meal has arrived
No riders to receive
Now the restaurant staff are calling me
A programming novice who wants to share his personal experience.
If you intend to enter this industry, you can choose to go to a place for training, but if you don't have this idea, it's better to learn by yourself. After all, the cost of training is very high, and it takes 6 months to learn.
But if you intend to enter this industry, training is indeed a very good choice, especially for those who are very weak in self-control. Training is a very good choice.
If you have strong self-control, you can also choose to self-study, but it will be more tiring.
Of course, choosing a good training institution is very important.
First of all, we should look at the teaching strength of this institution. If the teaching strength is not strong enough, this training institution is meaningless. Of course, the teaching strength of some newly established training institutions is not particularly strong.
In addition, it is better to inquire about this training institution before making a choice, and it is best to inquire about the students who have come out of this institution. After all, only the students of this institution know what this institution is like and whether the courses are good or not.
Hello, in fact, I don’t know how to answer your question, because I haven’t introduced your own situation, and learning this thing has a lot to do with your own situation.
For example, your profession, age, the language you want to learn, and even the city you are in, are all related to the industry you are learning or want to engage in.
If you are a student and have not graduated yet, or if you are a computer science major who has already graduated, I personally recommend self-study if you have enough time. This is the most efficient and cost-effective way. Nowadays, many offline and online training institutions are actually very good, but the learning cost is high, and the time invested is relatively long. Basically, you need to concentrate on training for 3-6 months.
But if it's what I said, it's very convenient to self-learn. Now many learning resources on the Internet are free, or you can go to Bilibili to get a lot of training resources. If you don't know how to find resources, you can also contact me through the introduction to get free resources or detailed consultation.
There are also some classic books that can be learned in combination with videos.
If you are not a computer major, but can pay a certain amount of learning money and time costs, it is recommended that you go to a training institution to learn, so that you don't have to study hard, and the teachers explain in detail. If you have any questions, someone will answer them. In addition, it is also helpful in terms of learning planning or supervision.
In addition, many training institutions will sign employment agreements, have internal recommendation positions, and recommend going to the company after learning. In this way, the interview process of finding a job in the later stage can save a lot of things.
The above are some of my opinions. I have not introduced in detail because I do not know your situation. If you have other questions, you can contact me at any time for communication.
I said I'd be there before 1, I saw it on the app
What is
I'm not done yet, what are you doing?
I accept all kinds of (installation, cleaning, maintenance), wall-mounted water heater, water purifier, washing machine, air conditioner, toilet, stove, range hood, installation of lamps and lanterns, professional beautification, housekeeping service
Thanks to those who gave me a silent thumbs up, work hard for life. Life is tiring, but you have to go on.
Life will not disappoint every hard-working person. If you like it, please follow me. Thanks to those who silently gave me a like.
Life is like this. Others only look at the results, but you have to carry the process on your own. In the face of life, we have no choice but to be strong and continue. We can look back at the road, but we can’t go back.
Cleaning is a job and a responsibility. Life is beautiful because of service, and service is wonderful because of sincerity.
Although cleaning is the dirtiest job, we will use the most serious attitude to clean every corner of the customer's house. When we see the customer's satisfied smile and thumbs up, all the fatigue is worth it. Our efforts will be rewarded!
My daily work
Your request, my service.
Serve with heart, clean with heart, keep the beauty.
The details you care about, Fenggui Home Care helps you do "clean" as much as I can, and serves the love of home.
Keep Wanjia clean, build a monument to home cleanliness, service in place, and cleanliness at home.
Indoor and outdoor cleaning is my daily work.
Although the crystal light is gorgeous, it will fade if it is not cleaned for a long time. Only after cleaning can it shine. Life is the same.
Only when you put your heart into it can you succeed, and only when you are meticulous can you create exquisiteness. We are serious about beautifying the cracks.
Give me a chance, and I will definitely make you satisfied. Quality speaks for itself, because professionalism is worthy of trust. Your recognition is my greatest encouragement!
It's not easy to do business in any industry these days!
However, I always believe that as long as I work hard, I will be better than others. At least it is better than sitting and complaining."
A day’s plan starts in the morning. All the good things begin in the early morning. I wish you to start a new day with happiness, luck, health, and wishes. Good morning.
When I was young, happiness was a thing; when I grew up, it was a goal; when I became mature, I found that happiness was an attitude.
Be the most real and kindest self, follow your heart, and have no regrets in this life; life is a road, walk your own way; life has two treasures: a good body and a good mood, and live a bright life until old age!
Every stage of life will encounter different difficulties.
Often, what holds you back is not the ability but the courage to face it positively.
Since it can't be avoided, it's better to face it squarely.
The more afraid you are, the more you will be defeated by difficulties; if you meet difficulties head-on, problems will eventually be solved.
China-Arab curators join hands to hold the first contemporary art biennial in Saudi Arabia - Xinhuanet
Riyadh, Dec. 12 (Xinhua) -- The first contemporary art biennial in Saudi Arabia - the Diriyah Contemporary Art Biennial - was officially opened to the public on Dec. 11 at the Diriyah JAX art district in the northwest of Riyadh, the capital of Saudi Arabia. A total of 64 artists from Saudi Arabia, China and other places participated in the exhibition.
This biennale is co-organized by the Diriyah Biennale Foundation in Saudi Arabia and the UCCA Ullens Center for Contemporary Art in China. Tian Feiyue, the director of the UCCA Ullens Center for Contemporary Art in China, serves as the artistic director.
According to the curating team, the theme of this biennial exhibition is "Crossing the River by Feeling the Stones", which is a metaphor for the reform strategies adopted during the period of social and economic transformation, and also reflects the current situation of the social and cultural development of Saudi Arabia.
This biennial covers an area of nearly 12,000 square meters and spans six interconnected buildings. It is presented in six units: "Crossing the River by Feeling the Stones", "Inheritance as Experiment", "Edge Thinking", "Towards the Public", "Beautiful New World" and "On the Spirit of Art".
Among them, the works of 27 Saudi artists account for more than 40% of the total number of exhibits, covering various forms such as painting, installation art and performance art; the works of 12 Chinese artists are also very popular. Some artists use recycled materials in a novel way to create. For example, Xu Bing used waste to reconstruct a classic landscape painting in "The Story Behind the Series of Streams and Mountains" (2014).
Buckley, CEO of the Diriyah Biennale Foundation, said that he hoped that this biennale will establish international dialogue, give global audiences the opportunity to understand Saudi Arabia’s booming cultural industry and creative community, and enhance interaction.
Tian Feiyue said: "The goal of the biennale is twofold: on the one hand, it allows Saudi contemporary art to participate in global dialogue, and on the other hand, it allows Saudi audiences to integrate into the contemporary art world. "
It is understood that during the opening week of the biennial, a series of lectures will be held. Artists, curators, and opinion leaders in the creative industry will discuss topics such as cross-cultural exchanges and the development of contemporary art.
I ordered the tomahawk chop
The restaurant told me that riders can't deliver the bones
to find out the reasons
The bones can be, call the restaurant to pack up and deliver separately
However, the system is not very convenient, and they all use another
I'm at #ADDRESS#, the branch in Myeongdong
I'm a long way from there
100+ Practical Business English Conversation Scenarios Business English Conversation Encyclopedia (with multiple language learning gifts)
10 minutes a day, even a beginner can easily speak!
Common business scenarios are covered, common business English expressions are included, and business English communication skills are fully explained!
Free download of oral simulation practice + foreign teacher reading audio + universal business little common sense, easy to improve your business English oral skills!
Practical Business English Conversation 100 by Wang Huili, Zhan Lili, and Wang Yutui, a genuine book directly supplied by China Aerospace Press, can issue a regular electronic invoice. If you have any questions, please contact our online customer service at any time!
5 minutes before going to bed in English - those classic works that have been passed down for hundreds of years Yang Chunli, Cheng Yingcui, Song Bing 9787512415812 Beijing University of Aeronautics and Astronautics Press
Original books, electronic invoices, after-sales protection, and if you have any questions, you can consult the online customer service.
Women Who Wear Handmade Shoes, by Adriana Trigiani, translated by Dong Yannan and Chen Huijie, 9787513306645, New Star Press [Direct Delivery]
This is a genuine book, which is directly supplied by the publisher. A regular electronic invoice will be issued. If there are any problems, please contact the online customer service at any time!
Beautiful and confident 100% [German] Kempf-Wirth [authentic book]
There are many discounts in the store. When you reach the amount, you will get a discount. Welcome to buy!
【Wenxuan Original】100 Practical Business English Conversation Scenarios
The four warehouses of Xinhua Bookstore (Jiangsu, Chengdu, Hubei and Tianjin) will deliver books to 75% of cities the next day!
Let's Talk About Autism: 55 Questions about Autism and Related Conditions
Beautiful English Letters That Take Your Breath Away (Letters Collection) (Edition 800 Extended Knowledge 1000 Authoritative English Essays 2000 Classic Quotations 3 [Genuine Book] [Genuine Book])
Yunnan: coordinate and standardize the management of rural public welfare posts-Xinhuanet
Xinhua News Agency, Kunming, December 12 (Reporter Lin Bifeng) In order to continue to do a good job in employment assistance for poverty-stricken people and consolidate and expand the results of poverty alleviation, Yunnan Province has recently issued relevant policies on the management of rural revitalization and rural public welfare posts to help comprehensively promote rural revitalization.
The relevant person in charge of the Yunnan Provincial Human Resources and Social Security Department introduced that at present, Yunnan has developed 448,300 rural public welfare posts, which are used to settle the employment of rural difficult groups such as poverty-stricken laborers, and play an important role in helping poverty-stricken people achieve employment and income increase, consolidating the results of poverty alleviation, and effectively improving the ability of various public services in rural areas.
This new regulation was jointly issued by seven departments, including Yunnan Human Resources and Social Security, Rural Revitalization, and Finance. It mainly unifies and standardizes the objects of recruitment for rural public welfare posts at the grassroots level, fund management, post development, post management, and other aspects.
In terms of post development setting, the new regulation clearly stipulates that it shall be set in accordance with the principles of "setting posts according to needs, determining persons according to posts, dynamically managing, controlling the total number", "who develops, who uses, who is responsible", and "one person, one post, voluntary open, unified management".
The recruitment procedures must be carried out in accordance with the steps of announcement, application, examination, announcement, employment, pre-employment training and on-the-job arrangement.
In addition, the new regulations also specify the specific responsibilities of the main developing departments of rural public welfare posts, the subsidy standards and subsidy methods of rural public welfare posts, and stipulate that each rural public welfare post development department should purchase accidental injury commercial insurance for rural public welfare post placement personnel; and require relevant departments to regularly supervise the distribution of subsidies for rural public welfare posts.
The address is wrong
Hello
Can I cancel the order?
I re-ordered
Whether it has been canceled
Second, although the right-wing has had its heyday in history, it is not long. Therefore, it is short because it shines with a little sunshine and sweats with a little hot water; when it gets a little success, it looks at Shuhan, and when it is hit, it will be attached to the general.
However, in reality, the right has played a positive role in the process of social progress.
From the end of the Cultural Revolution to define the standard of truth, to develop the economy, to improve science and technology, and to promote the institutionalization of politics and the protection of human rights, the positive significance of the right should not be denied.
Three, as far as I am concerned, although I do not completely agree with some of Li Weidong’s statements, I am very concerned about his statements, and I also respect Li Weidong as a person; because he is serious, he is serious about China, and he also takes China’s social problems seriously.
However, I disagree with his anti-communist theory. I believe that anti-revolution is inevitable, and revolution will inevitably lead to social turmoil, damage to people's livelihood, and a mixture of fish and dragons in political groups. Then, foreigners will take advantage of the situation.
Fourthly, to change or improve China, one should have patience and a sense of responsibility for the country and the people. Those who try to take advantage of political opportunism are not rightists, but scoundrels.
Let's talk about the left again.
The left, in fact, is a bunch of people abandoned by the times and politics.
If the right has a positive meaning for society, the Communist Party will listen to some of the right's opinions and analyze their thoughts when necessary, but the left has no such fate, because the left is exactly what the Communist Party has thrown away!
Fifth, I have recently seen some friends who are both attacking the counter-revolutionary and refuting the left-wing, which is quite real. I think it is not necessary.
Don’t try to reason with the traitors and the left-wingers. They’re all the same, and there’s no point in reasoning with them.
Don't try to prove we're right, don't try to get the enemy and the left to admit it, why bother?
I told my friends: when the counter-revolutionary curses you as a five-cent and the left-wing curses you as a right-wing dog, it just proves that our middle path is correct!
Many people had ideals when they were young, but when they got older, they forgot their ideals, or pursued their ideals, but became obsessed.
and the ideal is getting further and further away, and even the young dragon slayer has become an evil dragon.
I think left and right generally refers to constraints and freedom, and China as a whole should be biased towards the left from its historical and cultural genes.
Domestic right-wing freedom focuses on efficiency and development, while left-wing strengthening supervision focuses more on fairness and security.
At present, society as a whole hopes to pay more attention to fairness. At the same time, China and the United States are competing, and the left is positive, and it is estimated that it will continue for many years.
Although I don’t understand it, I can just like it
Nothing to say, Hua Hua is so righteous
In the past two years, the blockade and encirclement of Huawei chips by the United States has not only put Huawei in an unprecedented predicament, but also caused huge losses to "American" enterprises.
The suppression of China's chip industry by the United States, and the simultaneous blockade of China's chip industry by relevant enterprises in the United States and allied countries, directly led to the fact that the orders and profits of global chip suppliers were affected, causing a reduction in research and development investment and production capacity of chip manufacturing enterprises, thus causing chaos in the global chip supply chain.
At present, the "chip shortage" has affected all major industries in the world, such as the suspension of production of car companies and the increase in the price of mobile phones. Almost all industries that use chips are deeply affected by it.
In order to grasp the "chip" autonomy, more and more technology giants in more and more countries have begun to move towards the "de-Americanization" path.
In order to firmly grasp the global semiconductor control rights and curb the development of China's semiconductor industry, the old Americans have recently taken frequent actions. First, they hosted the "Chip Summit" and then invited 64 country giants to establish a semiconductor alliance and withdraw funds to support domestic technology giants in the United States. For example, the old American technology giant Intel spent 20 billion U.S. dollars to build two wafer processing plants in Arizona, USA, and opened the chip outsourcing business to the outside world in order to regain the dominant position in the chip field.
When most people thought that Intel's move would have a certain impact on TSMC, and was very likely to take away TSMC's "rice bowl".
The reason for this confidence is that as an old-fashioned technology giant in the United States, Intel has been deeply involved in the semiconductor industry for decades and has a large number of human resources and technical reserves, which must be able to quickly rise in a short period of time and defeat TSMC.
However, Zhang Zhonghmou, the founder of TSMC, did not care about Intel's decision.
At the "2021 Master Think Tank Forum" held in April this year, Zhang Zhongmou made a shocking remark. For Intel's investment in building a wafer factory, Zhang Zhongmou said without hesitation: Intel building a chip foundry is quite ironic.
Zhang Zhonghua's disdain for Intel's foray into the wafer field is because Zhang Zhonghua still holds a grudge against the relationship between TSMC and Intel more than 30 years ago.
In the 1960s and 1970s, Intel was always the jewel of the US manufacturing industry, occupying the top position in the world and dominating the global semiconductor industry.
In the 1980s, the world’s high-end semiconductor chips were in the hands of a few strong players.
At that time, the semiconductor industry was characterized by the IDM model. The chip was designed, manufactured and packaged by one factory, and Intel was the representative of that era.
However, such a model makes some small enterprises overwhelmed, and many semiconductor entrepreneurs face huge production line construction costs and can only give up.
Under the influence of market demand, after entering the 1980s, the chip industry began to appear the phenomenon of division of labor and cooperation. In 1984, Zhang Zhonghua heard that there was a company that specialized in chip design, so he thought that since there was a company that specialized in design, he could set up a factory that specialized in wafer manufacturing.
Soon after, Zhang Zhonghua's idea became a reality, and TSMC was born.
TSMC has focused its main business on the single link of "wafer processing". It does not engage in design and only provides foundry services for wafer manufacturing.
When TSMC was first established, it was just a small fry in front of the giant Intel.
In order to obtain capital support, Zhang Zhonghua once found Intel to invest, but at that time, when Intel heard that TSMC was only engaged in the manufacturing link of the chip industry, it was obviously a little arrogant, looked down on TSMC, and decisively refused to invest in TSMC.
Zhang Zhongmou also determined that Intel at that time looked down on wafer process services.
Unexpectedly, the giants who once looked down on wafer manufacturing services now also have to start doing wafer foundry.
Therefore, Zhang Zhongmou felt that it was ironic for Intel to enter the wafer foundry.
Today, TSMC’s market value has already exceeded that of Intel.
Faced with TSMC’s strong attack, Intel is naturally not willing to stand still.
Today, TSMC is rushing towards 3nm chips, while Intel is still at 14nm, which is 7 years ago.
It is not easy to overtake.
Can't wait
Ordered at 19:06 and it’s now 21:06 😅
Let's take a look at some [strange hot searches] today.
What is normal public opinion?
Randomly select three hot searches: the second day of the second lunar month, the price hike of Goodfriend, and the Huolala incident. The public opinion spreads to form a peak, and then the [index declines] (smoothed curve) and finally dissipates. If there is secondary public opinion, there will be a small peak again.
They look exactly the same as the [network public opinion evolution model] displayed on the official website of the Cyberspace Administration of China.
What is abnormal public opinion?
Six hot searches of the same event were randomly selected, and presented in the shape of a "lone peak", a "sawtooth", and a "cliff".
"Peak-like" means that it is artificially heated and quickly rushed to the hot search list to attract public attention; "sawtooth-like" means that it is periodically heated to ensure that the topic remains on the hot search list; "cliff-like" means that it is collectively evacuated. This hot search has fulfilled its "function" and received a new mission, rushing to a new battlefield.
As shown in Figure 9, the heat wave peak of one event is exactly the trough of another event, and the time is accurate to seconds. It must be that the unified water army received the task and launched a new round of offensive.
The professionalization of black public relations can be seen at a glance: dozens of hot searches are on the list at the same time, which ones attract attention, which ones are responsible for popular science, which ones stir up trouble, which ones divert attention, which ones affect cognition, which ones mislead judgment, which ones incite emotions, and which ones drag on decision-making. The black production accounts carry out precise operations in batches and nodes, and almost consider all the elements in the dissemination of public opinion.
Public relations is a science. No matter what position or emotional factors are involved, black public relations will not be able to escape from the objective data.
Those who pass by will leave traces, and we will dig out these traces together.
Data source: Hot search time machine.
The first case of infection with the Omicron strain was found in Mauritius and other countries - Xinhuanet
Beijing, December 12, 2021, Xinhua News Agency: According to reports from Xinhua’s foreign correspondents, Mauritius, Cyprus and Malawi have recently reported the first cases of infection with the Omicron variant of the new coronavirus.
Mauritius reported its first two cases of the Omicron variant on the 10th.
According to Mauritian Minister of Health Kailesh Jagutpal, one of the infected people is a tourist who arrived in Mauritius on November 27 after departing from South Africa; the other infected person is a local Mauritian who tested positive for the nucleic acid test on November 30 after being in contact with a person who had recently returned from South Africa.
After being isolated and treated in the hospital, the nucleic acid test results of the two infected persons turned negative. They have now returned to their respective places of residence.
The Ministry of Health of Cyprus announced on the 10th that three cases of Omicron variant infection were confirmed for the first time in the country.
The three were students who returned from overseas travel at the beginning of this month. Because they were all mild cases, they did not go to the hospital for treatment.
In order to prevent the spread of the Omicron strain, the Serbian government has stepped up prevention and control efforts.
From December 6 to January 10 next year, passengers aged 12 or above who entered the country by plane need to pay for a nucleic acid test at the airport after arriving.
The Serbian Ministry of Health also announced on the 10th that it will begin to vaccinate children aged 5 to 11 in the country with the Pfizer COVID-19 vaccine.
Kumbize Chiponda, Minister of Health of Malawi, said on the 9th that the country has found three cases of Omicron variant infection for the first time.
The country's health department conducted genomic sequencing on 12 positive samples of COVID-19 collected from November 9 to December 2, and discovered these three cases of infection.
The delivery never arrived
Even the rider's telephone number is fake
I've already re-ordered
Will the previous single be refunded?
If not, cancel the order and get a refund
I was thinking that if I ordered earlier, I could eat earlier, but now it's 7 o'clock and I still haven't had anything to eat.
I don't understand what you're saying...
Is your Chinese translated? Or do you prefer to use English?
That was sent to
Do you want to call him?
Dear customers,
Thank you for choosing to dine in our restaurant. Your happiness is our mission. We will provide you and your family with more delicious and worry-free dishes and better service. Your satisfaction and praise have always been our driving force!
Thank you for your five-star praise, I love you!
Thank you for choosing to dine with us. We are very sorry that this has caused you trouble!
At the same time, thank you very much for your true experience evaluation, which allows us to find the shortcomings in time. We will certainly take effective measures to improve, strictly control the quality and quantity of the dishes. I am Xiaoyun of Zhiyun Restaurant. Our phone number is 18912251735. WeChat is synchronized. We look forward to meeting you here again.
Dear customer, thank you for choosing to dine at Zhiyun Restaurant. We are deeply sorry for the unpleasant dining experience caused by the dishes. We have communicated with the kitchen and strictly controlled the dishes. Thank you for your understanding and support. I am Xiao Yun from Zhiyun Restaurant. I look forward to meeting you again!
Come to the banquet and leave with a good mood!
Dear customers, thank you for your evaluation and support for our “Xiaoyun”. When our carefully cooked dishes get your approval, it is our happiest moment!
Look forward to meeting you again
Dear little master, first of all, thank you very much for your recognition and evaluation, and we will try our best to do better!
Second, I would also like to thank you for your support and likes in your busy schedule. I wish you a happy meal and a good mood every day!
I don't think it helps in any way!
They received a belly of money
The order is the claw of the phoenix
Alright, the phone number is #PHONENUMBER#
Do I need to stay in the conversation?
I called #NAME# to explain to your staff
Your riders told me the address was too far
Da Mei 360 integrated home decoration
Address: Room 12, Happy Home, No. 156, Nanhuan Road
At the beginning, it was recommended by friends because of trust, so I chose to come and have a look. My initial budget was 70,000 yuan for basic decoration.
Once inside the store, a series of tricks began.
I went to the store for the first time just to show them my floor plan, and they did not go to the site to measure the house. They actually gave me a quote saying that my 135-square-meter house could be done for 70,000 yuan. They roughly showed me their materials, but I did not know what brand their materials were.
Their second trick is that once you go to the store, they will drag you to pay the deposit (and once you pay the deposit, you will never get it back, unless you have enough experience and can argue with them).
When I was hesitating whether to pay the deposit, they would invite their so-called managers to tell you that if you pay the deposit today, we will give you a lot of discounts.
This is a big pit, and I am a living example of being cheated. I paid a deposit of more than 10,000 yuan when I was impulsive.
He quoted me a lot of problems, 70,000 yuan did not include the renovation of water and electricity, did not include any doors and cabinets in the bathroom, and these three were the main cost of the base decoration.
In addition, their service point fees are higher than those of other companies.
I lost trust in this company, and they let me sign the contract without explaining anything at the beginning.
When I went to get my money back they were very experienced and had a special little team to deal with you.
They'll always say that it's the customer's problem, and they have nothing to do with it.
There are all kinds of excuses, and there are many details. I don't want to talk about them one by one. All in all, don't choose them. Because my friend's house was also decorated by them, and the quality was not good. They will calculate all kinds of fees for you later.
It's a scam, they're just the original fake dragon head decoration, and now they've changed to Da Mei, as if they've gone out of business again and changed to something else.
So please don't choose such a shitty decoration company.
In the future, when you choose, you can check Baidu and check these consulting services because renovation is not a small amount of money.
Please log in or register to ask questions to merchants.
It is strictly prohibited to publish various forms of business reviews. Please refer to the merchant inclusion declaration for details.
Meituan Kunming decoration design channel provides you with the latest merchant information of Da Mei 360 integrated home decoration address, telephone, business hours and other information. If you want to find a decoration company, just go to Meituan.
If it is not delivered within 30 minutes, please cancel the order!
Is there no other way? For example, change the address?
Okay, then don't cancel this conversation. If I don't get my money back in 5 to 10 days, I will definitely pursue it.
I ask if I can cancel in less than 15 minutes
The chicken was supposed to be cooked, but it was raw and couldn't be eaten
Starry Sky Has About丨The Geminid Meteor Shower Will Peak on the 14th - Xinhua Net
Xinhua News Agency, Tianjin, December 12 (Reporter Zhou Runjian) Astronomical popularization experts said that as the last large-scale meteor shower of this year, the Geminid meteor shower, one of the three major meteor showers in the northern hemisphere, will reach its peak on December 14. Friends who like meteor showers can observe it after midnight on that day.
The Geminid meteor shower photographed by Beijing amateur astronomer An Jiu in Qinghai on December 13, 2018.
Most meteor showers have cometary parent bodies, but the Geminids have 3200 Phaeton, an Apollo-type asteroid, as their parent body.
The Geminids are also the second known meteor shower not "parented" by a comet.
Xie Lipeng, a member of Tianjin Astronomical Society and an astronomical popularization expert, said that just like New Year's Eve movies, the Gemini meteor shower generally appears at the end of the year, and the "screening time" can last from December 4 to 17.
It is known for its large and steady flow, and together with the Quadrantids and the Perseids is known as one of the three major meteor showers in the Northern Hemisphere.
One of the distinctive features of the Geminid meteor shower is that the speed of the meteors is relatively slow, and the colors are rich, and there are many fireballs. It is suitable for both visual observation and beginners of astronomical photography.
Tianjin amateur astronomer Yang Jing took this photo of the Geminid meteor shower on December 13, 2020 in Jiuzhou, Tianjin.
The astronomical forecast shows that the Gemini meteor shower this year will reach its peak at about 15:00 on December 14, with a ZHR of 150 (the number of meteors seen per hour under ideal observation conditions when the radiant is directly overhead).
Geminid meteor shower recommendation index chart.
"Last year, the Geminid meteor shower left a deep impression on people, but this year's Geminid meteor shower will be affected by moonlight, and the spectacle will be a little discounted.
On the 14th, it was the 11th day of the 11th month of the lunar calendar, and the moon phase was a waxing gibbous moon. The bright moonlight will interfere with observation, but fortunately, the moon will set in the second half of the night, and the radiation point of the Gemini meteor shower will also rise higher.
Friends who like meteor showers can observe in the few hours after the moon sets at night, but should pay attention to keeping warm. "
How can you see as many meteors as possible?
"It is not recommended to observe in the city. You can choose a place with a high altitude, little light pollution and a wide field of view facing northeast in the suburbs or countryside, and then patiently wait for the moon to set and observe it with the naked eye.
It should be noted that the Gemini meteor shower has a large flow in all directions, and it is not necessary to stare at the Gemini meteor shower radiation point during observation.
If you are a photography enthusiast, you should choose a wide-angle, large-aperture lens to shoot, and use high ISO and maximum aperture when shooting.
Based on the considerations of stability and continuity, a tripod, a spare battery and a cable release are also indispensable. "
Xiu Lipeng reminded.
What is the difference in market positioning between laser TV and traditional TV?
In my understanding, the traditional TV mentioned by the questioner should refer to liquid crystal TV, and the difference between laser TV and liquid crystal TV in market positioning is mainly as follows:
First, laser TV is more focused on the big screen market.
Compared with the comprehensive market positioning of LCD TV, laser TV is obviously more focused on the large-screen market, or in other words, laser TV itself is a product born for the large-screen market.
At present, the mainstream LCD TVs are mostly between 55 inches and 65 inches, and the size of the laser TV is generally above 75 inches. The largest is more than 100 inches, which fully meets the needs of users for large-screen color TVs.
In recent years, the shipment and sales proportion of laser TVs in the global market have been increasing continuously, accounting for more than 60% of the total TV sales of 80 inches and above.
According to the prediction of Zhongyikang, the sales growth of laser TV market will exceed 140% in 2020, and continue to maintain high-speed growth.
The reason why it has achieved such good results in the large-screen market is mainly due to the excellent performance of laser TVs in eye protection.
Based on the imaging principle of laser TV diffuse reflection, the light emitted by the laser light source does not directly enter the eyeball. Compared with the backlight source of LCD TV, the imaging process is closer to the imaging process of objects under natural conditions, and the stimulation to the eyes is also smaller.
The Xisi Laboratory of China Electronics Standardization Research Institute and the ophthalmology experts of Beijing Union Medical College Hospital obtained 144 sets of test data through strict comparison experiments on watching laser TV and liquid crystal TV under the same conditions of the crowd.
The data confirmed that the laser TV does have strong eye protection characteristics, and even has a certain improvement effect in certain aspects.
At a time when vision health is increasingly valued, laser TV has not only attracted more and more users with its eye-protection advantages, but also opened another breakthrough in the color TV market.
Secondly, laser TV is more focused on the high-end market.
Contrary to the falling prices of liquid crystal TVs, the current prices of laser TVs are mostly above 10,000 yuan. With the upgrading of size and light source, the prices gradually rise.
Why are laser televisions so expensive?
There's a reason for that.
With the continuous development of light source and technical level, laser TVs have many advantages that LCD TVs and projectors cannot achieve.
Thanks to the ultra-short focal length projection technology, the projection distance of the laser TV is relatively shorter than that of traditional projectors, and can achieve a 100-inch large-screen experience in a short distance. The required space is not large, and the host is small and takes up little space.
In terms of brightness, large-brand laser TVs can reach more than 2000 lumens.
In addition, it generates less heat and causes less damage to equipment, and the television has a longer service life.
In addition to this, many high-end laser TV models are also equipped with true 4K ultra-high-definition picture quality, an artificial intelligence system, and a biomimetic screen, among other cutting-edge technologies, which can provide users with a more shocking audio-visual experience.
There is no fake demand, but a product of demand segmentation. In terms of picture quality and input-output ratio, laser TV is not suitable for audio-visual players. If you want to take into account the large screen and lack of viewing environment, you can try it. Everything has its advantages and disadvantages. After weighing the pros and cons, you can make your own judgment. I'm just afraid of listening to one-sided words.
Simply put, the ultra-wide-angle near-focus projector - the laser TV - has to use expensive ultra-wide-angle lenses and mirrors in order to be close to the screen, which is not in line with the best optical design.
In order to shield part of the ambient light, the use of micro-structured Fresnel screen is very expensive, and the price of 80 inches can basically buy a 65-inch liquid crystal.
There is one more thing that I particularly dislike. Projector manufacturers use diffuse reflection as a selling point, saying that it is good for the eyes. Please, the light on the screen that can be seen by the eyes is direct light for the eyes. If you diffuse it to the ceiling, the eyes can't see it, and if you insist that the LCD TV is also "direct diffuse", when the TV is turned on, isn't the ceiling also illuminated?
In addition, if the projection screen is not a diffuse reflection, it cannot form an image.
What is really uncomfortable is the hot spot (light spot) effect of the high-gain screen, where a large amount of light is reflected into the eyes from a certain angle.
The Visual Aesthetics Photography Gallery is a high-quality store and has no branches for the time being.
After adding the WeChat appointment date, the little sister arranged the time that can be chosen and sent it to me, and replied the message in a timely manner.
I looked at the shooting works in the store before going there. There were more outdoor wedding dresses, and they were very beautiful. There were also many shooting styles involved.
After I arrived that day, I had a simple exchange of ideas with the little sister, and she was very patient and helped me try on two sets of clothes that I was indecisive about. Finally, I settled on the makeup style. The photographer will arrange some props before the shooting and guide the action. They will also pay attention to every detail.
However, it may be because I did not communicate my specific shooting ideas with him, so what he shot was not the style I wanted, but it should be good-looking 🙊🙊
After taking the photos, the photographer will help choose the photos, communicate the post-production style, and feel quite careful.
It takes about half a month to repair a piece, and you have to wait for the effect.
The second time I won the photo-taking buffet activity! Most of the clothes in the venue can be chosen to take a photo.
Finally, she chose a black chiffon skirt to experience a different style.
The whole process took about 2 hours, including makeup and shooting. The photographer in charge of shooting is my younger brother who was born in 1995. I felt that he was a bit green. I hope that he can give more suggestions on shooting action guidance in the future. He was quite talkative, and the shooting process was pleasant.
Selected quality store of the Photography Museum of Visual Aesthetics Reply
Queenie is on the home page now. Come and have a look~
When I went to the store, I first filled in my name and phone number, and then chose the clothes. The wedding dress can also be chosen, and I changed three or four sets of clothes, which is quite patient. After choosing, I put on makeup for a long time, and the service attitude was also good. Later, when taking pictures, they would teach you how to pose. The feeling of the pictures was that my face was too big. The retouching was said to take half a month, and it was sent to me in three or four days. It felt like there was no difference from the original picture.
[Environment] Overall, it's not bad.
There are a lot of options for clothing.
There are about three places for makeup, and inside is a photo studio.
【Service】Very enthusiastic and careful.
The stylists were very patient.
The photographer will also teach you how to pose very seriously.
If the photographer is not satisfied, he will also take the initiative to re-shoot.
(Experience) The style may be a bit too much, and the original double eyelids were pasted into triple eyelids.
The tail of the eyebrows was also shaved off, which was a little embarrassing for those who do not draw eyebrows on a daily basis.
The photos were given ten days later, but I was not very satisfied with the retouching effect. I felt that the double eyelid stickers were still very obvious.
Because I was not very clear about what style I wanted, I tried two sets. In the end, I chose the black evening dress. The little sister said that this set was a more Hepburn retro style.
After choosing the clothes, I started to do my hair and makeup. The hairstylist and makeup artist sisters were very patient in helping me, and I was very satisfied with the results.
After the makeup and hair were done, we started taking pictures. The photographer gave me instructions on how to pose the whole time. The process was very easy and harmonious.
After the shoot, I carefully selected four of my favourite photos to be retouched. The young man said that the photos would be ready in 15 minutes, and I was very satisfied with the result.
It's been 3 days and no reply... because your system can't recognize my credit card, I can't join the #PRS_ORG# monthly fee plan!
The strangest thing is that I used the same credit card every time I paid
I now have to pay for shipping every time
Can I be exempted first, and then pay my monthly fees after you finish your investigation?
Is buying insurance for a small umbrella reliable?
Xiaoyu umbrella is an Internet insurance brokerage platform.
In terms of setting conditions: According to the instructions of the "Regulations on the Supervision of Insurance Brokerage Institutions (Revised in 2015)", to become an insurance brokerage company, it must meet three key words: shareholders, initiators have no major illegal records in the past three years, the minimum amount is RMB 50 million, and it must be approved by the China Insurance Regulatory Commission.
In fact, these three are very strict. They can be summarized as having strength and being approved by the China Banking and Insurance Regulatory Commission (which supervises insurance companies and banks across the country) and having shareholders with good conduct. As a small umbrella insurance company, policyholders do not need to question whether the small umbrella insurance is regular or not. After all, there are these three thresholds, and not all insurance companies can achieve them.
On this point, it's not bad, it's trustworthy.
From the perspective of insurance products, Xiaoyu Umbrella Insurance is an insurance supermarket. Many companies’ star critical illness insurance are sold on this platform, such as the newly listed Haitai Super Mary No. 5 Critical Illness Insurance. The claimant and the underwriter are both Haitai Life Insurance. Xiaoyu Umbrella Insurance is just a third-party intermediary, and there is no need to doubt its reliability.
From the perspective of the payment mode, the products of the Internet platform are generally more cost-effective, and the payment method is flexible, supporting monthly payment, which can reduce the payment pressure of the policyholder, and at the same time, it can maximize the leverage of insurance.
That's pretty good.
It can be considered.
In terms of the professionalism of the salesperson: this is particularly important, because the insurance industry has very high requirements for professionalism. Many customers of Internet products can buy insurance by themselves. This will lead to many misunderstandings. In terms of health declaration and occupation, non-insurance professionals will often add their own subjective consciousness when applying for insurance, thinking that they are healthy or meet the requirements, which will easily lead to many claim risks and may be rejected.
I myself used to sell insurance over the phone in "Tencent Micro Insurance" (just like a small umbrella, it is also an internet insurance brokerage platform), and I am very responsible to tell you.
Internet insurance is real and reliable. It is not reliable that people. Internet channels do not have professional practitioners, and there are many sales misleading.
For example, 1 yuan insurance for 6 million yuan, buying insurance to get a mobile phone, free to receive 600,000 critical illness insurance, these marketing strategies are not wrong, but they avoid the important issues and will not tell the policyholders that the first month is 1 yuan, and the second month is a normal charge, ranging from dozens to 200. Many customers do not know what they bought after paying for a year or two.
They thought they could pay 1 yuan, and the insurance company would pay 6 million yuan (a pie falling from the sky).
Free mobile phones are only given to policies with special policy numbers such as 6666, 8888, and if the winning text message is sent, no one will remind you if you do not redeem it.
(This is another pitfall for the policyholder) The free 60,000-yuan critical illness insurance is short-term. If you only rely on this and have no other commercial insurance, what can the 60,000 yuan be used for in case of a critical illness? It cannot solve the problem. The future life begins to run naked.
Currently, the state is also cracking down on the misleading sales of internet insurance.
In conclusion, there is no problem with the platform and no problem with the product. The problem lies in the professionalism and professional ethics of the salesmen.
It is recommended that the main question should consider comprehensively and carefully. In fact, the products of many offline insurance brokerage companies are more extensive. Customers can choose more opportunities and products, and some products have better cost performance than Internet products.
I have helped 59 Internet customers to insure offline products, and each of them saved 2,000 to 3,000 yuan per year.
If you have any questions, please feel free to communicate and exchange with me.
I: Mingya Insurance Broker, with more than 3 years of enterprise management training experience, has served nearly 1,000 enterprise users and cooperated with more than 100 insurance companies. Before the insurance, I will start from the needs of customers and customize insurance products for customers. During the insurance, I will compare three insurance companies for customers and strive to obtain the best underwriting results for customers. After the insurance, I will organize insurance policies for customers, entrust insurance policies, and make customers feel at ease and worry-free.
to grow with every customer for a lifetime.
I hope my answer can help the questioner!
According to the definition of the insurance regulatory department, internet insurance is an insurance business in which the policyholder can independently complete all the insurance procedures after clicking the insurance link.
In this process, the policyholder does not need to sign, the insurance agent does not need to sign, and all the steps can be completed by the policyholder independently.
Although the insurance purchase on the Internet has no “ceremony” and may not even have a printed paper contract, it does not affect the validity and legal effect of the electronic contract.
This model is somewhat similar to a "telephone sales" style of assembly line work, but there is a fatal problem with buying insurance in this way - the follow-up service may not be able to keep up.
Insurance is usually a long-term contract that lasts for decades. When we buy insurance, shouldn't we seriously think about whether the "intermediary" we choose is a "insurance intermediary" that can accompany us for a long time and provide us with services many years later?
How do I contact the delivery person?
It's almost 3 o'clock
Do I get compensated for that?
I said to knock and deliver
But the rider just left it on the doorstep and walked away
even sent it to the wrong person
Your rider has collected my takeaway from #NUMBER# but is still telling me it's on its way
The rider received my delivery at 19:25, but still refused to set off
After I bought it, would you like to order other takeaways
What to do
Where did your rider go
Do you have to wait?
I'm here to deliver
Well, if you don't cancel, I'll call the police
But my food will have safety and hygiene issues
Classic Sword and Sword Appreciation Guide Gold Edition [Authentic Book, Worry-free After-sales]
【Original books, fast delivery, worry-free quality, can be invoiced】
Classic Badge Appreciation Guide + Classic Sword Appreciation Guide + Classic Military Uniform Appreciation Guide Gold-plated Collector's Edition 3 volumes World Military Books Introduction to the Performance of Classic Military Badges Military Uniforms and Swords
Nine lectures on the identification and collection strategy of Chinese paintings
[Full amount reduction, fast delivery, can be invoiced, and genuine books]
Western Swords and Knives: Appreciation and Collection
Piano Technique Practice Guide [Original book, fast delivery]
Industrial Design Handbook of Creative Realization + Industry Guide + Performance by Luo Jian, Li Yuliang, and Jun, Tsinghua University Press [Original Book, Fast Delivery]
China Antique Auction Highlights: Porcelain (English Edition) [Original Book, Fast Delivery]
Jiuge Picture Book [Original Book, Fast Delivery]
The Dream of the Red Chamber
The History of Chinese Painting (Original Book, Fast Delivery)
The Book of Plants and Birds (authentic book, fast delivery)
Realism and Chinese Film in the 1980s
China Logo Design 1 (original book, fast delivery)
The Book of Flower Poems of Herbs (authentic book, fast delivery)
Sword Art Online 02: Aincrad
Song Jianfeng -- A master of figure painting.
Good Law and Good Governance - Reflections on Constitutional History and the Gains and Losses of Governance
The 20th Anniversary of the "Lectures on the History and Culture of Ministry-level Leaders" is a collection of the essence. Wang Chunyu, Zhang Dake, Xiong Zhaozheng, Ge Jianxiong, Deng Xiaonan, and other 14 history masters, cultural masters, and well-known scholars gave a public class to the ministry-level leaders.
Just enter the coupon code to make up for it.
No problem, remember no need to arrange reshipment, I have bought another one, and I don't want to waste it
Thank you for your help
I have always opposed any form of slander and abuse, and I cannot accept this kind of personal attack.
In a civilized society, we can tolerate everything, but we must eliminate this kind of scoundrel.
If you do not look at political parties and factions, the first thing to resist is this uncivilized style.
I have been ignoring you since you started asking me to be your Facebook friend, then posting sarcastic comments, and then when you tried to post so-called my home address and my father's name on social media.
After that, you not only continued to tag me at a rate of six times a day, but also continued to discuss with your so-called friends on Facebook about some implicit and humiliating remarks about me, such as my appearance, figure, good upbringing, whether to plant strawberries on the bed, whether to insert or not. I... I gave up.
Little did I know that I would later receive photos of you from multiple friends' Facebook accounts, along with comments of a sexual nature.
I'm sorry, as a woman, I can no longer be silent.
Since my report to the police, you have not toned down at all, but have become even more arrogant.
I don't care what your political background is, I don't care what your status is. In our society, we need to respect both men and women.
Yes, you can continue to make these snide, innuendo, shaming, abusive remarks, you can continue to say that you only care about and are concerned for me, you can continue to think that this is not harassment, you can even continue to deny that it's not your picture or continue to post all of your hateful comments.
That's right, I can't, and I don't have the power to stop you.
I don't know you, and I don't want to know you. My looks and figure don't need your evaluation.
I don't even think any girl would want to be humiliated like that to get famous.
Friends ask, "How are you doing?"
I said it, and you didn't believe me.
I don't think any girl can say they're fine after being bullied like that.
In the workplace, in society, in politics or in business, it is only those people who have no basic morals who would choose to hurt any woman in this way.
I believe that justice is in the hearts of people.
I cut some of the comments for you to judge
Your own posts shouldn't be able to be impersonated, right?
All I can say is that you are the enemy of civilization
It's a win-win situation.
Vietnamnet - Prime Minister Pham Minh Chinh attends the 3rd Vietnam National Digital Technology Enterprise Development Forum
During the third Vietnam National Digital Technology Enterprise Development Forum, two major meetings were held to discuss the topics of digital technology enterprises and national digital transformation, digital technology enterprises and economic recovery and development during and after the COVID-19 pandemic.
Nguyen Manh Hung, Minister of the Ministry of Information and Communications, said that in 2021, although the COVID-19 pandemic continued to spread, the number and revenue of Vietnamese digital technology enterprises still maintained a growth momentum of nearly 10%.
In 2021, the number of typical digital products in Vietnam has been cultivated, concentrating on solving the major problems faced by Vietnam. Many digital products have gone abroad, and the ranking of Vietnam's digital technology has been improved.
Minister Nguyen Manh Hung called on digital technology enterprises to shoulder the responsibility of developing a national digital transformation platform, and shouldering the task of developing these national digital platforms is to shoulder the national mission.
At the forum, the leaders of various departments and national organs, as well as the enterprises, organizations and individuals engaged in research, development, application and transfer of digital technologies, shared their ideas and solutions on mobilizing and gathering the resources of the whole society to develop Vietnamese technology enterprises, jointly promoting the digital transformation of the country, and post-epidemic economic recovery.
Premier Fan Mingzheng stressed in his speech at the forum that digital transformation is an inevitable path for the world and an objective need for development.
Digital transformation has become a global issue, and digital transformation is for everyone, so it is necessary to mobilize everyone to participate.
The people and enterprises are the core, subject, target and driving force of digital transformation.
Therefore, all policies must be for the people and enterprises.
Premier Fan Mingzheng emphasized that the digital transformation must reflect the national spirit, and must be based on self-reliance, strategic, long-term and decisive factors, and external forces as important and breakthrough points.
He also believes that the digital transformation should drive the in-depth development and sustainable development, participate in the prevention and control of the new coronary pneumonia epidemic, economic recovery and development, response to changes after the epidemic, overcome the phenomenon of natural resource depletion, and help green transformation and development of green energy.
The digital transformation needs to participate in the construction of databases related to national cultural values, historical traditions, national customs, and so on, and promote the digital transformation of banks, taxation, land management and development, logistics, and other fields.
The biggest goal of digital transformation is to make the people happier and the country more prosperous.
Prime Minister Fan Mingzheng requires that all levels of government, all levels of institutions and enterprises need to increase their leadership and guidance in the development of digital technology, improve their understanding of digital transformation, continue to formulate and improve the system of digital transformation, strengthen national management, and promote the development of digital technology enterprises with the spirit of respect, communication, listening, positive and active.
During the forum, Prime Minister Pham Minh Chinh attended the 2021 “Made in Vietnam” Outstanding Digital Product Awards ceremony and the opening ceremony of the “Made in Vietnam” Digital Product Exhibition.
I have reported, and attached pictures, but have not received a response
What a cow, no point in being a cow
It's a chicken with saliva, and it's raw meat
Can't eat
Are you sure it's freshly cooked food and not old?
unacceptable
I have already placed an order
They said it will be delivered at around 7 o'clock
Why does it need to be remade?
This is too much.
The 2021 China International Urban Rail Transit and Equipment Manufacturing Industry Talent Summit (Zhihui Xiangjiang) was opened - Rolling News - Hunan Daily Network - Huasheng Online
On December 10, the Hunan Daily reported (full-media reporter Zhou Ziheng) On the 9th, the 2021 China International Rail Transit and Equipment Manufacturing Industry Talent Summit was held in Zhuzhou.
Wang Cheng, member of the Standing Committee of the Provincial Party Committee and Minister of the Provincial Party Committee Organization Department, attended the launch ceremony and delivered a speech.
Wang Cheng pointed out that holding the talent summit is an important measure to implement the spirit of the Central Talent Work Conference and the 12th Party Congress of Hunan, and reflects the sincerity and sincerity of Hunan in attaching importance to talents, seeking talents, and using talents.
Hunan has a good tradition of loving and respecting talents, a broad platform to promote the development of talents, and environmental conditions to achieve a better life. In recent years, it has deeply implemented the talent-led development strategy, built an all-chain talent work pattern, and become a fertile land for the growth and achievements of talents, a hotbed for innovation and entrepreneurship, and a paradise for living and working.
At present, Hunan is implementing the "three high and four new" strategic positioning and mission tasks in an all-round way. It will further open the door to attract excellent talents and provide better policies, concentrate more resources, and create better conditions for the innovation and entrepreneurship of talents. We hope that outstanding talents from all walks of life will work together for the high-quality development of Hunan.
The activities set up the exhibition halls of Changsha, Zhuzhou, Xiangtan and Hunan Free Trade Zone. The Provincial Department of Science and Technology, the Provincial Department of Industry and Information Technology, and the Provincial Department of Human Resources and Social Security released the list of key demands for scientific and technological innovation in the advanced manufacturing industry, the list of demands for personnel in the intelligent manufacturing industry, and the list of demands for young talents in the intelligent manufacturing industry in the postdoctoral mobile station.
48 large-scale enterprises such as China CRRC, China Communications Construction Group and Yuan Da Technology participated in on-site recruitment, and more than 1,000 relevant professional graduates and social talents participated in the talent project docking.
Hello
I just placed an order and it says the rider is waiting at the restaurant, but the restaurant says the order is ready and they haven't seen the rider
Can you help me to follow up, because I am in a hurry, thank you
It's possible for no reason to be half an hour late
Do you actually have a solution?
This editor will bring you which one is good at Bailihan.
1, [Directly run by the winery] Ningcheng Ba Lihan old cellar 42 degrees 500ml strong aroma of sorghum liquor with mellow taste of old wine, four bottles in a box
Reason for recommendation: Selected sorghum as the raw material, brewed by traditional technology, white wine from the Inner Mongolia Plateau, with a more classic taste, strong and sweet taste, with a little bit of sweetness, rich in layers, using traditional solid-state white wine technology, retaining its original flavor without loss, allowing the body to carry a strong and mellow taste.
This product is level 1, with a capacity of 500, stored in a normal temperature, cool, dry, ventilated place, packaged in other ways, with an alcohol content of 42, a fragrance type of strong aroma, from Inner Mongolia, with a product weight (kg) of 2.9, and 4 people have evaluated it, with a 100% approval rate.
2. Ningcheng Bailihan old cellar 52-degree cellar-stored grain white wine in a big jar [10-kilogram package]
Recommendation reasons: after years of aging, it is more concentrated and more transparent. It is the wine that the nomadic people of Inner Mongolia love to drink. It inherits the traditional brewing process and intoxicates the Chinese people. It is a kind of white wine suitable for all kinds of banquets or home use.
This product has a capacity of 5000ml, is packaged in a bottle, has a product weight (kg) of 8, has a strong aroma type, is stored in a ventilated place, is from Inner Mongolia, has a level of one, has an alcohol content of 52, and has been evaluated by more than 50 people, with an approval rate of 95%.
3. [Directly operated by the brewery] Ningcheng Bailihan old cellar 42 degrees 500ml strong aroma high-quality sorghum wine, mellow old wine, six bottles per box
Reason for recommendation: This white liquor is selected from the ecological brewing of sorghum. The aroma is coordinated, the fermentation in the cellar, the wine is aged, and the taste of the wine is more fragrant.
Baijiu from the Inner Mongolia Plateau is more classic in taste, and the strong aroma flows over the guests’ lips and teeth, making them drink to their heart’s content.
Reason for recommendation: The selected sorghum is processed by unique skills, so that you can enjoy it at banquets and family gatherings.
High-speed train home
Address: No. 555, High-Speed Railway North Road View Map
Home appliances are relatively complete here, and there are many brands, all of which are well-known brands.
On December 12, I went to the "Hanston" water purifier store to see the water purifiers. The store was holding an activity at the time, and the price was relatively affordable.
Actually Home has a total of 11 floors, from the negative second floor to the 9th floor. The negative one and negative two are all parking places, and parking is free during the day!
The surrounding area is not very good. There are very few hardware stores and restaurants, and the taste of the restaurants is average.
This elevator is also speechless, just like having a big disease, from -2 to -1, back and forth, keep me pressing this floor, from the safety passage to the first floor, it is also speechless, directly connected to a furniture store, the furniture store closed, the safety passage can't get out!
Actually Home still needs to be improved, and there are many places that have not been developed.
Address: No. 555, High-speed Railway North Road, Saibek District, the traffic is convenient, the parking lot is very large, and it is free during the day.
Environment: To be honest, the store is large, with 8-9 floors. You can buy furniture, household appliances and all kinds of small things you want at home. Many well-known brands have settled in the store, such as MuSi, OuPai, HuADe, LaoBa, FengChuangZhiJia, HanSton, YaKe, YouFeng, XiRan, FuPinJiu, WanJiaLe, DaZiran, ZhongLian, MeiDe, YaDan, etc. The brands are really too many. I can only remember so many. It is a good place to buy products. If you are tired, you can rest on the sofa.
Recently, I want to buy a comfortable sofa. My friend said that there are many sofas to choose from here. I looked at Gujia Home and Meike Home and felt that it was OK, but the price was a bit expensive, so I was still hesitating.
The Urumqi Home Furnishing Market Channel of Dianping provides you with the latest merchant information, such as the address, telephone and business hours of the High-speed Railway Home Furnishings. If you want to find a decoration company, just go to Dianping.
It has been given to my guest, #PRS_ORG# cannot be completed
I've paid up, I've paid up
If it can be delivered within 20 minutes, it will not be cancelled.
The main stream of the Yangtze River achieves full coverage of the green comprehensive service area on the water - Xinhuanet
Xinhua News Agency, Wuhan, December 11 (Reporter Wang Xian) The Fuling Waterway Green Comprehensive Service Area in Chongqing was completed and put into operation as scheduled on the 10th. This is the second waterway green comprehensive service area to be officially put into operation in the upper reaches of the Yangtze River after the Luzhou Waterway Green Comprehensive Service Area in Sichuan was put into operation on the 8th.
As of now, the water green comprehensive service area has covered the upper, middle and lower reaches of the Yangtze River.
Qiu Jianhua, deputy director-general of the Yangtze River Navigation Administration of the Ministry of Transport, said that previously, provinces such as Hubei, Hunan, Jiangxi, Anhui and Jiangsu had built and operated 10 water green comprehensive service areas in the middle and lower reaches of the Yangtze River, which had been recognized by a large number of seafarers, and played an important role in promoting the high-quality development of Yangtze River navigation.
The full coverage of the green comprehensive service area on the water is another milestone event in the construction of the green shipping on the Yangtze River, and the ability to receive ship pollutants and shipping services has been significantly improved.
It is reported that the water-based green comprehensive service area is an important facility to provide all-round production and living services for a large number of ships and crew members, and to help a large number of crew members solve their "urgent, difficult, and urgent" problems.
The two green water comprehensive service areas in the upper reaches of the Yangtze River, which were completed and put into operation this time, integrate life services, production services and administrative services into one, with green and environmental protection as the theme, and ship maintenance and ship emergency rescue services as the features, to realize the "one docking, multiple services" for ships in the port, which will make the work of the crew members who travel on the Yangtze River all year round more efficient and life more convenient.
Three U.S. aircraft carriers gather in the vicinity of China, and the most powerful weapon in the U.S. Navy’s arsenal rarely visits Guam, 2022-01-17 Multi-dimensional Report: The latest news on Sino-U.S. relations: The latest satellite images show that three U.S. aircraft carriers are gathering in the vicinity of China; U.S. media also revealed that one of the most powerful weapons in the U.S. Navy’s arsenal rarely visited Guam, sending an important signal to the U.S. allies and enemies in the Indo-Pacific region.
According to the South China Sea Strategic Situation Perception Platform, a Chinese think tank, on January 9, a satellite found the US "USS Carl Vinson" aircraft carrier near the Balabac Strait.
The Balabac Strait connects the South China Sea and Sulu Sea, and is a strategic location on the first island chain in the Western Pacific.
The platform is expected that the "Karl Vincent" will be deployed in the South China Sea.
This was the first deployment of the F-35C fighter and the CMV-22 "Osprey" carrier-based transport aircraft on the "Carl Vinson" aircraft carrier.
In addition to the "Carl Vincent" aircraft carrier, the "Abraham Lincoln" (USS Abraham Lincoln) aircraft carrier, which left the United States on January 3, is currently sailing in the Pacific Ocean.
The USS Lincoln was also equipped with the F-35C carrier-based squadron for the first time, which belongs to the 314th Fighter Attack Squadron of the U.S. Marine Corps.
In addition to the two aircraft carriers mentioned above, the US Navy also has the USS Ronald Reagan aircraft carrier docked in Yokosuka, Japan in the Asia-Pacific region.
The aircraft carrier battle group also includes the guided missile cruiser "Champlain Lake" and the guided missile destroyer "Stockdale".
Three U.S. aircraft carriers gather around China The most powerful weapon is rare to visit Guam On January 17, 2022, the "South China Sea Strategic Situation Perception Platform" released the latest satellite image, showing that three U.S. aircraft carriers were gathering around China.
(Weibo@South China Sea Strategic Situation Perception) US three aircraft carriers gather around China, and the most powerful weapon is rare to visit Guam. On January 17, 2022, the flight route of US military transport aircraft CMV-22B.
(Weibo @South China Sea Strategic Situation Perception) According to a report by CNN on January 17, one of the most powerful weapons in the U.S. Navy’s arsenal visited Guam last weekend.
The Ohio-class nuclear submarine USS Nevada, carrying 20 Trident (Trident) ballistic missiles and dozens of nuclear warheads, entered the U.S. Naval Base in Guam last Saturday (January 15).
The three U.S. aircraft carriers gather around China, the most powerful weapon is rare to visit Guam. It is analyzed that this is a signal sent to the allies and enemies in the increasingly tense situation in the Indian-Pacific region.
This is the first visit to Guam by a U.S. ballistic missile submarine since 2016, and the second public visit since the 1980s.
The three U.S. aircraft carriers are gathering around China. The most powerful weapon is a rare visit to Guam. In recent years, China has built a large number of military facilities in the Nansha Islands.
The photo shows Yongshu Island in the Nansha Islands of China.
(South China Sea Forum) The U.S. Navy said in a statement that the visit of the Ohio-class nuclear submarine "Nevada" to Guam this time strengthened cooperation between the U.S. and its allies in the region, demonstrated the U.S. capabilities, flexibility, combat readiness, and continued commitment to the security and stability of the Indo-Pacific region.
Ballistic missile submarines are usually referred to as "boomers".
The movements of the 14 "thundering" submarines in the U.S. Navy fleet are usually strictly confidential.
The secrecy surrounding ballistic missile submarines has made the "Thunderbolt" submarine "the most important survival weapon in the nuclear triad," and this system also includes the ballistic missiles located in the launch wells on the mainland of the United States, as well as the B-2 and B-52 bombers capable of carrying nuclear warheads.
When chatting with friends about the recent 26% drop of Meta, the market value evaporated by 251 billion US dollars, and Zuckerberg responded "facing unprecedented competition". What is the reason?
Meta (formerly Facebook) is in essence an advertising company, and its main income comes from advertising. Nowadays, money-making advertising companies have their own traffic channels.
Facebook, Instagram, Whatsapp, etc. are all traffic channels for Meta, regardless of their functional positioning.
In addition, Meta is also the largest “advertising alliance”. Many apps are connected to Meta’s advertising, and realized monetization through Meta’s advertising platform.
But times have changed.
First, because of the adjustment of Apple’s privacy policy, it is difficult for Meta to obtain user data information, which affects the efficiency of advertising placement.
Apple's current privacy policy is user-friendly. It will clearly prompt users whether to allow the app to obtain their information, and most people will definitely not allow it.
If Google stabs again, the impact on Meta's revenue will be even greater.
Second, the Chinese factor in Meta's revenue growth has been weakened (the proportion of this factor is uncertain, but it does exist).
Everyone knows that Meta has no business in China, but this understanding is not accurate.
At least 10% of Meta's annual revenue comes from China, mainly from companies that do business in China.
Meta has a few hundred people in its Hong Kong office and a few major agents on the mainland.
Chinese companies want to expand their overseas markets, and Meta is an unavoidable advertising channel. Most of the money burned is given to Meta.
It is interesting that ByteDance's TT is now one of the main competitors of Meta, but Meta made a lot of money from ByteDance in the past two years.
All the agents in China are helping Bytedance to advertise on Meta, and Meta’s performance in Greater China is also very good.
I haven't looked into it recently, but I'm sure it won't be better than before.
The stage of large-scale burning of money by Chinese companies overseas has passed.
Third, the expansion of new traffic channels is not smooth.
Facebook is getting older, and new platforms such as TT are not in the hands of Meta.
The biggest problem isn't just the decline in income, but the lack of growth expectations.
The capital market doesn't just look at income, but more importantly, it looks at the expectations for the future.
Clearly, Meta's expectations were not met.
In order to tell a new story to the market, Zuckerberg talked about the “metaverse”.
The metaverse is indeed one of the directions of the future, but the implementation cycle of the metaverse is relatively long, and this story should not be enough to support Meta's market value in the next two or three years.
Therefore, the next two years should be a difficult time for Meta.
Don't look at Facebook's current prosperity, with an annual revenue of 100 billion to 200 billion US dollars, in fact, Facebook has a very strong sense of crisis now, and it has no good safe moat compared with other Internet companies and high-tech companies.
Although the daily active users of several of his social software are relatively high, and they are also mainstream social software, such as Facebook, WhatsApp, etc., in the face of the rapid development of TikTok, Facebook has no confidence, and it will be overturned in the blink of an eye.
And the concept of the metaverse that is out of reach is completely hopeless in a short period of time, so Facebook is very dangerous, which is also the fundamental reason why Zuckerberg changed the name of the company and kept looking for new tracks. I think his track selection is wrong and it is a dead end. The above are some of my thoughts for reference.
Article 17 The State shall implement the registration and practice management system for registered fire engineers.
Those who have obtained the first-level or second-level registered fire engineer qualification certificate can practice in the name of a registered fire engineer of the corresponding level.
Article 18 The Fire Bureau of the Ministry of Public Security is the registration and approval department for the qualification of first-level registered fire engineers.
The public security fire departments of provinces, autonomous regions and municipalities are the registration approval departments for the registration of second-level registered fire engineers and are responsible for the preliminary review of the registration of first-level registered fire engineers.
Article 19 The persons who obtain the first-class or second-class registered fire engineer qualification certificate and apply for registration shall be employed by an approved fire technical service organization or fire safety key unit, and submit the registration application materials to the fire department of the public security department in the place where the employing unit is located (if the employing unit is an enterprise, submit the registration application materials to the public security department in the place where the enterprise is registered) through the employing unit.
Article 20 The public security organs of provinces, autonomous regions, and municipalities directly under the Central Government, after receiving the registration application materials from the applicant, shall, if the application materials are incomplete or do not meet the legal formalities, inform the applicant of all the contents that need to be corrected in one go on the spot or within 5 working days. If they fail to inform the applicant within the time limit, they shall be deemed to have accepted the application from the date of receipt of the application materials.
The acceptance or non-acceptance of registration applications must be accompanied by a written certificate with the seal of the fire department of the public security organ at the same level and the date noted.
Article 21 Within 20 working days from the date of receiving the registration application, the public security organs of provinces, autonomous regions and municipalities directly under the Central Government shall, according to the prescribed conditions and procedures, complete the preliminary review of the registration application materials for the registration of first-level registered fire engineers and the registration approval of second-level registered fire engineers, and report the registration application materials for the registration of first-level registered fire engineers and the preliminary review opinions to the Fire Bureau of the Ministry of Public Security for approval.
The fire department of the Ministry of Public Security should make a decision on whether to approve it within 20 working days from the date of receipt of the application materials and the initial review opinions submitted by the fire department of the provincial public security organs.
If the approval decision cannot be made within the specified period, the extended period and the reasons shall be notified to the applicant.
In the case of making a decision not to approve, the reasons shall be stated in writing, and the applicant shall be informed of the right to apply for administrative reconsideration or to file an administrative lawsuit in accordance with the law.
Article 22 The registration approval department shall, within 10 working days from the date of approval decision, issue and deliver a registration certificate of corresponding level.
Article 23: Each registration period of the registration certificate is three years.
The registration certificate is the professional qualification certificate of the registered fire engineer of the corresponding level during the validity period, which is kept and used by the registered fire engineer himself.
Article 24 An applicant for initial registration shall apply for registration within 1 year from the date of obtaining the first-class or second-class registered fire engineer qualification certificate.
When applying for initial registration after the deadline, applicants must meet the continuing education requirements of this regulation.
The specific methods for registration management, including initial registration, continuation registration, change of registration, deregistration and non-registration, shall be specified by the Ministry of Public Security.
Article 25 Continuing education is a prerequisite for the renewal, re-registration and overdue initial registration of registered fire engineers.
Within each registration period, registered fire engineers at all levels should complete the corresponding continuing education as required.
Article 26 The registration approval department should announce the registration of fire safety engineers in a timely manner and establish an integrity file for registered fire safety engineers, and carry out credit management for their business activities.
Article 27 The registration management departments for registration of registered fire engineers at all levels shall strictly implement the relevant provisions of the Administrative Licensing Law of the People's Republic of China.
This is the end of today's exam information. I hope it can help you.
Everyone must work hard to prepare for the exam and strive to pass the fire engineer exam as soon as possible!
Real-time sharing of the latest financial/accounting/construction examination information.
I canceled... after waiting for a long time
You keep delaying
However, the whole chicken is raw meat and can't be eaten. Can I get a refund?
Pineapple, omelet and steamed buns were not delivered, and #PRS_ORG# returned #NUMBER# yuan
But can you get a refund on the chicken?
Because I was born unable to eat
What if I want to cancel? Can I?
The "Peace Rescue-2021" joint military exercise between the Chinese and Vietnamese armies ended successfully - Xinhuanet
Xinhua News Agency, Hanoi, December 12 (Zhou Na and Teng Huaijin) On the morning of the 12th, the Chinese contingent that participated in the "Peace Rescue - 2021" joint exercise between the Chinese and Vietnamese armies all returned to China safely in Guangxi, marking the successful completion of the 7-day exercise.
This time, the two armies of China and Vietnam focused on the major issue of humanitarian medical rescue, adhered to the mission of saving lives and treating the wounded, and completed the joint medical support command, joint on-site rescue, and mass casualty treatment in accordance with the actual combat standards, effectively improving the medical support capabilities of the two armies.
The results of the exercise were affirmed by the Chinese and Vietnamese armies.
At the closing ceremony of the exercise, Ruan Xiongsheng, Chairman of the Exercise Guidance Committee of Vietnam and Deputy Director of the General Logistics Department of the Vietnamese People's Army and Chief of Staff, said that through this exercise, the Vietnamese military doctors learned the knowledge of exercise organization and professional activities from the Chinese military doctors, and also saw the medical and support equipment of the Chinese side.
The achievements of the exercise proved the professional capabilities of the medical forces of the two countries in medical assistance and epidemic prevention.
Chen Chunming, Head of the Chinese guidance and coordination group and Deputy Director-General of the Health Bureau of the Logistics Support Department of the Central Military Commission, said that this exercise is another innovative practice based on the successful holding of the joint medical activities in 2018. It has a very important milestone significance.
During the exercise, the Chinese People's Liberation Army donated medical protective masks, medical protective clothing, and rapid nucleic acid testing instruments to the Vietnamese People's Army.
